MARXIST LIBRARY 

VOLUME XXII 



ORIGIN OF THE FAMILY, 

PRIVATE PROPERTY 

AND THE STATE 



FREDERICK ENGELS 



Digitized by the Internet Archive 
in 2012 



http://archive.org/details/originoffamilyprOOfred 




FRIEDRICH ENGELS (1893) 



FRIEDRICH ENGELS 



THE ORIGIN OF THE FAMILY, 

PRIVATE PROPERTY 

AND THE STATE 



In the Light of the Researches of 
Lewis H. Morgan 



WITH AN APPENDIX 

A Newly Discovered Case of Group Marriage (1892) 
By F. ENGELS 



INTERNATIONAL PUBLISHERS 
NEW YORK 



Printed in the Union of Soviet Socialist Republics 



CONTENTS 

Page 

PREFACE TO THE FIRST EDITION 1884 5 

PREFACE TO THE FOURTH EDITION 1891 6 

chapter one: Pre-Historic Stages of Culture 19 

two: The Family 25 

THREE: The Iroquois Gens 69 

four: The Grecian Gens 82 

five : The Rise of the Athenian State 90 

six: The Gens and the State in Rome 99 

— seven: The Gens Among the Celts and Germans . 108 
eight: The Formation of the State Among the 

Germans 120 

— nine: Barbarism and Civilization 130 

APPENDIX: A Newly Discovered Case of Group Marriage (1892) . 151 

name index 155 



PREFACE TO THE FIRST EDITION 1884 

The following chapters constitute, in a sense, the fulfilment of a 
bequest. It was no less a person than Karl Marx who had planned to 
present the results 'of Morgan's researches in connection with the con- 
clusions arrived at by his own — within certain limits I might say our — 
materialist investigation of history and thus make clear their whole 
significance. For in America, in his own way, Morgan had indeed re- 
discovered the materialist conception of history that was discovered by 
Marx forty years ago, and in his comparison of barbarism and civili- 
zation had been led to the same conclusions, in the main, as Marx had 
arrived at. And just as Das Kapital was for years both zealously plagia- 
rized and persistently hushed up by the professional economists in Ger- 
many, so was Morgan's Ancient Society* treated by the spokesmen of 
"prehistoric" science in England. My work can offer but a meagre sub- 
stitute for that which it was not given to my departed friend to accom- 
plish. However, I have before me, in his extensive extracts from Morgan, 
critical notes which I reproduce here wherever possible. 

According to the materialistic conception, the decisive factor in history 
is, in the last resort, the production and reproduction of immediate life. 
But this itself is of a twofold character. On the one hand, the production 
of the means of subsistence, of food, clothing and shelter and the tools 
requisite thereto; on the other, the production of human beings them- 
selves, the propagation of the species. The social institutions under which 
men of a definite historical epoch and of a definite country live are 
determined by both kinds of production; by the stage of development of 
labour, on the one hand, and of the family, on the other. The less the 
development of labour, and the more limited its volume of production 
and, therefore, the wealth of society, the more preponderatingly does the 
social order appear to be dominated by ties of sex. Within this structure 
of society based on ties of sex, however, the productivity of labour 



* Ancient Society or Researches in the Lines of Human Progress from Savagery 
through Barbarism to Civilization. By Lewis H. Morgan, London, MacMillan & Co., 
1877. This book was printed in America, and is remarkably difficult to obtain in 
London. The author died a few years ago, {F, E.) 



develops more and more, and within it, private property and exchange, 
differences in wealth, the possibility of utilizing the labour power of 
others, and thereby, the basis of class antagonisms: new social elements, 
which strive in the course of generations to adapt the old structure of 
society to the new conditions, until, finally, the incompatibility of the 
two leads to a complete revolution. The old society based on ties of sex 
bursts asunder in the collision of the newly-developed social classes; in 
its place a new society appears, constituted in a state, the units of which 
are no longer groups based on ties of sex, but territorial groups, a so- 
ciety in which the family system is entirely dominated by the property 
system, and in which the class antagonisms and class struggles, which 
make up the content of all hitherto written history now freely develop. 

Morgan's great merit lies in having discovered and reconstructed this 
prehistoric foundation of our written history in its main features, and 
in having found in the groups based on sex of the North American In- 
dians the key to the most important, hitherto insoluble, riddles of the 
earliest Greek, Roman and German history. His book, however, was not 
the work of one day. He grappled with his material for nearly forty 
years until he completely mastered it. That is why his book is one of the 
few epoch-making works of our time. 

In the following exposition the reader will, on the whole, easily be 
able to distinguish between what has been taken from Morgan and what 
I have added myself. In the historical sections dealing with Greece and 
Rome I have not limited myself to Morgan's data, but have added what 
I had at my disposal. The sections dealing with the Celts and the 
Germans are substantially my own; Morgan had at his disposal almost 
exclusively second-hand sources, and, as far as German conditions were 
concerned — with the exception of Tacitus — only the wretched liberal 
falsifications of Mr. Freeman. The economic arguments, sufficient for 
Morgan's purpose but wholly inadequate for my own, have all been 
elaborated afresh by myself. And, finally, I, of course, am responsible 
for all conclusions, wherever Morgan himself is not expressly quoted. 

PREFACE TO THE FOURTH EDITION 1891 

The previous large editions of this work have been out of print now 
for almost six months and the publisher has for some time past desired 
me to prepare a new edition. More urgent tasks have hitherto prevented 
me from doing so. Seven years have elapsed since the first edition 
appeared, and during this period our knowledge of the original forms 
of the family has made important progress. It was, therefore, necessary 
diligently to apply the hand to the work of amplification and improve- 



mcnt. particularly in view of the fact that the proposed stereotyping of 
the present text will make further changes on my part impossible for 
some time to come. 

I have, therefore, submitted the whole text to a careful revision, and 
have made a number of additions, in which, I hope, due regard has been 
paid to the present state of science. Further, in the course of this preface, 
I give a brief review of the development of the history of the family 
from Bachofen to Morgan, principally because the English pre-historic 
school, which is tinged with chauvinism, continues to do its utmost to 
kill by silence the complete revolution Morgan's discoveries have made 
in our conceptions of pre-historic society, although they do not hesitate 
in the least to appropriate his results. Elsewhere, too, this English exam- 
ple is followed only too often. 

My work has been translated into various languages. First into 
Italian: Uorigine della jamiglia, delta proprieta privata e dello stato, 
versione, riveduta dall'autore, di Pasquale Martignetti; Benevento 1885. 
Then Rumanian: Origina familei, proprietatei private si a statului, tra- 
ducere de Joan Nadejde, in the Yassy periodical "Contemporanul" 
September 1885 to May 1886. Further in Danish: Familjens Private jen- 
dommens og Statens Oprindelse, Dansk, af Forfatteren Gennemgaaet Ud- 
gave, besbrget af Gerson Trier, Kobenliavn, 1888. A French translation 
by Henri Rave based on the present German edition is in the ipress. 



Until the beginning of the "sixties there was no such thing as a history 
of the family. In this sphere historical science was still completely under 
the influence of the Five Books of Moses. The patriarchal form of the 
family, described there in greater detail than anywhere else, was not 
only implicitly accepted as the oldest form of the family, but also — after 
excluding polygamy — identified with the present-day bourgeois family, so 
that it appeared that the family had undergone no historical develop- 
ment at all. At the most it was admitted that a period of irregular sexual 
relationships might have existed in pre-historic times. To be sure, in 
addition to monogamy, Oriental polygamy and Indo-Tibetan polyandry 
were also known, but these three forms could not be arranged in any 
historical sequence, and appeared disconnectedly alongside of one an- 
other. That among certain peoples of ancient times, and among some still 
existing savage tribes, the line of descent was reckoned not from the fath- 
er but from the mother and, therefore, the female lineage alone was 
regarded as valid; that among many existing peoples marriage within 
certain large groups — /not subjected to closer investigation at that period — 
is prohibited to this day and that this custom is to be met with in all parts 



of the world — these facls were indeed known, and new examples weir 
constantly being brought to light. But nobody knew what to do with them, 
and even in E. B. Tylor's Researches into the Early History of Mankind, 
etc. (1865) they figure merely as "strange customs" along with the taboo in 
force among some savage tribes against the touching of burning wood 
with iron tools, and similar religious trivialities. 

The history of the family dates from 1861, from the publication of 
Baehofen's Mutterrecht.* In this work the author advances the following 
propositions: 

1) That in the beginning men lived in a state of sexual promiscuity, 
which the author incorrectly designates as "hetaerism." 

2) That such sexual promiscuity excludes all certainty as regards 
paternity; that lineage, therefore, could be reckoned only through the 
female line — according to mother-right — 'and that originally this prevailed 
among all the peoples of antiquity. 

3) That, consequently, women, who, as mothers, were the only defi- 
nitely ascertainable parents of the younger generation, were treated with 
a high degree of consideration and respect, which, according to Baeho- 
fen's conception, developed into the complete rule of women (gynaico- 
cracy). 

4) That the transition to monogamy, wherein the woman belongs 
exclusively to one man, implied the violation of a primeval religious 
injunction (i.e., in actual fact, the violation of the ancient traditional 
right of the other men to the same woman), a violation which had to be 
atoned for, or the toleration of which had to be purchased, by surrender- 
ing the woman to the other men for a limited period of time. 

Bachofen finds evidence for these theses in countless passages of 
ancient classical literature, which he had assembled with extraordinary 
diligence. According to him, the evolution from "hetaerism" to mo- 
nogamy, and from mother-right to father-right takes place, particularly 
among the Greeks, as a consequence of the evolution of religious ideas, 
the introduction of new deities, which are representative of the new out- 
look, into the old traditional pantheon representing the old outlook, so 
that the latter is more and more driven into the background by the for- 
mer. Thus, according to Bachofen, it is not the development of the actual 
conditions under which men live, but the religious reflection of these 
conditions in the minds of men that brought about the historical changes 
in the relative social positions of man and woman. Bachofen accordingly 
points to the Oresteia of Aeschylus as the dramatic representation of the 
struggle between declining mother-right and rising and victorious father- 



* Mother-right (matriarchate )—Ed. Eng. cd, 



right in the Heroic Age. Clytemnestra has slain her husband Agamem- 
non, just returned from the Trojan War, for the sake of her lover Aegis- 
thus; but Orestes, her son by Agamemnon, avenges his father's murder 
by slaying his mother. For this he is pursued by the Erinyes (the Furies), 
the demonic defenders of mother-right, according to which matricide 
is the most heinous and inexpiable of crimes. But Apollo, who through 
his oracle has incited Orestes to commit this deed, and Athena, who is 
called in as arbiter, protect him. These two deities represent the new 
patriarchal order. Athena listens to both sides. The whole controversy is 
summarized in the debate which now ensues between Orestes and the 
Erinyes. Orestes declares that Clytemnestra is guilty of a double outrage; 
for in killing her husband she also killed his father. Why then have the 
Erinyes persecuted him and not Clytemnestra, who is much the greater 
culprit? The reply is striking: 

"She was not related by blood to the man she slew." 

The murder of a man not related by blood, even though he be the 
husband of the murderess, is expiable and does not concern the Erinyes. 
Their function is to avenge only murders among blood relations, and 
the most heinous of all these, according to mother-right, is matricide. 
Apollo now intervenes in defence of Orestes. Athena calls upon the Areo- 
pagitae — the Athenian jurors — to vote on the question. The votes for acquit- 
tal and for condemnation are equal. Then Athena, as President of the 
Court, casts her vote in favour of Orestes and acquits him. Father-right 
has gained the day over mother-right. The "gods of young lineage," as 
they are described by the Erinyes themselves, gain a victory over the 
Erinyes, and these latter allow themselves finally to be persuaded to as- 
sume a new office in the service of the new order. 

This new, but decidedly correct, interpretation of the Oresteia is one 
of the best and most beautiful passages in the whole book, but it shows 
at the same time that Bachofen himself believes in the Erinyes, in Apollo 
and Athena, at least as much as Aeschylus did in his day; he, in fact, 
believes that in the Heroic Age of Greece they performed the miracle of 
overthrowing mother-right, and replacing it by father-right. Clearly, such 
a conception — which regards religion as the decisive driving force in world 
history — must finally end in sheer mysticism. It is, therefore, a disagree- 
able and by no means always profitable task to wade through Bachofen's 
bulky quarto volume. But all this does not detract from his merit 
as a pioneer, for he was the first to substitute for mere phrases about 
an unknown prehistoric condition of irregular sexual intercourse 
the definite proof that ancient classical literature teems with evidence 
showing that, before monogamy, a condition had in fact existed among 
the Greeks and the Asiatics, in which not only was a man permitted to 



have sexual intercourse with more than one woman, but a woman was 
permitted to have sexual intercourse with more than one man, without 
violating the established custom; that this custom did not disappear with- 
out leaving traces in the form of the limited surrender by which women 
were compelled to purchase their right to monogamic marriage; that 
descent, therefore, could originally be reckoned only through the female 
line from mother to mother; that this validity solely of the female line 
persisted far into the time of monogamy with assured, or at least ac- 
knowledged, paternity; and that this original position of the mother as 
the sole ascertainable parent of her children assured her, and thus wo- 
men in general, a higher social status than they have ever enjoyed since. 
Bachofen did not express these theses as clearly as this — his mystical out- 
look prevented him from doing so; but he proved that they were correct, 
and this, in 1861, meant a complete revolution. 

Bachofen 's bulky tome was written in German, that is, in the lan- 
guage of the nation which, at that time, interested itself less than any other 
in the early history of the present-day family. He, therefore, remained 
unknown. His immediate successor in this field appeared in 1865, 
without ever having heard of Bachofen. 

This successor was J. F. McLennan, the direct antithesis of his pred- 
ecessor. Instead of the talented mystic, we have here the dry-as-dust 
lawyer; instead of exuberant poetical fancy, we have the plausible con- 
structions of the advocate pleading his case. McLennan finds among 
many savage, barbarian and even civilized peoples of ancient and mod- 
ern times, a form of marriage, in which the bridegroom, alone or ac- 
companied by friends, has to feign to carry off the bride from her rela- 
tions by force. This custom must be the survival of a previous custom, 
whereby the men of one tribe acquired their wives from outside, from 
other tribes, by actually abducting them by force. How then did this "mar- 
riage by abduction" originate? As long as men could find sufficient 
women in their own tribe there was no need for it whatsoever. But quite 
as often we find that among undeveloped peoples certain groups exist 
(which round about 1865 were still often identified with the tribes them- 
selves) in which marriage within the group is forbidden, so that the men 
are obliged to secure their wives, and the women their husbands, from 
outside; while among others the custom prevails that the men of a cer- 
tain group are compelled to find their wives only within their own group. 
McLennan designates the first type of group exogamous, and the second 
endogamous, and without further ado establishes a rigid antithesis be- 
tween exogamous and endogamous "tribes." And although his own research- 
es into exogamy bring under his very nose the fact that in many, if 
not most, or even all cases this antithesis exists only in his own imagina- 



10 



tion, he nevertheless makes it the foundation of his entire theory. Accord- 
ing to this theory, exogamous tribes may procure their wives only from 
other tribes; and in the state of permanent inter-tribal warfare that is 
characteristic of savagery, this could be done only by abduction. 

McLennan argues further: Whence this custom of exogamy? The 
conceptions of consanguinity and incest could have nothing to do with 
it, for these are things which developed only much later. But the custom 
of killing female children immediately after birth, which was widely prev- 
alent among savages, might have something to do with it. This custom 
created a superfluity of men in each individual tribe, the necessary and 
immediate sequel of which was the common possession of a woman by 
a number of men — polyandry. The consequence of this again was that the 
mother of a child was known, but the father was not, hence kinship w r as 
ijeckoned only through the female line to the exclusion of the male — 
mother-right. And another consequence of the dearth of women within a 
tribe — a dearth mitigated but not overcome by polyandry, was precisely 
the systematic, forcible abduction of women of other tribes. "Since exog- 
amy and polyandry are referable to one and the same cause — <a want of 
balance between the sexes — we are forced to regard all the exogamous 
races as fiaving originally been polyandrous. . . . Therefore, we must hold 
it to be beyond dispute that among exogamous races the first system of 
kinship was that which recognized blood-ties through mothers only." 
(McLennan, Studies in Ancient History, 1886. Primitive Marriage, 
p. 124). 

McLennan's merit lies in having drawn attention to the general prev- 
alence and great importance of what he terms exogamy. But he by no 
means discovered the existence of exogamous groups, and still less did 
he understand it. Apart from the earlier, isolated notes of many observ- 
ers which served as McLennan's sources, Latham (Descriptive Ethnology, 
1859) exactly and correctly described this institution among the Indian 
Magars and declared that it was generally prevalent and existed in all 
parts of the world — a passage which McLennan himself quotes. And our 
Morgan, too, as far back as 1847, in his Letters on the Iroquois (in the 
American Review) and in 1851 in The League of the Iroquois proved 
that it existed in this tribe, and described it correctly, whereas, as we 
shall see, McLennan's lawyer's mentality caused far greater confusion on 
this subject than Bachofen's mystical phantasy caused in the sphere of 
mother-right. It is also to McLennan's credit that he recognized the ma- 
triarchal system of descent as the original form, although, as he himself 
admitted later, Bachofen preceded him in this. But here again he is far 
from clear; he speaks continually of "kinship through females only" and 
constantly applies this expression — correct for an earlier stage — to later 



11 



stages of development, where, although descent and inheritance are still 
exclusively reckoned through the female line, kinship is also recognized 
and expressed in the male line. This reflects the restricted outlook of the 
jurist, who creates a rigid legal expression for himself and continues to 
apply it without modification to conditions which have rendered it in- 
applicable. 

In spite of its plausibility, McLennan's theory evidently did not seem 
to be too well-founded even to the author himself. At least, he himself 
is struck by the fact that it is "worthy of note that the practice of the 
[mock] abduction of women is seen in its most striking and expressive 
form precisely among those peoples among whom male kinship [mean- 
ing descent through the male line] is the rule" (p. 140). And, again, 
"it is a remarkable fact that, as far as we know, infanticide is nowhere 
systematically practised where exogamy and the most ancient form of 
kinship exist side by side" (p. 146). Both these facts directly refute his 
interpretation, and he can oppose to them only new, still more intricate 
hypotheses. 

Nevertheless, in England his theory met with great approbation and 
evoked a great response. McLennan was generally accepted there as the 
founder of the history of the family, and the most eminent authority in 
this field. His antithesis between exogamous and endogamous "tribes," 
notwithstanding the individual exceptions and modifications admitted, 
remained nevertheless the recognized foundation of the prevailing con- 
ception, and was the blinker which made any free survey of the field 
under investigation and, consequently, any definite progress, impossible. 
In view of McLennan's overrating, which became the vogue in England 
and, following the English fashion, elsewhere as well, it is a duty to 
point out that the harm he caused with his completely misguided anti- 
thesis between exogamous and endogamous "tribes" outweighs the good 
done by his researches. 

Meanwhile, more and more facts soon came to light, which did not 
fit into his neat scheme. McLennan knew only three forms of marriage — 
polygamy, polyandry and monogamy. But once attention had been di- 
rected to this point, more and more proofs were discovered of the fact 
that among undeveloped peoples, forms of marriage existed in which a 
group of men possessed a group of women in common; and Lubbock in 
his Origin of Civilization (1870) recognized this group marriage ("com- 
munal marriage") as a historical fact. 

Immediately after, in 1871, Morgan appeared with new and, in many 
respects, conclusive material. He had become convinced that the pecu- 
liar system of kinship prevailing among the Iroquois was common to 
all the aborigines of the United States and was thus spread over a whole 



12 



continent, although it conflicted directly with the degrees of kinship 
actually arising from the system of marriage in force there. He there- 
upon prevailed on the American Federal Government to collect informa- 
tion about the kinship systems of other peoples, on the basis of question- 
naires and tables drawn up by himself; and he discovered from the an- 
swers : 

1. that the American Indian system of kinship prevailed among nu- 
merous tribes in Asia, and, in a somewhat modified form, in Africa and 
Australia; 

2. that it was completely explained by a form of group marriage, now 
approaching extinction, in Hawaii and in other Australian Islands; and 

3. that alongside this marriage form, a system of kinship also pre- 
vailed in these same islands which could only be explained by a still 
earlier, but now extinct form of group marriage. 

He published the collected data and his conclusions from them in 
his Systems of Consanguinity and Affinity (1871) and thereby carried 
the discussion on to an infinitely wider field. Taking the systems of 
kinship as his starting point, he reconstructed the forms of the family 
corresponding thereto, and thereby opened up a new path of investiga- 
tion and a more far reaching retrospect into the pre-history of mankind. 
Were this method to be recognized as valid, McLennan's neat construc- 
tion would be resolved into thin air. 

McLennan defended his theory in the new edition of Primitive Mar- 
riage (Studies in Ancient History, 1876). While he himself very artifi- 
cially constructs a history of the family out of sheer hypotheses, he de- 
mands of Lubbock and Miorgan not only proofs for every one of their 
statements, but proofs of incontestable validity such as would be admit- 
ted only in a Scottish Court of Law. And this is done by the man who 
from the close relationship between uncle (mother's brother) and neph- 
ew (sister's son) among the Germans (Tacitus, Germania, Chap. 20), 
from Caesar's report that the Britons in groups of ten or twelve pos- 
sessed their wives in common, and from all the other reports of ancient 
writers concerning community of women among the barbarians — unhesi- 
tatingly concludes that polyandry was the rule among all these peoples! 
It is like listening to a counsel for the prosecution, who permits himself 
every license in preparing his own case, but demands that the defending 
counsel shall present the most formal, legally valid proof for every word. 

Group marriage is a pure figment of the imagination, he asserts, 
and thus falls back far behind Bachofen. Morgan's systems of kinship, he 
says, are nothing more than mere conventions of social politeness, proved 
by the fact that the Indians are also in the habit of addressing stran- 
gers, white men, as "brother," or "father." It is as if one were to argue 



13 



that the terms mother, father, brother, sister, are merely empty forms of 
address because Catholic priests and abbesses are likewise addressed as 
lather and mother, and because monks and nuns, and even freemasons 
and members of English craft unions in solemn session assembled, are 
addressed as brother and sister. In short, McLennan's defence was miser- 
ably weak. 

One point, however, remained on which he had not been refuted. The 
antithesis between exogamous and endogamous '"tribes," upon which his 
whole system rested, was not only unshaken, but was even generally ac- 
cepted as the pivot of the entire history of the family. It was admitted 
that McLennan's attempt to explain this antithesis was inadequate and 
contradicted the very facts he himself had enumerated. But the antithesis 
itself, the existence of two mutually exclusive types of separate and inde- 
pendent tribes, one of which took its wives from within the tribe, while 
this was absolutely forbidden in the other — this passed as incontrovertible 
gospel. See, for example, B. Giraud-Teulon's Origines de la famille 
(1874) and even Lubbock's Origin of Civilization (Fourth Edition, 1882). 

This is the point at which Morgan's chief work enters: Ancient Society 
(1877), the book upon which the present work is based. What Morgan 
only dimly surmised in 1871 is here developed with full comprehension. 
Endogamy and exogamy constitute no antithesis; up to the present no 
exogamous "tribes'' have been brought to light anywhere. But at the time 
when group marriage still prevailed — and in all probability it existed 
everywhere at one time — the tribe consisted of a number of groups 
related by blood on the mother's side, gentes, within which marriage was 
strictly prohibited, so that the men of a gens, although they could, and 
as a rule did, take their wives from within their tribe, had, however, to 
take them from outside their gens. Thus, while the gens itself was strictly 
exogamous, the tribe, embracing all the gentes, was as strictly endogamous. 
With this, the last remnants of McLennan's artificial structure definitely 
collapsed. 

Morgan, however, did not rest content with this. The gens of the Amer- 
ican Indians served him as a means of making the second decisive advance 
in the field of investigation he had undertaken. He discovered that the 
gens, organized according to mother-right, was the original form out of 
which developed the later gens, organized according to father-right, the 
gens as we find it among the civilized peoples of antiquity. The Greek and 
Roman gens, an enigma to all previous historians, was now explained 
by the Indian gens, and thereby, a new basis was found for the whole 
history of primitive society. 

The re-discovery of the original matriarchal gens as the stage prelimi- 
nary to the patriarchal gens of the civilized peoples has the same signi- 



14 



ficance for primitive history as Darwin's theory of evolution has for bi- 
ology, and Marx's theory of surplus value has for political economy. It 
enabled Morgan to outline for the first time a history of the family, 
wherein at least the classical stages of development are, on the whole, 
provisionally established, as far as the material at present available per- 
mits. Clearly, this opens a new era in the treatment of primitive history. 
The matriarchal gens has become the pivot around which this entire science 
turns; since its discovery we know in which direction to conduct our 
researches, what to investigate and how to classify the results of our inves- 
tigations. As a consequence, progress in this field is now much more 
rapid than it was before Morgan's book appeared. 

Morgan's discoveries are now generally recognized, or radier appro- 
priated by the pre-historians even in England. But scarcely one of them 
will openly acknowledge that it is to Morgan that we owe this revolution 
in outlook. In England his book is persistently hushed up as far as pos- 
sible, and Morgan himself is dismissed with condescending praise for 
his previous work; the details of his exposition are eagerly seized upon 
for criticism, while an obstinate silence reigns with regard to his really 
great and important discoveries. The original edition of Ancient Society- 
is now out of print; in America there is no profitable market for books 
of this sort; in England, it would seem, the book was systematically sup- 
pressed, and the only edition of this epoch-making work still in circula- 
tion among booksellers is — the German translation. 

Whence this reserve, which it is difficult not to regard as a conspiracy 
of silence, particularly in view of the host of vapid and polite quotations 
and other evidences of camaraderie, with which the writings of our recog- 
nized pre-historians abound? Is it because Morgan is an American, and 
it is very hard for the English pre-historians, despite their (highly commend- 
able diligence in the collection of material, to have to depend for the 
general viewpoint w T hich determines the arrangement and grouping of 
this material, in short, for their ideas, upon two talented foreigners — 
Bachofen and Morgan? A German might be tolerated, but an American? 
Every Englishman becomes patriotic when faced with an American, divert- 
ing examples of which fact were brought home to me while I was in 
the United States. To this it must be added, that McLennan was, so to 
speak, the officially proclaimed founder and leader of the English pre- 
historic school; that it w r as, in a sense, good form among pre-historians 
to refer only with the greatest reverence to his artificially constructed 
historical theory of evolution from infanticide, through polyandry and 
marriage by abduction to the matriarchal family; that the slightest doubt 
cast upon the existence of endogamous and exogamous "tribes," each 
totally exclusive of the other, was regarded as rank heresy; so that Mor- 



15 



gan, in thus resolving all these sacred dogmas into thin air, was guilty 
of a kind of sacrilege. Moreover, he did this in such a way that he had 
only to state his case for it to become obvious at once; and McLennan's dis- 
ciples, hitherto staggering about between endogamy and exogamy, were 
almost driven to pulling their hair and exclaiming: "How could we have 
been so stupid as not to have discovered all this for ourselves long ago?" 

And, as though this were not crime enough to make it impossible for 
the official school to treat him with anything else than cold indifference, 
Morgan filled the cup to overflowing not only by criticizing civilization, 
the society of commodity production, the basic form of our present-day 
society, after a fashion reminiscent of Fourier, but also by speaking of 
a future transformation of society in words which Karl Marx might have 
used. He received his deserts, therefore, when McLennan indignantly 
charged him with having "a profound antipathy to the historical method," 
and, when in 1884 Professor Giraud-Teulon of Geneva endorsed this 
view. Was it not this same Mjr. Giraud-Teulon, who, in 1874 (Origines de 
la famille) was still wandering helplessly in the maze of McLennan's 
exogamy, from which it took Morgan to liberate him? 

It is not necessary for me to deal here with the other advances which 
the history of primitive society owes to Morgan; a reference to what is 
needed will be found in the course of this book. During the fourteen 
years that have elapsed since the publication of his chief work our mate- 
rial relating to the history of primitive human societies has been greatly 
augmented. In addition to anthropologists, travellers and professional 
pre-historians, students of comparative law have taken the field and have 
brought forth new material, and partly new points of view. As a conse- 
quence, some of Morgan's particular hypotheses have been shaken, or 
have even become obsolete. But nowhere have the newly-collected data 
led to the supplanting of his main conceptions by others. In its main 
features, the order he introduced into the study of the history of primitive 
society holds good to this day. We can even say that it is finding increas- 
ingly general acceptance in the same measure as his authorship of this 
great advance is being concealed.* 

T , T „ ,«», Friedrich Engels 

London, June 16, 1891 



* On my return voyage from New York in September 1888 I met an ex- 
Congressman for Rochester who had known Lewis Morgan. Unfortunately, he could 
tell me little about him. Morgan, he said, had lived in Rochester as a private citizen, 
occupying himself only with his studies. His brother was a colonel in the Army, 
and held a post in the War Department at Washington. Through the good offices 
of this brother, he had succeeded in interesting the government in his researches 
and in publishing a number of his works at public cost. This ex-Congressman had 
also assisted in this while in Congress. — F. E. 

16 




ir'K 



m 



Privateig-enthums 



3 k ? 



S 



VNT 






und des Staats. 



Im Anschluss 
an 

Lewis H. Morgans Forschungen 

Friedrich Engels. 



Hotti nge n-Zurieh. 

VeHag <ler S«hwe1rerrschen Volksbachhandlung. 

1884. 



.N«>^»^»^-.«s« 



^>:-<SI»gg@6K?t(H^gsQgg^Qe^^ 



Facsimile of cover of first German edition 



THE ORIGIN OF THE FAMILY, 

PRIVATE PROPERTY 

AND THE STATE 



CHAPTER ONE 
PRE-HISTORIC STAGES OF CULTURE 

Morgan was the first person with expert knowledge to attempt to 
introduce a definite order in the study of the history of primitive man; 
unless important additional material necessitates alterations, his classifi- 
cation may well remain in force. 

Of the three main epochs: Savagery, Barbarism and Civilization, he 
is naturally concerned only with the first two, and with the transition to 
the third. He subdivides each of these two epochs into a lower, middle 
and upper stage, according to the progress made in the production of the 
means of subsistence, for, as he says: "Upon their skill in this direction, 
the whole question of human supremacy on the earth depended. Mankind 
are the only beings who may be said to have gained an absolute control 
over the production of food. ... It is accordingly probable that the great 
epochs of human progress have been identified, more or less directly, 
with the enlargement of the sources of subsistence."* The development of 
the family proceeds concurrently, but does not offer such outstanding 
criteria for the delimitation of the periods. 

1. SAVAGERY 

1. Lower Stage. Infancy of the human race. Man still lived in his 
original habitat, tropical or sub-tropical forests, dwelling, at least par- 
tially, in trees; this alone explains his continued survival in face of the 
attacks of large beasts of prey. Fruits, nuts and roots served him as food; 
the formation of articulate speech was the main achievement of this period. 
None of the peoples that have become known during the historical period 
belonged any longer to this primeval stage. Although this period may 
have lasted for many thousands of years, we have no direct evidence of 



* Morgan, Ancient Society, p. 19. — Ed. Eng. ed. 
2* 19 



its existence; but once we admit the descent of man from the animal king- 
dom, the acceptance of this transitional stage is inevitable. 

2. Middle Stage. Commences with the acquisition of a fish subsistence 
(under which head we also include crabs, shell-fish and other aquatic 
animals) and with the use of fire. These two are complementary, since 
fish becomes fully edible only by the use of fire. This new food, however, 
made man independent of climate and locality. By following the rivers 
and coasts man was able, even in his savage state, to spread over the great- 
er part of the earth. The crude, unpolished stone implements of the earlier 
Stone Age — the so-called Paleolithic Period — which belong wholly, or at 
least predominantly, to this period, are evidence, scattered over all the 
continents, of these migrations. The newly-occupied territories as well 
as the unceasingly active urge for discovery, linked with their command 
of the art of producing fire by friction, made available new means of 
subsistence, such as farinaceous roots and tubers, baked in hot ashes or 
in baking pits (ground ovens), and game, which was occasionally added 
to the diet after the invention of the first weapons — clubs and spears. 
Exclusively hunting tribes, such as figure in books, i. e., tribes subsisting 
solely by hunting, have never existed, for the fruits of the chase are much 
too precarious to make such an existence possible. As a consequence of 
the continued uncertainty with regard to sources of subsistence, cannibal- 
ism appears to have arisen at this stage, and continued for a long time. 
The Australian aborigines and many Polynesian tribes are to this day in 
this middle stage of savagery. 

3. Upper Stage. Commences with the invention of the bow and arrow, 
whereby wild game became a regular item of food, and hunting one of 
the normal occupations. Bow, string and arrow, constitute a very complex 
instrument, the invention of which pre-supposes a long accumulated ex- 
perience and sharpened mental powers, and consequently, an acquaintance 
with a host of other inventions. If we compare the peoples who, although 
familiar with the bow and arrow, are not yet acquainted with the art of 
pottery (from which point Morgan dates the transition to barbarism), we 
find, even at this early stage, the beginnings of settlement in villages, a 
certain amount of skill in producing means of subsistence, wooden ves- 
sels and utensils, finger-weaving (without looms) with filaments of bast, 
baskets woven from bast or rushes, and polished (neolithic) stone imple- 
ments. For the most part, also, fire and the stone axe have already pro- 
vided the canoe, and, in places, timber and planks for house-building. All 
these advances are to be found, for example, among the Indians of North- 
west America, who, although familiar with the bow and arrow, know 



20 



nothing as yet of pottery. The bow and arrow was for the period of sava- 
gery what the iron sword was for barbarism and fire-arms for civiliza- 
tion — namely, the decisive weapon. 



2. BARBARISM 

1. Lower Stage. Dates from the introduction of pottery. This latter had 
its origin, demonstrably in many cases and probably everywhere, in the 
coating of baskets or wooden vessels with clay in order to render them 
fire-proof; whereby it was soon discovered that the moulded clay also 
served the purpose without the inner vessel. 

Up to this point we could regard the course of evolution as being gen- 
erally valid for a definite period among all peoples, irrespective of local- 
ity. With the advent of barbarism, however, we reach a stage where the 
unequal natural endowments of the two hemispheres begins to assert 
itself. The characteristic feature of the period of barbarism is the domes- 
tication and breeding of animals and the cultivation of plants. Now the 
Eastern Hemisphere, the so-called Old World, contained almost all the 
animals adapted to domestication and all the cultivable cereals with one 
exception; while the Western Hemisphere, America, contained only one 
domesticable mammal, the llama, and this only in a part of the south; 
and only one cereal fit for cultivation, but that the best, maize. The effect 
of these different natural conditions was that from now on the population 
of each hemisphere went its own special way, and the landmarks on the 
boundary lines between the various stages are different in each of the 
two cases. 

2. Middle Stage. Commences in the East with the domestication of 
animals; in the West with the cultivation of edible plants by means of 
irrigation, and with the use of adobes (bricks dried in the sun) and stone 
for buildings. 

We shall commence with the West, because there this stage was no- 
where outgrown until the European Conquest. 

At the time of their discovery the Indians in the lower stage of bar- 
barism (to which all those found east of the Mississippi belonged) already 
engaged to a certain extent in the garden-cultivation of maize and perhaps 
also of pumpkins, melons and other garden produce, which supplied a 
very substantial part of their food. They lived in wooden houses, in vil- 
lages surrounded by stockades. The tribes of the Northwest, particularly 
those living in the neighbourhood of the Columbia River, still remained 
in the upper stage of savagery and were familiar neither with pottery 
nor with any kind of plant cultivation. On the other hand, the so-called 

21 



Pueblo Indians of New Mexico, the Mexicans, Central-Americans and 
Peruvians were already in the middle stage of barbarism at the time of 
the Conquest. They lived in fort-like houses built of adobe or stone, they 
cultivated, in artificially irrigated gardens, maize and other edible plants, 
varying according to location and climate, which constituted their chief 
source of subsistence, and they had even domesticated a few animals — the 
Mexicans the turkey and other birds, and the Peruvians the llama. They 
were furthermore acquainted with the use of wrought metals — with the 
exception of iron, which w r as the reason why they could not dispense w T ith 
the use of stone weapons and stone implements. The Spanish Conquest 
cut short all further independent development. 

In the East, the middle stage of barbarism commenced with the 
domestication of animals w T hich provided milk and meat, while plant 
cultivation appears to have remained unknow T n until very late in this 
period. The domestication and breeding of cattle and the formation of 
large herds seem to have caused the Aryans and the Semites to emerge 
from the remaining mass of barbarians. Names of cattle are still common 
to the European and the Asiatic Aryans, the names of cultivable plants 
hardly at all. 

In suitable places the formation of herds led to pastoral life; the 
Semites on the grassy plains of the Euphrates and the Tigris ; the Aryans 
on those of India, of the Oxus and the Jaxartes, of the Don and the Dnie- 
per. The domestication of animals must have been first accomplished on 
the borders of such pasture lands. It thus appears to later generations 
that the pastoral peoples originated in areas which, far from being the 
cradle of mankind, were, on the contrary, almost uninhabitable for their 
savage forebears and even for people in the lower stages of barbarism. 
On the other hand, once these barbarians of the middle stage took to 
pastoral life, it would never occur to them to leave the grassy watered 
plains of their own accord and return to the forest regions which had 
been the home of their ancestors. Even when the Aryans and Semites were 
driven further north and west, they found it impossible to settle in the 
forest regions of Western Asia and Europe, until they had been enabled, 
by means of the cultivation of cereals, to feed their cattle on this less 
favourable soil, and particularly to pass the winter there. It is more than 
probable that the cultivation of cereals was introduced here, in the first 
instance, owing to the necessity of providing fodder for cattle and only 
later became important for human food. 

The plentiful meat and milk diet among the Aryans and the Semites, 
and particularly the beneficial effects of these foods on children, may, 
perhaps, explain the superior development of these two races. In fact, the 
Pueblo Indians of New Mexico, who are reduced to an almost exclusively 



22 



vegetarian diet, have a smaller brain than the more meat and fish-eating 
Indians in the lower stage of barbarism. At any rate, cannibalism grad- 
ually disappears at this stage, and survives only as a religious rite or, 
what is almost identical in this instance, sorcery. 

3. Upper Stage. Commences with the smelting of iron ore and merges 
into civilization with the invention of alphabetic writing and its utiliza- 
tion for literary records. In this stage, which, as we have already noted, 
was traversed independently only in the Eastern Hemisphere, more pro- 
gress was made in production than in all the previous stages put together. 
To it belong the Greeks of the Heroic Age, the Italian tribes shortly 
before the foundation of Rome, the Germans of Tacitus and the Normans 
of the days of the Vikings. 

Above all, we here encounter for the first time the iron plough-share 
drawn by cattle, making possible cultivation on a wide scale — field agri- 
culture — and, in the conditions then prevailing, a practically unlimited 
increase in the means of subsistence; in connection with this we find also 
the clearing of forests and their transformation into arable and pasture 
land — which would have been impossible on any considerable scale with- 
out the iron axe and spade. But with this there also came a rapid increase 
of the population and dense populations in small areas. Prior to field agri- 
culture only very exceptional circumstances could have brought together 
half a million people under a central government; in all probability this 
never happened. 

In the poems of Homer, particularly the Iliad-, we find the upper stage 
of barbarism at its zenith. Finished iron tools, the bellows, the hand- 
mill, the potter's wheel, the making of wine and oil, the working up of 
metals developing into art, carriages and war-chariots, ship-building with 
planks and beams, the beginnings of architecture as an art, walled towns 
with towers and ramparts, the Homeric Epic and the entire mythology — 
these are the chief heritages carried over by the Greeks in their transition 
from barbarism to civilization. If we compare with this Caesar's and even 
Tacitus' descriptions of the Germans, who were on the threshold of that 
stage of culture from which the Homeric Greeks were preparing to advance 
into a higher, we will see how rich was the development of production 
in the upper stage of barbarism. 

The picture of the evolution of mankind through savagery and bar- 
barism to the beginnings of civilization that I have here sketched after 
Morgan, is already rich enough in new and, what is more, incontestable 
features, incontestable because they are taken straight from the condi- 
tions of production; but it will appear faint and meagre compared with 
the picture which will unroll itself at the end of our journey. Only then 
will it be possible to give a full view of the transition from barbarism 

23 



to civilization and the striking contrast between the two. For the time being 
we can generalize Morgan's periodization as follows: Savagery — the period 
in which the appropriation of natural products, ready for use, predomi- 
nated; the things produced by man are, in the main, instruments that 
facilitate this appropriation. Barbarism — the period in which knowledge 
of cattle-breeding and agriculture was acquired; in which methods of in- 
creasing the productivity of nature through human activity were learnt. 
Civilization — the period in which knowledge of the further working-up of 
natural products, of industry proper, and of art was acquired. 



CHAPTER TWO 
THE FAMILY 

Morgan, who spent the greater part of his life among the Iroquois — 
who still inhabit the State of New York — and was adopted by one of 
their tribes (the Senecas), discovered a system of kinship prevailing among 
them, that stood in contradiction to their actual family relationships. 
Marriage between single pairs, with easy separation on both sides, which 
Morgan termed the "pairing family," was the rule among them. The 
offspring of such a pair was known and recognized by all, and no doubt 
could arise as to the person to whom the designation father, mother, son, 
daughter, brother, sister should be applied. But the actual use of these 
terms stood in contradiction to this. The Iroquois calls not only his own 
children sons and daughters, but those of his brothers also; and they in 
their turn call him father. On the other hand, he calls his sisters' chil- 
dren nephews and nieces; and they call him uncle. Similarly, the Iroquois 
woman calls her sisters' children sons and daughters along with her 
own; and they in turn call her mother. On the other hand, she addresses 
her brothers' children as nephews and nieces; and she is called their aunt. 
In the same way, the children of brothers call one another brothers and 
sisters, and so do the children of sisters. The children of a woman and 
those of her brother, on the other hand, call each other cousins. And 
these are no mere empty terms, but expressions of ideas actually in force 
concerning nearness and remoteness, equality and inequality of blood- 
relationship ; and these ideas serve as the basis for a completely worked out 
system of consanguinity, capable of expressing some hundreds of different 
relationships of a single individual. Furthermore, this system not only 
exists in full force among all American Indians (no exceptions have as 
yet been discovered), but also prevails almost unchanged among the 
aborigines of India, among the Dravidian tribes in the Deccan and the 
Gaura tribes in Hindustan. The terms of kinship current among the Tamils 
Jof South India and the Seneca Iroquois in the State of New York are 
identical even at the present day for more than two hundred different 

25 



relationships. And among these tribes in India, also, as among all the 
American Indians, the relationships arising out of the prevailing form of 
the family stand in contradiction to the system of consanguinity. 

How is this to be explained? In view of the decisive role which 
kinship plays in the social order of all peoples in the stage of savagery 
and barbarism, the significance of so widespread a system cannot be 
explained away by mere phrases. A system which is generally prevalent 
throughout America, which likewise exists in Asia among peoples of an 
entirely different race, and more or less modified forms of which abound 
everywhere throughout Africa and Australia, requires to be historically 
explained; it cannot be explained away as McLennan, for example, at- 
tempted to do. The terms father, child, brother and sister are no mere 
honorific titles, but carry with them absolutely definite and very serious 
mutual obligations, the totality of which forms an essential part of the 
social constitution of these peoples. And the explanation was found. In the 
Sandwich Islands (Hawaii) there existed as late as the first half of the 
nineteenth century a form of the family characterized by just such fathers 
and mothers, brothers and sisters, sons and daughters, uncles and aunts, 
nephews and nieces, as are demanded by the American and ancient Indian 
system of consanguinity. But strangely enough, the system of consanguinity 
prevalent in Hawaii again clashed with the actual form of the family 
existing there. There, all first cousins, without exception, are regarded 
as brothers and sisters and as the common children, not only of their 
mother and her sisters, or their father and his brothers, but of all the 
brothers and sisters of their parents without distinction. Thus, if the Ameri- 
can system of consanguinity presupposes a more primitive form of the 
family, no longer existing in America itself, but actually found in Hawaii, 
the Hawaiian system of consanguinity, on the other hand, points to an 
even more primitive form of the family, which, although we cannot prove 
that it still exists anywhere, must nevertheless have existed, for otherwise 
the system of consanguinity corresponding to it could not have arisen. 
"The family," says .Morgan, "represents an active principle. It is never 
stationary, but advances from a lower to a higher form as society advances 
from a lower to a higher condition. . . . Systems of consanguinity, on 
the contrary, are passive; recording the progress made by the family at 
long intervals apart, and only changing radically when the family has 
radically changed."* "And," adds Marx, "the same applies generally to 
political, juridical, religious and philosophical systems." While the fam- 
ily progresses, the system of consanguinity becomes ossified, and while 
this latter continues to exist in the customary form, the family outgrows 



* Morgan, Ancient Society, p. 444. — Ed. Eng, ed. 

26 



it. Just as Cuvier could with certainty conclude from the bones of an 
animal skeleton found near Paris, that this belonged to a marsupial and 
that now extinct marsupials had once lived there, so we, with the same 
certainty, can conclude from a historically transmitted system of con- 
sanguinity, that an extinct form of the family corresponding to it had once 
existed. 

The systems of consanguinity and of forms of the family just referred 
to differ from those which prevail today, in that each child has several 
fathers and mothers. According to the American system of consanguinity, 
to which the Hawaiian family corresponds, brother and sister cannot be 
the father and the mother of one and the same child ; the Hawaiian system 
of consanguinity, on the contrary, presupposes a family in which this 
was the rule. We are confronted with a series of forms of the family which 
directly contradict the form hitherto generally accepted as being the only 
one prevailing. The traditional conception knows monogamy only, along 
with polygamy on the part of individual men, and even, perhaps, poly- 
andry on the part of individual women, and hushes up the fact — as is the 
way with moralizing philistines — that in practice, these bounds imposed 
by official society are silently, but unblushingly transgressed. The study of 
the history of primitive society, on the contrary, reveals to us conditions 
in which men live in polygamy and their wives simultaneously in poly- 
andry, and the common children are therefore regarded as being common 
to them all; in their turn, these conditions undergo a whole series of 
modifications until they are ultimately dissolved in monogamy. These mod- 
ifications are of such a character that the circle of people bound by the 
tie of common marriage — very wide originally — becomes more and more 
restricted, until, finally, only the single couple is left, the form predominat- 
ing today. 

In thus constructing retrospectively the history of the family, Morgan, 
in complete agreement with the majority of his colleagues, arrived at 
the primitive stage in which promiscuous intercourse prevailed within a 
tribe, so that every woman belonged to every man and, similarly, every 
man belonged to every woman. There had been talk about such a primitive 
stage ever since the last century,* but only in the most general way; 
Bachofen was the first — and this was one of his great services — to take 
it seriously and to search for traces of it in historical and religious tra- 
ditions. We know today that the traces Bachofen discovered do not lead 
back to a social stage of sexual promiscuity, but to a much later form, 
group marriage. That primitive social stage, if it really existed at all, 
belongs to so remote an epoch, that we can scarcely expect to find direct 



I.e., eighteenth century. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

27 



evidence of its existence in social fossils among backward savages. It is 
precisely to Bachofen's credit that he placed this question in the forefront 
of investigation.* 

It has become the fashion of late to deny the existence of this initial 
stage in the sexual life of mankind. The aim is to spare humanity this 
"shame." Apart from the absence of any direct evidence, reference is 
particularly made to the example of the rest of the animal world. Letour- 
neau {Evolution du manage et de la famille** 1888) has collected numer- 
ous facts purporting to show that in the animal world, too, absolute 
sexual promiscuity belongs to a lower stage. The only conclusion I can 
draw from all these facts, however, is that they prove absolutely nothing 
as far as man and his primeval conditions of life are concerned. Mating 
for lengthy periods of time among vertebrate animals can be sufficiently 
explained on physiological grounds, e. g., among birds, the helplessness 
of the female during brooding time; the example of faithful monogamy 
among birds proves nothing whatsoever for human beings, since these are 
not descended from birds. And if strict monogamy is to be regarded as 
the acme of all virtue, then the palm must be given to the tape-worm 
which possesses a complete male and female sexual apparatus in every 
one of its 50 to 200 proglottides or segments of the body, and passes 
the whole of its life in cohabiting with itself in every one of these seg- 
ments. If, however, we limit ourselves to mammals, we find all forms of 
sexual life among them: promiscuity, echoes of group marriage, polyg- 
amy and monogamy. Only polyandry is absent. This could only be 
achieved by human beings. Even our nearest relations, the quadrumana, 
exhibit the utmost possible diversity in the grouping of male and female; 
and, if we w r ant to draw the line closer and consider only the four an- 
thropoid apes, Letourneau can only tell us that they are sometimes monog- 
amous and sometimes polygamous, while Saussure, quoted by Giraud- 
Teulon, asserts that they are monogamous. The recent assertions of (Wester- 
marck in his History of Human Marriage (London 1891) regarding monog- 
amy among anthropoid apes are also far from being conclusive. In short, 
the reports are of such a character that the honest Letourneau admits: "For 

MHow little Bachofen understood what he had himself discovered, or rather 
guessed, is proved by his description of this primitive stage as "hetaerism." This 
word was used by the Greeks, when they introduced it, to describe intercourse 
between unmarried men, or those living in monogamy, and unmarried women; it 
always presupposes the existence of a definite form of marriage outside of which 
this intercourse takes place, and already includes prostitution, at least as a possibility. 
The word was never used in any other sense and I use it in this sense with 
Morgan. Bachofen's highly important discoveries are everywhere incredibly mystified 
by the fantastic belief that the historically developed relations between man and 
woman sprang from the religious ideas of the given period and not from the actual 
conditions of life. (F. E.) 

** The Evolution of Marriage and of the Family.— Ed. Eng. ed. 

28 



the rest there exists among the mammals absolutely no strict relation 
between the degree of intellectual development and the form of sexual 
intercourse." And Espinas (Des Societes animals * 1877) says point- 
blank: "The herd is the highest social group observable among animals. 
It appears to be composed of families, but right from the outset the herd 
and the family stand in antagonism to each other and they develop in 
inverse ratio." 

As is evident from the above, we know next to nothing conclusively 
about the family and other social groupings of the anthropoid apes. The 
reports directly contradict one another. Nor is this to be wondered at. 
How contradictory, how much in need of critical examination and sifting 
are the reports in our possession concerning even savage human tribes! 
But ape societies are still more difficult to observe than human societies. 
We must, therefore, for the present reject every conlusion drawn from 
such absolutely unreliable reports. 

The passage from Espinas, quoted above, however, provides us with 
a better clue. Among the higher animals the herd and the family are not 
complementary, but antagonistic to each other. Espinas describes very 
neatly how jealousy amongst the males at mating time loosens, or tempo- 
rarily dissolves, every social herd. ''Where the family is closely bound 
together herds are rare exceptions. On the other hand, the herd arises 
almost spontaneously where free sexual intercourse or polygamy is the 
rule. . . . For a herd to arise the family ties must have been loosened and 
the individual freed again. That is why we so rarely meet with organ- 
ized flocks among birds. . . . Among mammals, on the other hand, more or 
less organized societies are to be found, precisely because the individual 
in this case is not merged in the family. . . . Thus, at its inception, the 
community feeling of the herd can have no greater enemy than the com- 
munity feeling of the family. Let us not hesitate to say it openly: if a 
higher social form than the family has evolved, it can have been due 
solely to the fact that it incorporated within itself families which had 
undergone a fundamental transformation; which does not exclude the 
possibility that, precisely for this reason, these families were later able 
to reconstitute themselves under infinitely more favourable circumstan- 
ces." (Espinas, quoted by Giraud-Teulon in his Origines du mariage et de 
la famille** 1884, pp. 518-20.) 

From this it becomes apparent that animal societies have, to be sure, 
a certain value in drawing conclusions regarding human societies — but 
only in a negative sense. As far as we can ascertain, the higher verte- 
brates know only two forms of the family: polygamy and the single pair. 



* Animal Societies. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

* Origin of Marriage and of the Family. — Ed. Eng. ed. 



29 



In both cases only one adult male, only one husband is permissible. The 
jealousy of the male, which is both the tie and the restriction of the family, 
brings the animal family into conflict with the herd. The herd, the higher 
social form, is rendered impossible here, loosened there, or dissolved alto- 
gether during the mating season; at best, its continued development is 
hindered by the jealousy of the male. This alone suffices to prove that 
the animal family and primitive human society are irreconcilable things; 
that early man, working his way up out of the animal stage, either knew 
no family whatsoever, or at the most, knew of a family that is non-existent 
among animals. So weaponless an animal as the creature that was becom- 
ing man could also survive in small numbers in isolation with the single 
pair as the highest social form, such as is ascribed by Westermarck to 
the gorilla and the chimpanzee on the basis of hunters' reports. For evolu- 
tion out of the animal stage, however, for the completion of the greatest 
advance known to nature, another element was needed: the replacement 
of the individual's inadequate power to protect himself by the united 
strength and co-operation of the horde. The transition to the human stage 
out of conditions such as those under which the anthropoid apes live 
today would be absolutely inexplicable. These apes rather give the impres- 
sion of being stray sidelines gradually approaching extinction, and at any 
rate, in process of decline. This alone is sufficient reason fox rejecting 
all conclusions that are based on parallels drawn between their family 
forms and those of early man. Mutual toleration among the adult males, 
freedom from jealousy, was, however, the first condition for the building 
of those large and enduring groups in which alone the transformation from 
animal to man could be fully achieved. And indeed, what do we find as 
the oldest, most primitive form of the family, of which undeniable evi- 
dence can be found in history, and which even today can be studied here 
and there? Group marriage, the form in which whole groups of men 
and whole groups of women belong to one another, and which leaves but 
little scope for jealousy. And further, w r e find at a later stage of develop- 
ment the exceptional form of polyandry, which still more precludes all 
feeling of jealousy, and is, therefore, unknown to animals. Since, how- 
ever, the forms of group marriage known to us are accompanied by such 
peculiarly complicated conditions that they necessarily point to earlier, 
simpler forms of sexual relations and thus, in the last analysis, to a period 
of promiscuous intercourse corresponding to the period of transition 
from the animal stage to the human, references to the forms of marriage 
among animals, bring us back again to the very point from which they 
were supposed to have led us once and for all. 

What, then, does "promiscuous sexual intercourse" mean? Merely 
that the restrictions in force at present, or in earlier times, did not exist. 

30 



We have already witnessed the collapse of the restriction of jealousy. 
If anything is certain, it is that jealousy is an emotion of comparatively 
late development. The same applies to the conception of incest. Not only 
did brother and sister live as man and wife originally, but sexual rela- 
tions between parents and children are permitted among many peoples 
to this day. Bancroft (The Native Races of the Pacific States, 1875, 
Vol. I) testifies to the existence of this among the Kaviats of the Bering 
Straits, the Kadiaks of Alaska and the Tinnehs in the interior of British 
North America. Letourneau has collected reports of the same fact among 
the Chippewa Indians, the Cucus in Chile, the Caribbeans and the Karens 
of Burma; and we need not mention the accounts of the ancient Greeks 
and Romans concerning the Parthians, Persians, Scythians, Huns, etc. 
Prior to the invention of incest (and it is an invention, and one of the 
utmost value), sexual relations between parents and children could be 
no more disgusting than between other persoms belonging to different 
generations — such as indeed occurs today even in the most philistine coun- 
tries without exciting great horror ; in fact, even "old maids" of over sixty, 
if they are rich enough, occasionally marry young men of about thirty. 
However, if we eliminate from the most primitive forms of the family 
known to us the conceptions of incest that are associated with them — con- 
ceptions which are totally different from and are often in direct contra- 
diction to our own — <we arrive at a form of sexual intercourse which can 
only be described as promiscuous — promiscuous in so far as the restrictions 
later established by custom did not yet exist. It by no means necessarily 
follows from this that a higgledy-piggledy promiscuity was in daily practice. 
Separate pairings for a limited time are by no means excluded; in fact, 
even in group marriage they now constitute the majority of cases. And 
if Westermarck, the latest to deny this original state, defines as marriage 
every case where the two sexes remain mated until the birth of offspring, 
then it may be said that this kind of marriage could very well occur un- 
der the conditions of promiscuous sexual intercourse, without in any way 
contradicting promiscuity, i. e., the absence of barriers to sexual inter- 
course set up by custom. Westermarck, to be sure, starts out from the 
viewpoint that "promiscuity involves the suppression of individual in- 
clinations," so that "prostitution is its most genuine form." To me it 
rather seems that all understanding of primitive conditions remains im- 
possible so long as we regard them through brothel spectacles. We shall 
return to this point again when dealing with group marriage. 

According to Morgan, there developed out of this original condition 
of promiscuous intercourse, probably at a very early stage: 

1. The Consanguine Family. The first stage of the family. Here the 
marriage groups are ranged according to generations. All the grandfathers 



31 



and grandmothers within the limits of the family are all mutual hus- 
bands and wives, the same being the case with their children, the fathers 
and mothers, whose children will again form a third circle of common 
mates, their children — the great-grandchildren of the first — in turn, form- 
ing a fourth circle. Thus, in this form of the family, only ancestors and 
descendants, parents and children, are excluded from the rights and 
obligations (as we would say) of marriage with one another. Brothers and 
sisters, male and female cousins of the first, second and further degrees, 
are all mutually brothers and sisters, and, precisely because of this, are 
all mutually husbands and wives. In this stage the relation of brother 
and sister includes the exercise of sexual intercourse with one another 
as a matter of course.* In its typical form, such a family would consist 
of the descendants of a pair, among whom again, the descendants of each 
generation are all brothers and sisters, and, precisely for that reason, 
all husbands and wives. 

The consanguine family has become extinct. Even the crudest peoples 
known to history furnish no verifiable examples of this form of the fam- 
ily. The conclusion that it must have existed, however, is forced upon 
us by the Hawaiian system of consanguinity, still prevalent throughout 
the whole of Polynesia, which expresses degrees of consanguinity such as 
could arise only under such a form of the family; and we are forced 
to the same conclusion by the entire further development of the family, 
which postulates this form as a necessary preliminary stage. 



* Marx, in a letter written in the spring of 1882, expresses himself in the 
strongest possible terms about the absolute falsification of primeval times in Wagner's 
text of the "Nibelungs." "Whoever heard of a brother embracing his sister as his 
bride?" To these "lewd gods" of Wagner's, who, in quite modern style, spiced 
their love intrigues with a little incest, Marx gave the answer: "In primeval times 
the sister was the wife, and that was moral. (Footnote to the fourth edition.) A 
French friend and admirer of Wagner does not agree with this note, and points out 
that already in the "Oegisdrecka," the earlier "Edda," which Wagner took as his 
model, Loki accuses Freya thus: "Thine own brother hast thou embraced before the 
gods." Marriage between brother and sister would thus appear to have been pro- 
scribed already at that time. The "Oegisdrecka," however, is the expression of a 
time when belief in the ancient myths was completely shattered; it is a truly 
Lucianian satire on the gods. If Loki, as Mephistopheles, makes such an accusation 
against Freya, it argues rather against Wagner. A few verses later, Loki also says- 
to Niordhr: "You begat (such) a son by your sister" (vidh systur thinni gaztu slikan 
mog). Now, Niordhr is not an Asa but a Vana, and says, in the Ynglinga Saga, 
that marriages between brothers and sisters are customary in Vanaland, which is 
not the case amongst the Asas. This would seem to indicate that the Vanas were 
older gods than the Asas. At any rate, Niordhr lived among the Asas as their equal, 
and the "Oegisdrecka" is thus rather a proof that intermarriage between brothers 
and sisters, at least \among the gods, aroused little revulsion at the time the Norwegian 
Sagas of the gods originated. If one wants to excuse Wagner, one would do better 
to cite Goethe instead of the Edda, for Goethe, in his Ballad of God and the 
Bayadere, makes a similar mistake regarding the religious surrender of women, 
which he likens far too closely to modern prostitution. {F. E.) 

32 



2. The Punaluan Family. If the first advance in organization was the 
exclusion of parents and children from mutual sexual relations, the sec- 
ond was the exclusion of brothers and sisters. In view of the greater 
similarity in the ages of the participants, this step forward was infinitely 
more important, but also more difficult, than the first. It was accomplished 
gradually, commencing most probably with the exclusion of natural 
brothers and sisters (i.e., on the maternal side) from sexual relations, 
at first in isolated cases, then gradually becoming the rule (in Hawaii 
exceptions to this rule still existed in the present century*) and finally 
ending with the prohibition of marriage even between collateral broth- 
ers and sisters, or, as we would call them, between first, second and 
third cousins. According to Morgan it "affords a good illustration of the 
operation of the principle of natural selection."** It is beyond question 
that the tribes among whom inbreeding was restricted by this advance 
were bound to develop more rapidly and fully than those among whom 
intermarriage between brothers and sisters remained the rule and custom. 
And how powerfully the effect of this advance was felt is proved by the 
institution of the gens, which arose directly from it, and travelled far 
beyond the original goal. The gens was the foundation of the social 
order of most, if not all, the barbarian peoples of the world, and in 
Greece and Rome we pass directly from it into civilization. 

Every primeval family had to split up after a couple of generations, 
at the latest. The original communistic household, which prevailed with- 
out exception until late into the middle stage of barbarism, determined 
a certain maximum size of the family community, varying according to 
circumstances, but more or less definite in each locality. As soon as the 
conception of the impropriety of sexual intercourse between the children 
of a common mother arose, it was bound to have a marked effect upon 
this division of the old and the foundation of new, communal, households 
(which, however, did not necessarily coincide with the family groups). 
One or more groups of sisters became the nucleus of one household, 
their natural brothers the nucleus of the other. In this or some similar 
way the form of the family which Morgan calls the punaluan family, 
developed out of the consanguine family. According to the Hawaiian 
custom, a number of sisters, either natural or remote (i. e., first, second 
or more distant cousins) were the common wives of their common hus- 
bands, from which relation, however, their brothers were excluded. These 
husbands no longer addressed one another as brothers — which indeed they 
no longer had to be — but as "punalua," i. e., intimate companion, comrade, 
as it were. In the same way, a group of natural or remote brothers held 



* I. e., nineteenth century. — Ed. Eng. ed. 
** Morgan, Ancient Society, p. 434.— Ed. Eng. ed. 

3—286 33 



in common a number of women, who were not their sisters, and these women 
addressed one another as "punalua." This is the classical form of family 
structure which later admitted of a series of variations, and the essential 
characteristic feature of which was: mutual community of husbands and 
wives within a definite family circle, from which, however, the brothers 
of the wives — first the natural brothers, and later those of more remote 
degrees also — }were excluded; the same applying conversely to the sisters 
of the husbands. 

This form of the family now furnishes us with the most complete 
accuracy the degrees of kinship as expressed in the American system. 
The children of my mother's sisters still remain her children, the chil- 
dren of my father's brothers being likewise his children, and all of them 
are my brothers and sisters; but the children of my mother's brothers are 
now her nephews and nieces, the children of my father's sisters are his 
nephews and nieces, and they all are my cousins. For while my mother's 
sisters' husbands still remain her husbands, and my father's brothers' wives 
likewise still remain his wives — by right, if not always in actual fact — 
the social proscription of sexual intercourse between brothers and sisters 
now divided the first cousins, hitherto indiscriminately regarded as broth- 
ers and sisters, into two classes; some remain (remote) brothers and 
sisters as before; the others, the children of brothers on the one hand 
and of sisters on the other, can no longer be brothers and sisters, can 
no longer have common parents whether father, mother, or both, and, 
therefore, the class of nephews, nieces, male and female cousins — which 
would have been senseless in the previous family system — becomes neces- 
sary for the first time. The American system of consanguinity, which 
appears to be utterly absurd in every family form based on some kind 
of individual marriage, is rationally explained and naturally justified, 
down to its minutest details, by the punaluan family. To the extent that 
this system of consanguinity was prevalent, to exactly the same extent, 
at least, must the punaluan family, or a form similar to it, have existed. 
This form of the family, proved actually to have existed in Hawaii, 
would probably have been demonstrable throughout Polynesia, had the 
pious missionaries — like the old-time Spanish monks in America — been 
able to perceive in these unchristian relations something more than mere 
"abomination."* 



* There can no longer be any doubt that the traces of indiscriminate sexual 
intercourse, his so-called "Sumpfzeugung" [marsh breeding] which Bachofen believes 
he has discovered, lead back to group marriage. "If Bachofen regards these punaluan 
marriages as 'lawless,' a man of that period would likewise regard most present- 
day marriages between near and distant cousins on the father's or the mother's side, 
as incestuous i. e., as marriages between consanguineous brothers and sisters." 
(Marx) (F. E.) 

34 



When Caesar tells us of the Britons, who at that time were in the 
middle stage of barbarism, that "by tens and by twelves they possessed 
their wives in common; and it was mostly brothers with brothers and 
parents with their children," this is best explained as group marriage. 
Barbarian mothers have not ten or twelve sons old enough to be able to 
keep wives in common, but the American system of consanguinity, which 
corresponds to the punaluan family, provides many brothers, since all a 
man's near and distant cousins are his brothers. The expression "parents 
with their children" may conceivably be a misunderstanding on Caesar's 
part; this system, however, does not absolutely exclude the presence of 
father and son, or mother and daughter, in the same marriage group, 
though it does exclude the presence of father and daughter, or mother 
and son. In the same way, this or a similar form of group marriage pro- 
vides the simplest explanation of the reports of Herodotus and other 
ancient writers, concerning community of wives among savage and bar- 
barian peoples. This also applies to the description of the Tikurs of Oudh 
(north of the Ganges) given by Watson and Kaye in their book The 
People of India: "They live together (i.e., sexually) almost indiscrimi- 
nately in large communities, and when two people are regarded as mar- 
ried, the tie is but nominal. 

In by far the majority of cases the institution of the gens seems to 
have originated directly out of the punaluan family. To be sure, the 
Australian class system also serves as a starting point for it; the Austra- 
lians have gentes; but they have not yet the punaluan family; they have 
only a cruder form of group marriage. 

In all forms of the group family it is uncertain who the father of 
a child is, but it is quite certain who the mother is. Although she calls 
all the children of the aggregate family her children and exercises the 
duties of a mother towards them, she, nevertheless, knows her natural 
children from the others. It is thus clear that, wherever group marriage 
exists, descent is only traceable on the maternal side, and thus the female 
line alone is recognized. This, in fact, is the case among all savage peo- 
ples and among those belonging to the lower stage of barbarism; and 
it is Bachofen's second great achievement to have been the first to discover 
this. He terms this exclusive recognition of lineage through the mother, 
and the inheritance relations that arose out of it in the course of 
time, "Mutterrecht" (mother-right). I retain this term for the sake of brev- 
ity. It is somewhat incorrect, however, for at this social stage, there is 
no such thing as statutory right. 

Now if we take from the punaluan family one of the two standard 
groups — namely, that consisting of a series of natural and remote sisters 
(i.e., those descendent from natural sisters in the first, second or more 



35 



remote degree), together with their children and their natural or remote 
brothers on their mother's side (who according to our premise are not 
their husbands), we obtain exactly that circle of persons who later ap- 
pear as members of a gens, in the original form of this institution. They 
have all a common ancestress, whose female descendants, generation by 
generation, are sisters by virtue of descent from her. These sisters' hus- 
bands, however, can no longer be their brothers, that is, cannot be des- 
cended from this ancestress, and, therefore, do not belong to the consan- 
guineous group, the later gens; but their children do belong to ihis group, 
since descent on the mother's side is alone decisive, because it alone is 
certain. Once the proscription of sexual intercourse between all brothers 
and sisters, including even the most remote collateral relations on the 
mother's side, becomes established, the above group is transformed into 
a gens — i. e., constitutes itself as a rigidly limited circle of blood relations 
in the female line, who are not allowed to marry one another; from now 
on it increasingly consolidates itself by other communal institutions of 
a social and religious character, and differentiates itself from the other 
gentes of the same tribe. We shall deal w T ith this in greater detail later. 
If, however, we find that the gens not only necessarily, but also obviously 
evolved out of the punaluan family, then it becomes safe to assume that 
this form of the family existed formerly among all peoples among whom 
gentile institutions are traceable — that is, nearly all barbarian and 
civilized peoples. 

At the time Morgan wrote his book our knowledge of group marriage 
\v T as still very limited. A little was known about the group marriages 
current among the Australians who were organized in classes, and, in ad- 
dition, Morgan, as early as 1871, published the information at his dis- 
posal concerning the Hawaiian punaluan family- On the one hand, the 
punaluan family furnished the complete explanation of the system 
of consanguinity prevalent among the American Indians — the system 
which w T as the starting point of all Morgan's investigations; on the other 
hand, it constituted a ready point of departure for the derivation of the 
matriarchal gens; and, finally, it represented a far higher stage of devel- 
opment than the Australian classes. It is, therefore, natural that Morgan 
should conceive the punaluan family as a stage of development necessar- 
ily preceding the pairing family, and assume that it was generally prev- 
alent in earlier times. Since then we have learned of a series of other 
forms of group marriage and now know that Morgan went too far in this 
respect. Nevertheless, in his punaluan family, he had the good fortune 
to stumble on the highest, the classical, form of group marriage, the 
form from which the transition to a higher stage is most easily explained. 

We are indebted to the English missionary Lorimer Fison for the 



36 



most essential contribution to our knowledge of group marriage, for he 
studied this form of the family for years, in its classical home, Austra- 
lia. He found the lowest stage of development among the Australian 
aborigines of Mount Gambier in South Australia. The whole tribe is here 
sub-divided into two great classes — Kroki and Kumite. Sexual intercourse 
between members within each of these classes is strictly proscribed; on 
the other hand, every man of one class is the born husband of every wo- 
man of the other class, and vice versa. Not individuals, but entire groups 
are married to one another; class marries class. And be it noted, no 
reservations are made here concerning difference of age, or special blood 
relationship, other than those determined by the division into two exoga- 
mous classes. A Kroki legitimately has every Kumite woman for his 
wife; since however, his own daughter by a Kumite woman is, according 
to mother-right, a Kumite, she is thereby the born wife of every Kroki, 
including her father. At all events, the class organization, as we know 
it, imposes no restriction. Hence, this organization either arose at a time 
when, despite all dim impulses to limit inbreeding, sexual intercourse 
between parents and children was not yet regarded with any particular 
horror, in which case the class system must have arisen directly out of 
a condition of promiscuous sexual intercourse; or intercourse between 
parents and children had already been proscribed by custom when the 
classes arose, in which case the present position points back to the con- 
sanguine family, and is the first advance beyond it. The latter assumption 
is the more probable. Cases of marital connections between parents and 
children have not, as far as I am aware, been reported from Australia; 
and the later form of exogamy, the matriarchal gens also, as a rule, tacitly 
presupposes the prohibition of such connections as something already 
existing at its establishment. 

Apart from Mount Gambier, in South Australia, the Jw/o-class system 
is likewise to be found along the River Darling, farther east, and in Queens- 
land, in the north-east, thus being very widespread. This system excludes 
only marriage between brothers and sisters, between the children of 
brothers and between the children of sisters on the mother's side, because 
these belong to the same class; on the other hand, the children of 
brother and sister are permitted to marry. A further step towards pre- 
venting inbreeding is to be found among the Kamilaroi, along the Darling 
River, in New South Wales, where the two original classes are divided 
into four, and each one of these four classes is likewise married bodily 
to another definite class. The first two classes are the born husbands and 
wives of each other; the children become members of the third or the 
fourth class according to whether the mother belongs to the first or the 
second class; and the children of the third and fourth classes, which are 



37 



likewise married to each other, belong again to the first and second classes. 
So that one generation always belongs to the first and second classes, 
the next belongs to the third and fourth, and the next again to the first 
and second. According to this system, the children of brothers and sisters 
(on the mother's side) may not become man and wife — their grand- 
children, however, are permitted to do so. This strangely complicated 
system is made even more intricate by the grafting on of matriarchal 
gentes, at any rate, later; but we cannot go into this here. We see, then, 
how the impulse towards the prevention of inbreeding asserts itself time 
and again, but in a groping, elemental way, without a clear conscious- 
ness of the goal. 

Group marriage, which in the case of Australia is still class marriage, 
the state of marriage of a w r hole class of men, often scattered over the 
whole breadth of the continent, with a similarly wudely distributed class 
of women — this group marriage, when observed more closely, is not quite 
so horrible as is imagined by the philistine fancy accustomed to the broth- 
el. On the contrary, long years passed before its existence was even 
suspected, and indeed, it has been again disputed, only quite recently. 
To the superficial observer it appears to be a kind of loose monogamy 
and, in places, polygamy, accompanied by occasional infidelity. One must 
spend years, as Fison and Howitt did, on the task of discovering the law 
that regulates these conditions of marriage — which in practice rather 
remind the average European of his own marriage customs — the law ac- 
cording to which an Australian aborigine, even when a stranger thousands 
of miles away from his home, among people whose very language he 
does not understand, nevertheless, quite often, in roaming from camp to 
camp, from tribe to tribe, finds women who are his without resistance 
and in perfect good faith; the law according to which the host who has 
several wives offers one of them to his guest for the night. Where the 
European can see only immorality and lawlessness, strict law actually 
reigns. The women belong to the stranger's marriage class, and are there- 
fore his born wives; the same customary law which assigns one to the 
other, prohibits, on pain of banishment, all intercourse outside the mar- 
riage classes that belong to each other. Even where women are abducted, 
which is frequently the case, and in some areas the rule, the class law 
is scrupulously observed. 

The abduction of women already reveals even here a trace of the 
transition to individual marriage — at least in the form of the "pairing 
marriage." After the young man has abducted, or eloped with the girl 
with the assistance of his friends, all of them have sexual intercourse 
with her one after the other, after which, however, she is regarded as 
the wife of the young man who initiated the abduction. And, conversely, 



38 



should the abducted woman run away from the man and be captured 
by another, she becomes the latter's wife, and the first man loses his 
privilege. Thus, exclusive relations, pairing for longer or shorter periods, 
and also polygamy, establish themselves alongside of and within the sys- 
tem of group marriage, which, in general, continues to exist; so that 
here also group marriage is gradually dying out, the only question being 
which will first disappear from the scene as a result of European in- 
fluence — group marriage, or the Australian aborigines who indulge in it. 

In any case, marriage in whole classes such as prevails in Australia, 
is a very low and primitive form of group marriage; whereas the puna- 
luan family is, as far as we know, its highest stage of development. The 
former would seem to be the stage corresponding to the social level of 
nomadic savages; while the latter presupposes relatively stable settlements 
of communistic communities and leads directly to the next and higher 
stage of development. Some intermediate stages will assuredly be found 
between these two; here an only just opened and barely trodden field 
of investigation lies before us. 

3. The Pairing Family. A certain pairing for longer or shorter pe- 
riods took place already under group marriage, or even earlier. Among 
his numerous wives, the man had a principal wife (one can scarcely yet 
call her his "favourite wife") and he was her principal husband, among 
others. This situation, in no small degree, contributed to the confusion 
among the missionaries, who saw in group marriage, now promiscuous 
community of wives, now wanton adultery. Such habitual pairing, how- 
ever, necessarily became more and more established as the gens developed 
and as the numbers of classes of "brothers" and "sisters" between 
which marriage was now impossible, increased. The impulse to prevent 
marriage between blood relations which arose in the gens drove things 
still further. Thus we find that among the Iroquois and most other Indian 
tribes in the lower stage of barbarism, marriage is prohibited between 
all relations recognized by their system, and these are of several hundred 
kinds. This growing complexity of marriage prohibitions rendered group 
marriages more and more impossible; they were supplanted by the pair- 
ing family. At this stage one man cohabits with one woman, with the 
reservation, however, that polygamy and occasional adultery remain men's 
privileges, even though the former is seldom practised for economic 
reasons ; at the same time, the strictest fidelity is demanded of the woman 
during the period of co-habitation, adultery on her part being cruelly 
punished. The marriage tie can, however, be easily dissolved on either 
side, and the children belong solely to the mother, as previously. 

In this ever widening exclusion of blood relatives from marriage, 
natural selection also continues to have its effect. In Morgan's words, 

39 



marriage between non-consanguineous gentes "created a more vigorous 
stock physically and mentally. . . . When two advancing tribes . . . are 
brought together and blended into one people ... the new skull and brain 
would widen and lengthen to the sum of the capabilities of both."* 
Tribes constituted according to gentes must, therefore, gain the upper hand 
over the more backward ones, or carry them along by force of their 
example. 

Thus, the evolution of the family in pre-historic times consists in 
the continual contraction of the circle — originally embracing the whole 
tribe — within which community marriage between the sexes prevailed. By 
the successive exclusion, first of closer, then of ever remoter relatives, 
and finally even of those merely related by marriage, every kind of 
group marriage is ultimately rendered practically impossible; and final- 
ly, there remains only the unit, the for the moment still loosely united 
couple, the molecule, with the dissolution of which marriage itself com- 
pletely ceases. This fact alone shows how little individual sex love, in 
the modern sense of the word, had to do with the rise of monogamy. 
The practice of all peoples in this stage affords still further proof of 
this. Whereas under previous forms of the family men were never in 
want of women but, on the contrary, had a surfeit of them, women now 
became scarce and were sought after. Consequently, with pairing marriage 
begins the abduction and purchase of women — widespread symptoms, but 
nothing more, of a much more deeply-rooted change that had set in. 
These symptoms, mere methods of obtaining women, McLennan, the pe- 
dantic Scot, nevertheless metamorphosed into special classes of families 
which he called "marriage by abduction" and "marriage by purchase." 
Among the American Indians, and also among other tribes (in the same 
stage), the arrangement of a marriage is by no means the affair of the 
two chief participants, who, indeed, are often not even consulted, but of 
their respective mothers. Two complete strangers are thus often betrothed 
and only learn of the conclusion of the deal when the marriage day 
approaches. Prior to the marriage, presents are made by the bridegroom 
to the gentile relatives of the bride (that is, to her relatives on her mother's 
side, not to the father or his relatives), these presents serving as purchase 
gifts for the ceded girl. The marriage may be dissolved at the pleasure 
of either of the two parties. Nevertheless, among many tribes, e. g., the 
Iroquois, public sentiment gradually developed against such separations ; 
when conflicts arise, the gentile relatives Ojf both parties intervene and 
attempt a reconciliation, and separation takes place only after such 
efforts prove fruitless, the children remaining with the mother, and each 
party being free to marry again. 



* Morgan, Ancient Society, p. 468.— Ed. Eng. ed. 
40 



The pairing family, itself too weak and unstable to make an inde- 
pendent household necessary, or even desirable, did not by any means 
dissolve the communistic household transmitted from earlier times. But 
the communistic household implies the supremacy of women in the house, 
just as the exclusive recognition of a natural mother, because of the 
impossibility of determining the natural father with certainty, signifies 
high esteem for the women, that is for the mothers. That woman was the 
slave of man at the commencement of society is one of the most absurd 
notions that have come down from eighteenth century enlightenment. 
Woman occupies not only a free but also a highly respected position 
among all savages and all barbarians of the lower and middle stages and 
sometimes even of the upper stage. Let Arthur Wright, missionary for many 
years among the Seneca Iroquois, testify what her place was in the pair- 
ing family: "As to their family system, when occupying the old long- 
houses [communistic households embracing several families] it is prob- 
able that some one clan [gens] predominated, the women taking in hus- 
bands from other clans [gentes]. . . . Usually the female portion ruled the 
house. . . . The stores were in common; but woe to the luckless husband 
or lover who was too shiftless to do his share of the providing. No matter 
how many children or whatever goods he might have in the house, he 
might at any time be ordered to pack up his blanket and budge; and 
after such orders it would not be healthful for him to attempt to disobey. 
The house would be too hot for him . . . and he must retreat to his own 
clan [gens] ; or, as was often done, go and start a new matrimonial 
alliance in some other. The women were the great power among the 
clans [gentes], as everywhere else. They did not hesitate, when occasion 
required, to knock off the horns, as it was technically called, from the 
head of a chief and send him back to the ranks of the warriors." The 
communistic household, in which most of the women or even all the wo- 
men belong to one and the same gens, while the men come from various 
other gentes, is the material foundation of that supremacy of women 
which was generally prevalent in the early times; and Bachofen's discov- 
ery of this constitutes the third great service he has rendered. I may 
add that the reports of travellers and missionaries about women among 
savages and barbarians being burdened with excessive toil in no way 
conflict with what has been said above. The division of labour between the 
two sexes is determined by causes entirely different from those that 
determine the status of women in society. Peoples, whose women have to 
work much harder than we would consider proper, often have far more 
real respect for women than our Europeans have for theirs. The social 
status of the lady of civilization, seemingly surrounded by homage and 
estranged from all real work, is infinitely lower than that of the hard- 



41 



working woman of barbarism, whose position among her people was 
that of a real lady I lady, ifrowa. Frau=mistress) and who was also such 
in character. 

Whether or not the pairing family has totally supplanted group mar- 
riage in America today must be decided by closer investigation among 
the North-Western and particularly among the South American peoples 
who are still in the higher stage of savagery. So very many instances of 
sexual freedom are reported with regard to these latter, that the complete 
supercession of the old group marriage can scarcely be assumed. At any 
rate, not all traces of it have yet disappeared. Among at least forty North 
American tribes, the man who marries the eldest sister in a family is 
entitled to all her sisters as wives as soon as they reach the requisite 
age — a survival of the common right of the men to a whole group of sis- 
ters. And Bancroft relates that the tribes of the Californian peninsula 
(in the upper stage of savagery) have certain festivities, during which 
several "tribes" congregate for the purpose of indiscriminate sexual in- 
tercourse. These are manifestly gentes for whom these festivities repre- 
sent dim memories of the times when the women of one gens had all 
the men of another for their common husbands and vice versa. The same 
custom still prevails in Australia. Among certain tribes it sometimes 
happens that the older men, the chiefs and sorcerer-priests, exploit the 
community of wives for their own ends and monopolize most of the wo- 
men for themselves; but they, in their turn, have to allow the old com- 
mon possession to be restored during certain feasts and great tribal gath- 
erings and permit their wives to enjoy themselves with the young men. 
Westermarck (pp. 23 and 29) adduces a whole series of examples of such 
periodical Saturnalian feasts during which the old free sexual intercourse 
comes into force again for a short period, as, e. g., among the Hos, the 
Santals, the Pun j as and Kotars of India, among some African tribes, etc. 
Curiously enough, Westermarck concludes from this that they are relics, 
not of group marriage, which he totally rejects, but of the mating sea- 
son common alike to primitive man and to other animals. 

We now come to Bachofen's fourth great discovery, that of the wide- 
spread transitional form from group marriage to pairing. What Bachofen 
construes as a penance for infringing the ancient commandments of the 
gods, the penance with which the woman buys her right to chastity, 
is in fact nothing more than a mystical expression of the sacrifice by 
means of which the woman purchases her redemption from the ancient 
community of husbands and acquires the right to give herself to one 
man only. This sacrifice takes the form of limited surrender. The Baby- 
lonian women had to surrender themselves once a year in the temple of 
Mylitta. Other Near Eastern peoples sent their young women for years 

42 



to the Temple of Anaitis, where they had to practice free love with 
favourites of their own choice before they were allowed to marry. Similar 
customs bearing a religious guise are common to nearly all Asiatic 
peoples between the Mediterranean and the Ganges. The redemption sac- 
rifice becomes gradually lighter in course of time, as Bachofen notes: 
"The annually repeated sacrifice yields place to the single performance; 
the hetaerism of the matrons is succeeded by that of the maidens, its prac- 
tice during marriage by practice before marriage, the indiscriminate sur- 
render to all by surrender to certain chosen persons" (Mutterrecht, p. 
xix). Among other peoples, the religious guise is absent; among some — 
the Thracians, Celts, etc., of antiquity, and many aboriginal inhabitants 
of India, the Malayan peoples, South Sea Islanders and many American 
Indians even to this day — the girls enjoy the greatest sexual freedom until 
their marriage. Particularly is this the case throughout almost the whole 
of South America, as anybody w r ho has penetrated a little into the interior 
can testify. Thus, Agassiz (A Journey in Brazil, Boston and New York, 
1886, p. 266) relates the following about a rich family of Indian descent: 
when he was introduced to the daughter and enquired after her father, 
who, he supposed, was the mother's husband, an officer on active ser- 
vice in the war against Paraguay, the mother answered smilingly: "Nao 
tern pai, he filha da fortuna" — she has no father, she is the daughter of 
chance. "It is the way the Indian or half-breed women have always spok- 
en of their illegitimate children, unconscious of any wrong doing or 
shame. So far is this from being an unusual case that . . . the opposite 
seems the exception. The children . . . often know only their mother, for 
all the care and responsibility fall upon her; but they have no knowl- 
edge of their father, nor does it ever seem to occur to the woman that 
she or her children have any claim upon him." What here appears to be 
so strange to the civilized man is simply the rule according to mother- 
right and group marriage. 

Among other peoples, again, the bridegroom's friends and relations, 
or the wedding guests, exercise their old traditional right to the bride 
at the wedding itself, and the bridegroom has his turn last of all; for 
instance, on the Balearic Islands and among the African Augilers of 
antiquity, and among the Bareas of Abyssinia even now. In the case of 
still other peoples, an official person — the chief of the tribe or of the gens, 
the Kazique, shaman, priest, prince or whatever his title — represents the 
community and exercises the right of first night with the bride. Despite 
all neo-romantic white-washing, this "jus primae noctis"* persists to 
this day as a relic of group marriage among most of the natives of the 



* Right of first night. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

43 



Alaska territory (Bancroft. Native Races, I. p. 81), among the Tahus in 
North Mexico (ibid., p. 584) and among other peoples; and it existed 
at least in the originally Celtic countries throughout the Middle Ages, 
where it was directly transmitted from group marriage, e. g., in Aragon. 
While the peasant in Castille was never a serf, in Aragon the most igno- 
minious serfdom prevailed until abolished by the decree issued by Fer- 
dinand the Catholic in 1486. This document states: "We pass judgment 
and declare that the aforementioned lords (sefiors — 'barons) . . . also shall 
not sleep the first night with the woman taken in wedlock by a peasant, 
nor on the wedding night after she has gone to bed, stride over the bed 
or over the woman as a sign of their authority; nor shall the aforemen- 
tioned lords avail themselves of the services of the sons or daughters of 
the peasant, with or without payment, against their will" (quoted in the 
Catalonian original by Sugenheim — Serfdom, Petersburg, 1861, p. 35). 

Bachofen is again absolutely right when he contends throughout that 
the transition from what he terms "hetaerism" or "Sumpfzeugung" to 
monogamy was brought about essentially by the women. The more the 
old traditional sexual relations lost their naive, primitive, jungle charac- 
ter, as a result of the development of the economic conditions of life, i. e., 
with the undermining of the old communistic social order, and the grow- 
ing density of the population, the more degrading and oppressive must 
they have appeared to the women; the more urgently must they have 
longed for the right to chastity, to temporary or permanent marriage with 
one man only, as a release. This advance could not have originated from 
the men. if only for the reason that they have never — not even to the 
present day — dreamed of renouncing the pleasures of actual group 
marriage. Only after the transition to pairing marriage had been effected 
by the women could the men introduce strict monogamy — for the women 
only, of course. 

The pairing family arose on the border-line between savagery and 
barbarism, mainly in the upper stage of savagery, and only here and 
there in the lower stage of barbarism. It is the form of the family 
characteristic of barbarism, in the same way as group marriage is char- 
acteristic of savagery and monogamy of civilization. For its further devel- 
opment to stable monogamy, factors different from those we have hitherto 
found operating were required. As a consequence of pairing, the group 
was already reduced to its last unit, its two-atom molecule — to one man 
and one woman. Natural selection had completed its work by constantly 
reducing the circle of community marriage; there was nothing more left 
for it to do in this direction. If no new social driving forces had come 
into operation, there would have been no reason why a new form of the 

44 



family should arise out of the pairing family. But these driving forces 
did commence to operate. 

We now leave America, the classical soil of the pairing family. There 
is no evidence to enable us to conclude that a higher form of the family 
developed there, or that strict monogamy existed in any part of it at any 
time before its discovery and conquest. It was otherwise in the Old World. 
Here the taming of domestic animals and the breeding of herds had 
developed a hitherto unsuspected source of wealth and created entirely 
new social relationships. Until the lower stage of barbarism, fixed wealth 
consisted almost entirely of the house, clothing, crude ornaments and 
the implements for procuring and preparing food, viz., boats, weapons 
and household utensils of the simplest kind. Food had to be won anew 
day by day. Now, with herds of horses, camels, donkeys, oxen, sheep, 
goats and pigs, the advancing pastoral peoples — the Aryans in the 
Indian land of the five rivers and the Ganges area, as well as in the 
then much more richly watered steppes of the Oxus and the Jaxartes, and 
the Semites on the Euphrates and the Tigris — acquired possessions demand- 
ing merely supervision and most superficial care in order to propagate 
in ever-increasing numbers and to yield the richest nutriment in milk 
and meat. All previous means of procuring food now sank into the back- 
ground. Hunting, once a necessity, now becomes a luxury. 

But to whom did this new wealth belong? Originally, undoubtedly to 
the gens. But private property in herds must have already developed at 
a very early stage. It is hard to say whether Father Abraham appeared 
to the author of the so-called First Book of Moses as the owner of his 
flocks by virtue of his own right as head of a family community, or by 
virtue of his status as actual hereditary chief of a gens. One thing, however, 
is certain, and that is that we must not regard him as a property-owner in 
the modern sense of the term. Equally certain is it that on the threshold of 
authenticated history we find that the herds are everywhere the separate 
property of the family chiefs, in exactly the same way as were the artistic 
products of barbarism: metal utensils, articles of luxury and, finally, 
human cattle — the slaves. 

For now slavery also was invented. The slave was useless to the bar- 
barian of the lower stage. It was for this reason that the American Indians, 
too, treated their vanquished foes quite differently from the way they 
treated them in the upper stage. The men were either killed or adopted 
as brothers in the tribe of the victors. The women were either taken in 
marriage or likewise adopted along with their surviving children. Human 
labour- power at this stage yielded no noticeable surplus over the cost of 
its maintenance. With the introduction of cattle-breeding, of the working 
up of metals, of weaving and, finally, of agriculture, this changed. Just 

45 



as the once so easily obtainable wives had now acquired an exchange 
value and were bought, so it happened with labour-power, especially after 
the herds had finally been converted into family possessions. The family 
did not increase as rapidly as the cattle. More people were required to 
tend them; the captives taken in war were just useful for this purpose, 
and, furthermore, they could breed like cattle. 

Such riches, once they had passed into the private possession of fami- 
lies and there rapidly multiplied, struck a powerful blow at the society 
founded on pairing marriage and the matriarchal gens. Pairing marriage 
had introduced a new element into the family. By the side of the natural 
mother it placed the authentic natural father — who was probably better 
authenticated than many a "father" of the present day. According to the 
division of labour then prevailing in the family, the procuring of food 
and the implements necessary thereto, and therefore, also, the ownership 
of the latter, fell to the man; he took them with him in case of separation, 
just as the woman retained the household goods. Thus, according to the 
custom of society at that time, the man was also the owner of the new 
sources of subsistence — the cattle — and later, of the new source of labour 
power — the slaves. According to the custom of the same society, however, 
his children could not inherit from him, for the position in this respect 
was as follows: 

According to mother-right, that is, as long as descent was reckoned 
solely through the female line, and according to the original custom of 
inheritance in the gens, it was the gentile relations that at first inherited 
from their deceased gentile comrade. The property had to remain 
wdthin the gens. At first, in view of the insignificance of the property in 
question, it may, in practice, have passed to the nearest gentile relatives — 
that is, to the blood relatives on the mother's side. The children of the 
deceased man, however, belonged not to his gens, but to that of their 
mother. In the beginning, they inherited from their mother, along with 
the rest of their mother's blood relations, and later, perhaps, had first 
claim upon her property; but they could not inherit from their father, 
because they did not belong to his gens, and his property had to remain 
in the latter. On the death of the herd owner, therefore, his herds passed, 
first of all, to his brothers and sisters and to his sisters' children, or to 
the descendants of his mother's sisters. His own children, however, were 
disinherited. 

Thus, as wealth increased, it, on the one hand, gave the man a more 
important status in the family than the woman, and, on the other hand, 
created a stimulus to utilize this strengthened position in order to over- 
throw the established order of inheritance in favour of his children. But 
this was impossible as long as descent according to mother-right prevailed. 

46 



This had, therefore, to be overthrown, and it was overthrown; and it was 
not so difficult to do this as it appears to us now. For this revolution — 
one of the most decisive ever experienced by mankind — need not have dis- 
turbed any single living member of a gens. All the members could remain 
what they were previously. The simple decision sufficed, that in future 
the descendants of the male members should remain in the gens, but that 
those of the females were to be excluded from the gens and transferred 
to that of their father. The reckoning of descent through the female line 
and the right of inheritance through the mother were hereby overthrown 
and male lineage and right of inheritance from the father instituted. As 
to how and when this revolution was effected among the civilized peoples, 
we know nothing. It falls entirely within prehistoric times. That it was 
actually effected is more than proved by the abundant traces of mother- 
right, collected especially by Bachofen. How easily it was accomplished 
can be seen from a number of Indian tribes, among whom it has only 
recently taken place and is still proceeding, partly under the influence of 
increasing wealth and changed methods of life (transplantation from the 
forests to the prairies), and partly under the moral influence of civili- 
zation and the missionaries. Of eight Missouri tribes, six have male and 
two still retain the female lineage and inheritance in the female line. 
Among the Shawnees, Miamis and Delawares it has become the custom 
to transfer the children to the father's gens by giving them one of the 
gentile names obtaining therein, in order that they may inherit from him. 
"Innate human casuistry to seek 'to change things by changing their 
names! And to find loopholes for breaking through tradition within 
tradition itself, wherever a direct interest provided a sufficient motive" 
(Marx). As a consequence, hopeless confusion arose; and matters could 
be straightened out, and partly were straightened out, by the transition 
to father-right. "This appears altogether to be Mie most natural transi- 
tion" (Marx). As for what the comparative lawyers have to tell us regard- 
ing the ways and means by which this transition was effected among the 
civilized peoples of the old world — mere hypotheses, of course — see 
M. Kovalevsky, Tableau des origines et de V evolution de la famille et de 
la propriete, Stockholm, 1890.* 

The overthrow of mother-right was the world historical defeat of the 
female sex. The man seized the reins in the house also, the woman was 
degraded, enslaved, the slave of the man's lust, a mere instrument for 
breeding children. This degrading position of women, especially marked 
among the Greeks of the Heroic and still more of 'the Classical Age, had 



* Outline of the Origin and Evolution of the Family and of Property. — Ed. 
Eng. ed. t { 

47 



become gradually embellished and dissembled and, in part, clothed in 
a milder form, but by no means abolished. 

The first effect of the now established supremacy of the men is shown 
in the intermediate form of the family which now emerges, the patriarchal 
family. lis chief attribute is not polygamy — of which more anon — but 
the "organization of a number of persons, bond and free, into a family 
under paternal power,"* the head of the family. In the Semitic form, this 
family chief lives in polygamy, the bondsmen have wife and children, 
and the purpose of the whole organization is the care of flocks and herds 
over a limited area. The essential features are the incorporation of ser- 
vile relations and the paternal power; the Roman family, accordingly, 
constitutes the perfected type of this form of the family. The word "fami- 
lia" did not originally signify the ideal of our modern philistine, which 
is a compound of sentimentality and domestic discord. Among the Ro- 
mans, in the beginning, it did not even refer to the married couple and 
their children, but to the slaves alone. "Famulus" means a household 
slave and "familia" signifies the totality of slaves belonging to one indi- 
vidual. Even in the time of Gaius the "familia," id est patrimonium (i. e., 
inheritance) was bequeathed by will. The expression was invented by the 
Romans to describe a new social organism, the head of which had under 
him wife and children and a number of slaves, under Roman paternal 
power, with the power of life or death over them all. "The term, there- 
fore, is no older than the iron-clad family system of the Latin tribes, 
which came in after field agriculture and after legalized servitude, as 
well as after the separation of the Greeks and Latins."** To which Marx 
adds: "The modern family contains in embryo not only slavery (servitus) 
but serfdom also, since from the very beginning it is connected with 
agricultural service. It contains within itself in miniature all the contra- 
dictions which later develop on a wide scale within society and its state." 

Such a form of the family shows the transition of the pairing family 
to monogamy. In order to guarantee the fidelity of the wife, that is, the 
paternity of the children, the woman is placed absolutely in the man's 
power; if he kills her, he is but exercising his right. 

With the patriarchal family we enter the field of written history and, 
therewith, a field in which the science of comparative law can render us 
important assistance. And in fact it has here provided us with an impor- 
tant advance. We are indebted to Maxim Kovalevsky (Tableau, etc., de la 
famille et de la firopriete, Stockholm, 1890, pp. 60-100) for the proof 
that the patriarchal house community, such as we still find to-day among 
the Serbs and the Bulgarians under the designations of Zadruga (meaning 

* Morgan, Ancient Society, p. 474. — Ed. Eng. ed. 
** Ibid., p. 478.— Ed. Eng. ed. 

48 



something like bond of friendship) or Bratstvo (brotherhood) and among 
the Oriental peoples in a modified form, constituted the transition stage 
between the matriarchal family which evolved out of group marriage and 
the individual family known to the modern world. This appears to be 
proved at least as far as the civilized peoples of the old w r orld, the Aryans 
and Semites, are concerned. 

The South Slavonic Zadruga provides the best existing example of 
such a family community. It embraces several generations of the descen- 
dants of one father and their wives, who all live together in one house, 
till their fields in common, feed and clothe themselves from the common 
store and communally own all surplus products. The community is under 
the supreme management of the master of the house (domachin), who 
represents it in external affairs, may dispose of smaller objects, and man- 
ages the finances, being responsible for the latter as well as for the regu- 
lar conduct of business. He is elected and does not by any means need 
to be the eldest. The women and their work are under the direction of 
the mistress of the house (domachitsa), who is usually the domachin's 
wife. In the choice of husbands for the young women she has an impor- 
tant, often the decisive voice. Supreme power, however, is vested in the 
Family Council, the assembly of all adult members, both women and 
men. To this assembly, the master of the house renders an account of his 
trusteeship; it makes all the important decisions, exercises jurisdiction 
over the members, decides on purchases and sales of any importance, 
specially of landed property, etc. 

It was only about ten years ago* that the existence of such family 
communities in Russia also was proved; they are now generally recog- 
nized as being just as firmly rooted in the popular customs of the Rus- 
sians as the obshchina, or village community. They figure in the most 
ancient Russian code — the Pravda of Yaroslav — under the same name 
(vervj) as in the Dalmatian Laws, and references to them may be found 
also in Polish and Czech historical sources. 

According to Heussler (1 nstitutionen des deutschen Rechts),** the 
economic unit among the Germans also was not originally the individual 
family in the modern sense, but the "house community" consisting of 
several generations or individual families, and often enough including 
bondsmen. The Roman family, too, has been traced back to this type, and 
in consequence the absolute power of the head of the house, as also the 
lack of rights of the remaining members of the family in relation to him, 
has recently been strongly contested. Similar family communities are 
likewise supposed to have existed among the Celts in Ireland; in France 



* I. e., in the eighties of the last century. — Ed. Eng. ed. 
** Institutions of German Law. — Ed. Eng. ed. 



4— 23G 



49 



they continued to exist in Nivernais under the name of parconneries right 
up to the French Revolution, while in Franche Comte they are not quite 
extinct even today.* In the district of Louhans (Saone et Loire) may be 
seen large peasant houses with a lofty communal central hall reaching 
up to the roof, surrounded by sleeping-rooms, to which access is had by 
short staircases of from six to eight steps, and in which dwell several 
generations of the same family. 

In India, the household community with common tillage of the soil 
was mentioned even by Nearchos in ; the time of Alexander the Great, and 
exists to this day in the same area, in the Panjab and the entire North- 
Western part of the country. Kovalevsky himself was able to testify to 
its existence in the Caucasus. It still exists in Algeria among the Kabyles. 
It is said to have existed even in America; attempts are being made to 
identify it with the calpulli in ancient Mexico, described by Zurita; Cunow, 
on the other hand, has proved fairly clearly (in the journal Ausland, 
1890, Nos. 42-44) that a kind of mark constitution existed in Peru 
(where, peculiarly enough, the mark was called marca) up to the time 
of the Conquest, with periodical allotment of the cultivated land, that is, 
individual tillage. 

At any rate, the patriarchal household community with common land 
ownership and common tillage now assumes quite another significance 
than hitherto. We can no longer doubt the important role which it played 
among the civilized and many other peoples of the ancient world as a 
transition form between the matriarchal and the monogamous family. 
We shall return later on to the further conclusion drawn by Kovalevsky, 
namely, that it was likewise the transition stage out of which developed 
the village, or mark, community with individual cultivation and at first 
periodical, then permanent allotment of arable and pasture lands. 

As regards family life within these household communities, it should 
be noted that in Russia, at least, the head of the house is alleged to have 
abused his position considerably as far as the younger women, particu- 
larly his daughters-in-law, w r ere concerned, and to have very often con- 
verted them into a harem; these conditions are rather eloquently reflected 
in the Russian folk songs. 

A few words more about polygamy and polyandry before we deal 
with monogamy, which developed rapidly, following the overthrow of 
mother-right. Both these marriage forms can only be exceptions, histori- 
cal luxury products, so to speak, unless they appeared side by side in 
one and the same country, which, as is well known, is not the case. As, 
however, the men, excluded from polygamy, could not console themselves 



* Engels last revised the text in 1891.— Ed. Eng. ed. 

50 



with the women left over from polyandry, the numerical strength of men 
and women (without regard to social institutions) having been fairly 
equal hitherto, it is evident that neither one nor the other form could 
rise to general prevalence. Actually, polygamy on the part of one man 
was clearly a product of slavery and limited to a few exceptional cases. 
In the Semitic patriarchal family, only the patriarch himself and, at most, 
a couple of his sons lived in polygamy; the others had to be content with 
one wife each. It remains the same today throughout the entire Orient. 
Polygamy is a privilege of the rich and the grandees, and is recruited 
chiefly by the purchase of female slaves; the mass of the people live in 
monogamy. Just such an exception is provided by polyandry in India 
and Tibet, the certainly no less interesting origin of which from group 
marriage requires closer investigation. In its practice, at any rate, it 
appears to be much more accommodating than the jealous harem estab- 
lishments of the Mohammedans. At least, among the Nairs in India, the 
men, in groups of three, four or more, have, to be sure, one wife in 
common; but each of them can simultaneously have a second wife in 
common with three or more other men, and, in the same way, a >third, 
a fourth and so on. It is a wonder that McLennan did not discover a new 
class — that of club marriage — in these marriage clubs, in which mem- 
bership of several at a time was open to the men, and which he himself 
described. This marriage club business, however, is by no means real 
polyandry; on the contrary, as has been noted by Giraud-Teulon, it was 
a specialized form of group marriage, the men living in polygamy, the 
women in polyandry. 

4. The Monogamous Family. As already indicated, this arises out of 
the pairing family in the transition period between the middle and upper 
stages of barbarism, its final victory being one of the signs of the begin- 
ning of civilization. It is based on the supremacy of the man; its express 
aim is the begetting of children of undisputed paternity, this paternity 
being required in order that these children may in due time inherit their 
father's wealth as his natural heirs. The monogamous family differs from 
pairing marriage in the far greater rigidity of the marriage tie, which can 
now no longer be dissolved at the pleasure of either party. Now, as a 
rule, only the man can dissolve it and cast off his wife. The right of 
conjugal infidelity remains his even now, sanctioned, at least, by custom 
(the Code Napoleon expressly concedes this right to the husband as long 
as he does not bring his concubine into the conjugal home), and exer- 
cised more and more with the growing development of society. Should 
the wife recall the ancient sexual practice and desire to revive it, she is 
punished more severely than ever before. 

We are confronted with this new form of the family in all its severity 

4* 51 



among the Greeks. While, as Marx observes, the position of the goddesses 
in mythology represents an earlier period, when women still occupied 
a freer and more respected place, in the Heroic Age we already find 
women degraded owing to the domination of the man and the competition 
of female slaves. One may read in the Odyssey how Telemachus reproves 
his mother and enjoins silence upon her. In Homer the young female 
captives become the objects of the sensual lust of the victors; the mili- 
tary chiefs, one after the other, according to rank, choose the most beau- 
tiful ones for themselves. The whole of the Iliad, as is well known, re- 
volves around the quarrel between Achilles and Agamemnon over such a 
female slave. In connection with each Homeric hero of importance men- 
tion is made of a captive maiden, with whom he shares tent and bed. These 
maidens are also taken back to the country and the conjugal homes of the 
victors, as w T as Cassandra by Agamemnon in Aeschylus. Sons born of 
these slaves receive a small share of their father's estate and are regard- 
ed as free men. Teukros w T as such an illegitimate son of Telamon and 
was permitted to adopt his father's name. The married woman is expected 
to tolerate all this, but to maintain strict chastity and conjugal fidelity 
herself. True, in the Heroic Age the Greek wife is more respected than in 
the period of civilization; for the husband, however, she is, in reality, 
merely the mother of his legitimate heirs, his chief housekeeper, and the 
superintendent of the female slaves, whom he may make, and does make, 
his concubines at will. It is the existence of slavery side by side with 
monogamy, the existence of beautiful young slaves who belong body and 
soul to the man, that from the very commencement stamped on monog- 
amy its specific character as monogamy for the woman only, but not for 
the man. And it retains this character to this day. 

As regards the Greeks of later times, we must differentiate between the 
Dorians and the Ionians. The former, of whom Sparta was the classical 
example, had in many respects more ancient marriage relationships than 
even Homer indicates. In Sparta we find a form of pairing marriage — 
modified by the state in accordance with the conceptions there prevail- 
ing — which still retains several vestiges of group marriage. Childless 
marriages w T ere dissolved; King Anaxandridas (about 650 B. C.) took 
another wife in addition to his first childless one and maintained two 
households; King Ariston of the same period added a third to two pre- 
vious wives, who w T ere barren, one of whom he, however, dismissed. On 
the other hand, several brothers could have a wife in common. A person 
having a preference for his friend's wife could share her with him; and 
it was regarded as proper to place the wife at the disposal of a lusty "stal- 
lion," as Bismarck would say, even when this person was not a citizen. 
A passage in Plutarch, where a Spartan woman sends the lover who is 



52 



pursuing her with his attentions to interview her husband, would indicate, 
according to Schomann, a still greater sexual freedom. Real adultery, 
the infidelity of the wife behind the back of her husband, was thus unheard 
of. On the other hand, domestic slavery was unknown in Sparta, at least 
in its heyday; the helot serfs lived segregated on the estates and thus 
there was less temptation for the Spartans to have intercourse with their 
women. That in all these circumstances, the women of Sparta enjoyed 
a very much more respected position than all other Greek women, was 
quite natural. The Spartan women and the elite of the Athenian hetaerae 
are the only Greek women of whom the Ancients speak with respect, and 
whose remarks they consider as being worthy of record. 

Among the Ionians — of whom Athens is characteristic — things were 
quite different. Young women learned spinning, weaving and sewing, at 
best, a little reading and writing. They were practically kept in seclusion 
and consorted only with other women. The women's quarter was a sepa- 
rate and distinct part of the house, on the upper floor, or in the rear 
building, not easily accessible to men, particularly strangers; to this the 
women retired when men visitors came. The women did not go out unless 
accompanied by a female slave; at home they were jealously guarded; 
Aristophanes speaks of Molossian hounds kept to frighten off adulterers; 
while in the Asiatic towns, at least, eunuchs were maintained to keep 
guard over the women; they were manufactured for the trade in Chios 
as early as Herodotus' day, and according to Wachsmuth, not merely for 
the barbarians. In Euripides, the wife is described as oikurema, a thing 
for housekeeping (the word is in the neuter gender), and apart from the 
business of bearing children, she was nothing more to the Athenian than 
the chief housemaid. The husband had his gymnastic exercises, his public 
affairs, from which the wife was excluded; in addition, he often had 
female slaves at his disposal and, in the heyday of Athens, extensive pros- 
titution, which was, at least, countenanced by the state. It was precisely 
on the basis of this prostitution that the few outstanding Greek women 
developed, who by their esprit and artistic taste towered as much above the 
general level of ancient womanhood as the Spartan women did by virtue 
of their character. That one had first to become a hetaera in order to 
become a woman is the strongest indictment of the Athenian family. 

In the course of time, this Athenian family became the model upon 
which not only the rest of the Ionians, but also all the Greeks of the 
mainland and of the colonies increasingly moulded their domestic rela- 
tionships. But despite all seclusion and control the Greek women found 
opportunities often enough for deceiving their husbands. The latter, who 
Would have been ashamed to disclose any love for their own wives, amused 
themselves with hetaerae in all kinds of amours. But the degradation of 

53 



the women recoiled on the men themselves and degraded them too. until 
they sank into the perversion of boy-love, degrading both themselves 
and their gods by the myth of Ganymede. 

This was the origin of monogamy, as far as we can trace it among the 
most civilized and highly developed people of antiquity. It was not in 
any way the fruit of individual sexual love, with which it had absolutely 
nothing in common, for the marriages remained marriages of convenience, 
as previously. It w T as the first form of the family based, not on natural, 
but on economic conditions, namely, on the victory of private property over 
primitive, natural, common ownership. The rule of the man in the family, 
the breeding of children who could only be his, destined to be the heirs 
of his wealth, these alone were frankly avowed by the Greeks as the 
exclusive aims of individual marriage. For the rest, it was a burden, a 
duty to the gods, to the state and to their ancestors, which just had to 
be fulfilled. In Athens the law made not only marriage compulsory, but 
also the fulfilment by the man of a minimum of the so-called conjugal 
duties. 

Thus, monogamy does not by any means make its appearance in 
. history as the reconciliation of man and woman, still less as the highest 
form of such a reconciliation. On the contrary, it appears as the subjec- 
tion of one sex by the other, as the proclamation of a conflict between the 
sexes, entirely unknown in prehistoric times. In an old unpublished man- 
uscript written by Marx and myself in 1846, I find the following: — "The 
first division of labour is that between man and woman for child-breed- 
ing."* And today I can add: the first class antagonism which appears 
in history coincides with the development of the antagonism between man 
and woman in individual marriage, and the first class oppression with 
that of the female sex by the male. Individual marriage was a great histor- 
ical advance, but at the same time it inaugurated, along with slavery and 
private wealth, that epoch, lasting until today, in which every advance 
is likewise a relative regression, in which the well-being and development 
of some are attained by the misery and repression of others. It is the 
cell of civilized society, in which we can already study the nature of the 
antagonisms and contradictions which develop fully in the latter. 

The old relative freedom of sexual intercourse by no means disap- 
peared w r ith the victory of the pairing family, or even of individual mar- 
riage. "The old conjugal system, now reduced to narrower limits by the 
gradual disappearance of the punaluan groups, still environed the advanc- 
ing family, which it was to follow to the verge of civilization. ... It finally 



* The reference here is to the Deutsche Ideologic {German Ideology) written 
by Marx and Engels in Brussels in 1845-46, but first published eighty-six year? 
later by the Marx-En gels-Lenin Institute in Moscow. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

54 



disappeared in the new form of hetaerism which still follows mankind in 
civilization as a dark shadow upon the family."* By hetaerism Morgan 
means that extra-marital sexual intercourse between men and unmarried 
women which exists alongside of monogamy, and, as is well known, has 
flourished in the most diverse forms during the whole period of civiliza- 
tion and has steadily developed into open prostitution. This hetaerism is 
directly traceable to group marriage, to the sacrificial sexual surrender 
of the women, whereby they purchased their right to chastity. The surren- 
der for money was at first a religious act, taking place in the temple of 
the Goddess of Love, and the money originally flowed into the coffers 
of the temple. The Hierodules of Anaitis in Armenia, of Aphrodite in 
Corinth, as well as the religious dancing girls attached to the temples in 
India — the so-called bayaderes (the word is a corruption of the Portu- 
guese bailadeira or danseuse) were the first prostitutes. This sexual sur- 
render, originally obligatory for all women, was later practised by these 
priestesses alone on behalf of all the other women. Hetaerism among other 
peoples grows out of the sexual freedom permitted to girls before mar- 
riage — likewise a survival of group marriage, only transmitted to us by 
another route. With the rise of property differentiation — that is, as far 
back as the upper stage of barbarism — wage-labour appears sporadically 
alongside of slave labour; and simultaneously, as its necessary corollary, 
the professional prostitution of free women appears side by side with 
the forced surrender of the female slave. Thus, the heritage bequeathed 
to civilization by group marriage is double-sided, just as everything engen- 
dered by civilization is double-sided, double-tongued, contradictory and 
inherently antagonistic : on the one hand, monogamy, on the other, hetae- 
rism, including its most extreme form, prostitution. Hetaerism is as much 
a social institution as any other, and is a continuation of the old sexual 
freedom — in favour of the men. Although, in reality, it is not only tole- 
rated, but even practised with gusto, particularly by the ruling classes, it 
is denounced in words. This denunciation, however, by no means applies 
to the men who indulge in it, it applies only to the women; they are ostra- 
cized and cast out in order to proclaim once again the absolute domina- 
tion of the male over the female sex as the fundamental social law. 

A second contradiction, however, is hereby developed within monog- 
amy itself. By the side of the husband, whose life is made more agree- 
able by hetaerism, stands the neglected wife. And it is just as impossible 
to ihave one side of a contradiction without the other as it is to retain 
the whole of an apple in one's hand after half has been eaten. Nevertheless, 
the men appear to have thought differently, until their wives taught them 



Morgan, Ancient Society, p. 511. — Ed. Eng ed. 

55 



to know better. Two permanent social figure?, previously unknown, appear 
on the scene along with monogamy — the wife's paramour and the cuckold. 
The men had gained the victory over the women, but the act of crowning 
the victor was magnanimously undertaken by the vanquished. Adulterv — 
proscribed, severely penalized, but irrepressible — became an unavoidable 
social institution alongside of monogamy and hetaerism. The assured 
paternity of children was now. as before, based, at best, on moral convic- 
tion: and in order to solve the insoluble contradiction. Article 312 of 
the Code Xapoleon decreed: "Uenjant concu pendant le mariage a pour 
pere le man." that is. that the child conceived during marriage has for its 
father the husband. This is the final outcome of three thousand years of 
monogamy. 

Thus, in the monogamous family, in all those cases that faithfully 
reflect its historical origin and that clearly bring out the sharp conflict 
between man and woman resulting from the exclusive domination of the 
male, we have a picture in miniature of the very antagonisms and contra- 
dictions in which society, split up into clashes since the commencement 
of civilization, moves, without being able to dissolve and overcome them. 
Naturally. I refer here only to those cases of monogamy, where matrimo- 
nial life really takes its course according to the rules governing the orig- 
inal character of the whole institution, but where the wife rebels against 
the domination of the husband. That this is not the case with all marri- 
ages no one knows better than the German philistine. who is no more 
capable of ruling in the home than in the state, and whose wife, therefore, 
with full justification, wears the trousers of which lie is unworthy. But 
in consolation he imagines himself to be far superior to his French compan- 
ion in misfortune, who, more often than he. fares far worse. 

The monogamous family, however, did not by any means appear 
everywhere and always in the classically harsh form which it assumed 
among the Greeks. Among the Romans, who as future world conquerors 
took a longer, if less refined, view than the Greeks, woman was more free 
and respected. The Roman believed the conjugal fidelity of his wife 
to be adequately safeguarded by his power of life and death over her. 
Besides, the wife, just as well as the husband, could dissolve the marriage 
voluntarily. But the greatest advance in the development of monogamy 
definitely occurred with the entry of the Germans into history, because, 
probably owing to their poverty, monogamy does not yet appear to have 
completely evolved among them out of pairing marriage. This we con- 
clude from three circumstances mentioned by Tacitus. Firstly, despite 
great reverence for marriage — "each man was contented with a single 
wife, and the women lived fenced around with chastity** — polygamy exi-ted 
for men of rank and the tribal chiefs, a situation similar to that of the 



56 



Americans among whom pairing marriage prevailed. Secondly, the transi- 
tion from mother-right to father-right could only have been accomplished 
a short time previously, for the mother's brother — the closest male gentile 
relative according to mother-right — was still regarded as being an almost 
closer relative than one's own father, which likewise corresponds to the 
standpoint of the American Indians, among whom Marx found the key 
to the understanding of our own pre-historic past, as he often used to say. 
And thirdly, women among the Germans were highly respected and were 
influential in public affairs also — which directly conflicts with the domina- 
tion of the male, characteristic of monogamy. Nearly all these are points 
on which the Germans are in accord with the Spartans, among whom, 
likewise, as we have already seen, pairing marriage had not completely 
disappeared. Thus, in this connection also, an entirely new element acquired 
world supremacy with the emergence of the Germans. The new monogamy 
which now developed out of the mingling of races on the ruins of the 
Roman w r orld, clothed the domination of men in milder forms and per- 
mitted women to occupy, at least to all external appearances, a far freer 
and more respected position than classical antiquity had ever known. 
This, for the first time, created the possibility for the greatest moral 
advance which we owe to monogamy — a development taking place within 
it, parallel with it, or in opposition to it, as the case might be, viz., modern 
individual sex-love, previously unknown to the whole world. 

This advance, however, definitely arose out of the fact that the Ger- 
mans still lived in the pairing family, and, as far as possible, grafted the 
position of woman corresponding thereto on to monogamy. It by no 
means arose as a result of the legendary, wonderful, moral purity of tem- 
perament of the Germans, which was limited to the fact that, in practice, 
the pairing family did not reveal the same glaring moral antagonisms as 
monogamy. On the contrary, the Germans, in their wanderings, particularly 
south-east, to the nomads of the steppes on the Black Sea, suffered consider- 
able moral degeneration and, apart from their horsemanship, acquired 
serious unnatural vices from them. This is proved explicitly by Ammia- 
nus about the Taifalli, and by Procopius about the Heruli. 

Although monogamy was the only known form of the family out of 
which modern sexual love could develop, it does not follow that this 
love developed within it exclusively, or even predominantly, as the mutual 
love of man and wife. The whole nature of strict individual marriage 
under male domination ruled this out. Among all historically active classes, 
i.e., among all ruling classes, matrimony remained what it had been 
since pairing marriage — a matter of convenience arranged by the parents. 
And the first form of sexual love that historically emerges as a passion, 
and as a passion affecting any person (at least of the ruling classes), 

57 



as the highest form of llie sexual impulse — which is precisely its speci- 
fic feature — this, its first form, viz., the chivalrous love of the Middle 
Ages, was by no means conjugal love. On the contrary, in its classical 
form, among the Provencals, it steers under full sail towards adultery, the 
praises of which are sung by their poets. The "Albas" (Songs of the 
Dawn) are the flower of Provengal love poetry. They describe in glowing 
colours how the knight lies with his love — the wife of another — while 
the watchman stands guard outside, calling him at the first faint streaks 
of dawn (alba) so that he may escape unobserved. The parting scene then 
constitutes the climax. The Northern French, as well as the worthy Ger- 
mans, likewise adopted this style of poetry, along with chivalrous love, 
which corresponded to it; and on this same suggestive theme our own 
old Wolfram von Eschenbach has left us three exquisite songs of the 
dawn, which I prefer to his three long heroic poems. 

Bourgeois marriage of our own times is of two kinds. In Catholic 
countries the parents still provide a suitable wife for their young bour- 
geois son, and the consequence is naturally the fullest unfolding of the 
contradiction inherent in monogamy — flourishing hetaerism on the part 
of the husband, and flourishing adultery on the part of the wife. The 
Catholic Church doubtlessly abolished divorce only because it was con- 
vinced that for adultery, as for death, there is no cure whatsoever. In 
Protestant countries, on the other hand, it is the rule that the bourgeois son 
is allowed to seek a wife for himself from his own class, more or less 
freely. Consequently, marriage can be based on a certain degree of love 
w r hich. for decency's sake, is always assumed, in accordance with Prot- 
estant hypocrisy. In this case, hetaerism on the part of the man is less 
actively pursued, and adultery on the woman's part is not so much the 
rule. Since, in every kind of marriage, however, people remain what they 
were before they married, and since the citizens of Protestant countries 
are mostly philistines, this Protestant monogamy leads, if we take the 
average of the very best cases, to a wedded life of leaden boredom, 
which is described as domestic bliss. The best mirror of these two ways 
of marriage is the novel; the French novel for the Catholic style, and 
the German novel for the Protestant. In both cases "he gets it"; in the 
German novel the young man gets the girl; in the French, the husband 
gets the cuckold's horns. Which of the two is in the worse plight is not 
always easy to make out. For the dullness of the German novel excites 
the same horror in the French bourgeois as the "immorality" of the French 
novel excites in the German philistine, although lately, since "Berlin is 
becoming a world city," the German novel has begun to deal a little less 
timidly with hetaerism and adultery, long known to exist there. 

In both cases, however, marriage is determined by the class position of 

58 



the participants, and to that extent, always remains marriage of con- 
venience. In both cases, this marriage of convenience often enough turns 
into the crassest prostitution — sometimes on both sides, but much more 
generally on the part of the wife, who differs from the ordinary courtesan 
only in that she does not hire out her body like a wage worker on piece- 
work, but sells it into slavery once and for all. Fourier's words hold good 
for all marriages of convenience: "Just as in grammar two negatives make 
a positive, so in the morals of marriage, two prostitutions make one vir- 
tue." Sexual love in the relations of husband and wife is and can become 
the rule only among the oppressed classes, that is, at the present day, 
among the proletariat, no matter whether this relationship is officially 
sanctioned or not. But here, all the foundations of classical monogamy are 
removed. Here, there is a complete absence of all property, for the safe- 
guarding and inheritance of which monogamy and male domination were 
indeed established. Therefore, there is no stimulus whatever here to assert 
male domination. What is more, the means, too, are absent ; bourgeois law r , 
which protects this domination, exists only for the propertied classes and 
their dealings with the proletarians. It costs money, and therefore, owing 
to the worker's poverty, has no validity in his attitude towards his wife. 
Personal and social relations of quite a different sort are the decisive fac- 
tors here. And since, in particular, large-scale industry has transferred 
the woman from the house to the labour market and the factory, and 
makes her, often enough, the breadwinner of the family, the last remnants 
of male domination in the proletarian home have lost all foundation — 
except, perhaps, for a survival of the brutality towards women which 
gained ground with the establishment of monogamy. Thus, the proletarian 
family is no longer monogamous in the strict sense, even in cases of the 
most passionate love and strictest fidelity of the two parties, and despite 
all spiritual and worldly benedictions which the marriage may have re- 
ceived. The two eternal adjuncts of monogamy — hetaerism and adultery — 
therefore, play an almost negligible role here; the woman has regained, 
in fact, the right of separation, and when the man and woman cannot agree 
they prefer to part. In short, proletarian marriage is monogamous in 
the etymological sense of the word, hut by no means in the historical 
sense. 

Our jurists, to be sure, hold that the progress of legislation to an 
increasing degree removes all cause for complaint on the part of the 
woman. Modern civilized systems of law are recognizing more and more, 
firstly, that, in order to be effective, marriage must be an agreement volun- 
tarily entered into by both parties; and secondly, that during marriage 
also, both parties must be on an equal footing in respect to rights and 

59 



obligations. If. however, these two demands were consistently carried into 
effect, women would have all that they could wish for. 

This typical lawyer's reasoning is exactly the same as that with which 
the radical republican bourgeois dismisses the proletarian. The labour 
contract is supposed to be voluntarily entered into by both parties. But 
it is taken to be voluntarily entered into as soon as the law has put both 
parties on an equal footing on paper. The power given to one party by its 
different class position, the pressure it exercises on the other — the real 
economic position of both — all this is no concern of the law. And both 
parties, again, are supposed to have equal rights for the duration of the 
labour contract, unless one or the other of the parties expressly renounces 
them. That the concrete economic situation compels the worker to forego 
even the slightest semblance of equal rights — this again is something the 
law cannot help. 

As far as marriage is concerned, even the most progressive law is 
fully satisfied as soon as the parties formally register their voluntary wish 
to get married. What happens behind the legal curtains, where real life is 
enacted, how this voluntary agreement is arrived at — about these, the 
law and the jurist cannot bother. And yet the simplest comparison of 
laws should serve to show the jurist what this voluntary agreement really 
is. In countries where the children are legally assured of a rightful share 
of their parents' property and thus cannot be disinherited — in Germany, 
and the countries under French law. etc. — the children must obtain their 
parents' consent in the question of marriage. In countries under English 
law, where parental consent to marriage is not legally requisite, the parents 
have full testatory freedom over their property and can, if they so desire, 
disinherit their children. It is clear, therefore, that despite this, or rather 
just because of this, among those classes which have something to inherit, 
freedom to marry is not one whit greater in England and America than in 
France or Germany. 

The position is no better with regard to the juridical equality of man 
and woman in marriage. The inequality of the two before the law, which 
is a legacy of previous social conditions, is not the cause, but the effect, 
of the economic oppression of women. In the old communistic household, 
which embraced numerous couples and their children, the administration 
of the household, entrusted to the women, was just as much a public func- 
tion, a socially necessary industry, as the providing of food by the men. 
This situation changed with the patriarchal family, and even more with 
the monogamous individual family. The administration of the household 
lost its public character. It was no longer the concern of society. It became 
a private service. The wife became the first domestic servant, pushed out 
of participation in social production. Only modern large-scale industry 

60 



again threw open to her — and only to the proletarian woman at that — the 
avenue to social production; but in such a way that, when she fulfils her 
duties in the private service of her family, she remains excluded from 
public production and cannot earn anything; and when she wishes to 
take part in public industry and earn her living independently, she is not 
in a position to fulfil her family duties. What applies to the woman in the 
factory applies also to women in all 'spheres, right up to medicine and 
law. The modern individual family is based on the open or disguised 
domestic enslavement of the woman; and modern society is a mass com- 
posed solely of individual families as its molecules. Today, in the great 
majority of cases, the man has to be the earner, the breadwinner of the 
family, at least among the propertied classes, and this gives him a domi- 
nating position which requires no additional legal privileges. In the 
family, he is the bourgeois; the wife represents the proletariat. In the 
industrial world, however, the specific character of the economic oppres- 
sion that weighs down the proletariat stands out in all its sharpness only 
after all the special legal privileges of the capitalist class have been set 
aside and the complete juridical equality of both classes is established. 
The democratic republic does not abolish the antagonism between the two 
classes; on the contrary, it provides the field on which it is fought out. 
And, similarly, the peculiar character of man's domination over woman 
in the modern family, and the necessity, as well as the manner, of estab- 
lishing real social equality between the two, will be brought out in sharp 
relief only when both are completely equal before the law. It will then 
become evident that the first premise for the emancipation of women is the 
re-introduction of the entire female sex into public industry; and that 
this again demands the abolition of the specific feature of the individual 
family as the economic unit of society. 



We have, then, three chief forms of marriage, which, generally speak- 
ing, conform to the three main stages of human development. For sav- 
agery — group marriage; for barbarism — pairing marriage; for civiliza- 
tion — monogamy, supplemented by adultery and prostitution. In the upper 
stage of barbarism, wedged in between the pairing family and monogamy 
are the absolute command of men over female slaves and polygamy. 

As our whole exposition has shown, the advance to be noted in this 
sequence is linked with the peculiar fact that while women are more 
and more deprived of the sexual freedom of group marriage, the men 
are not. Actually, for men, group marriage exists to this day. What for 
a woman is a crime entailing dire legal and social consequences, is 

61 



regarded in the case of a man as being honourable or. at most, as a slight 
moral stain that one bears with pleasure. The more the old traditional 
hetaerism is changed in our day by capitalist commodity production and 
adapted to it, and the more it is transformed into unconcealed prostitu- 
tion, the more degrading are its effects. And it degrades the men far more 
than it does the women. Among women, prostitution degrades only those 
unfortunates who fall into its clutches; and even these are not degraded 
to the degree that is generally believed. On the other hand, it degrades 
the character of the entire male world. Thus, in nine cases out of ten, 
a long engagement is practically a preparatory school for conjugal infi- 
delity. 

We are now approaching a social revolution in which the hitherto 
existing economic foundations of monogamy will disappear, just as cer- 
tainly as will those of its adjunct — prostitution. Monogamy arose out of 
the concentration of considerable w r ealth in the hands of one person — and 
that a man — and out of the need to bequeath this wealth to this man's 
children and to no one else's. For this purpose monogamy was essential on 
the woman's part, but not on the man's; so that this monogamy in no 
way hindered the overt or covert polygamy of the man. The impending 
social revolution, however, by transforming at least the greater part of 
permanent inheritable wealth — the means of production — into social pro- 
perty, will reduce all this anxiety about inheritance to a minimum. Since 
monogamy arose out of economic causes, will it disappear when these 
causes disappear? 

One might not unjustly answer: far from disappearing, it will, indeed, 
begin to be completely realized. For with the conversion of the means 
of production into social property, wage-labour, the proletariat, also 
disappears, and therewith, also, the necessity for a certain — statistically 
calculable — (number of women to surrender themselves for money. Pros- 
titution disappears; monogamy, instead of declining, finally becomes a 
reality — for the men as well. 

At all events, the position of the men undergoes considerable change. 
But that of the women, of all women, also undergoes important alteration. 
With the conversion of the means of production into communal property, 
the individual family ceases to be the economic unit of society. Private 
housekeeping is transformed into a social industry. The care and educa- 
tion of the children becomes a public matter. Society takes care of all 
children equally, irrespective of whether they are born in wedlock or not. 
Thus, the anxiety about the "consequences" which is today the most impor- 
tant social factor — both moral and economic — that hinders a girl from 
giving herself freely to the man she loves, disappears. Will this not be 
cause enough for the gradual development of free intercourse between 

62 



the sexes, and along with it. a more lenient public opinion regarding 
virginal honour and feminine shame? And finally, have we not seen that 
monogamy and prostitution in the modern world, although opposites, 
are nevertheless inseparable opposites, poles of the same social condi- 
tions? Can prostitution disappear without dragging monogamy with it 
into the abyss? 

Here a new factor comes into operation, a factor that, at most, existed 
in embryo in the period that monogamy developed; viz., individual sex 
love. 

No such thing as individual sex love existed before the Middle Ages. 
That personal beauty, intimate association, similarity in inclinations, etc., 
aroused desire for sexual intercourse among people of opposite sexes, 
that men and women were not totally unconcerned with whom they entered 
into this most intimate relation, is obvious. But this is still a far cry from 
the sex love of our day. Throughout antiquity marriages were arranged 
by the parents; the parties meekly acquiesced. The little conjugal love that 
was known to antiquity was not in any way a subjective inclination, but 
an objective duty; not a reason for but a corollary of marriage. In anti- 
quity, love relations in the modern sense only occur outside official society. 
The shepherds, whose joys and sorrows in love are sung by Theocritus 
and Moschus, or by Longus' Daphnis and Chloe, are mere slaves, who have 
no share in the state, the sphere of the free citizen. Except among the 
slaves, however, we find love affairs only as disintegration products of 
the declining ancient world; and with women who are also beyond the 
pale of official society, with hetaerae, that is, with alien or freed women: 
in Athens from the eve of its decline, in Rome at the time of the Emperors. 
If love affairs really occurred betw r een free citizens, it was only in the 
form of adultery. And sexnal love in our sense of the term was so imma- 
terial to that classical love poet of antiquity, old Anacreon, that even 
the sex of the beloved one was a matter of complete indifference to him. 

Our sexual love differs materially from the simple sexual desire, 
the Eros, of the ancients. Firstly, it presupposes reciprocal love on the 
part of the loved one; in this respect, the woman stands on a par with the 
man; whereas in the ancient Eros, the woman was by no means always con- 
sulted. Secondly, sexual love attains a degree of intensity and perma- 
nency where the two parties regard non-possession and separation as a 
great, if not the greatest, misfortune; in order to possess each other they 
take great hazards, even risking life itself — what in antiquity happened, 
at best, only in cases of adultery. And finally, a new moral standard arises 
for judging sexual intercourse. The question asked is not only whether 
such intercourse was legitimate or illicit, but also whether it arose from 
mutual love or not? It goes without saying that in feudal or bourgeois 

63 



practice this new standard fares no better than all the other moral stan- 
dards — it is simply ignored. But it fares no worse. It is recognized in 
theory, on paper, like all the rest. And more than this cannot be expected 
for the present. 

Where antiquity broke off in its development towards sexual love, the 
Middle Ages began, namely, with adultery. We have already described 
medieval chivalrous love which gave rise to the Songs of the Dawn. 
There is still a wide gulf between this kind of love, which aimed at break- 
ing up matrimony, and the love destined to be its foundation, a gulf never 
completely bridged by the age of chivalry. Even when we pass from the 
frivolous Latin peoples to the virtuous Germans, we find in the Mbelun- 
genlied, that Kriemhild — although secretly in love with Siegfried every 
whit as much as he is with her — nevertheless, in reply to Gunther's intima- 
tion that he has plighted her to a knight whom he does not name, answers 
simply: "You have no need to ask; as you command, so will I be for- 
ever. He whom you. my lord, choose for my husband, to him will I gladly 
plight my troth." It never even occurs to her that her love can possibly 
be considered in this matter. Gunther seeks the hand of Brunhild without 
ever having seen her, and Etzel does the same with Kriemhild. The same 
occurs in Gutrun, where Sigebrant of Ireland seeks the hand of Ute the 
Norwegian, Hetel of Hegelingen that of Hilde of Ireland: and lastly, Sieg- 
fried of Morland, Hartmut of Ormany and Herwing of Zeeland seek the 
hand of Gutrun; and here for the first time it happens that Gutrun, of 
her ow T n free will, decides in favour of the last-named. As a rule, the 
bride of a prince is selected by his parents; if these are no longer alive, 
he chooses her himself with the counsel of his highest vassal chiefs, whose 
word carries weight in all cases. Nor can it be otherwise; for the knight, or 
baron, just as for the prince himself, marriage is a political act, an op- 
portunity for the extension of power and influence through new alliances; 
the interests of the house and not individual inclination are the decisive 
factor. How can love here hope to have the last word regarding mar- 



riage? 



It was the same for the guildsman of the medieval towns. The very 
privileges w T hich protected him — the guild charters with their special 
stipulations, the artificial lines of demarcation which legally separated 
him from other guilds, from his own fellow-guildsmen and from his ap- 
prentices and journeymen — restricted the circle in which he could hope 
to secure a suitable spouse. And the question as to who was the most 
suitable was definitely decided under this complicated system, not by 
individual inclination, but by family interest. 

Up to the end of the Middle Ages, therefore, marriage, in the over- 
whelming majority of cases, remained what it had been from the commence- 

64 



ment, an affair that was not decided by the two principal parties. In the 
earliest times one came married into the world, married to a whole group 
of the opposite sex. A similar relation probably existed in the later forms 
of group marriage, only under conditions of ever-increasing limitation 
of the group. In the pairing family it is the rule that the mothers arrange 
their children's marriages; and here also, considerations of new ties of 
relationship that will strengthen the young couple's position in the gens 
and tribe are the decisive factor. And when, with the predominance of pri- 
vate property over communal property, and in consequence, of the interest 
in inheritance, father-right and monogamy rise to ascendancy, marriage 
becomes still more dependent on economic considerations. The form of 
marriage by purchase disappears, the transaction itself is to an ever- 
increasing degree carried out in such a way that not only the woman but 
the man also is appraised, not by his personal qualities, but by his pos- 
sessions. The idea that the mutual inclinations of the principal parties 
should be the all-supreme reason for matrimony remained unheard of 
in the practice of the ruling classes even from the very beginning. Such 
things took place, at best, in romance only, or — among the oppressed 
classes, which did not count. 

This was the situation found by capitalist production when, follow- 
ing the era of geographical discoveries, it set out to conquer the world 
through world trade and manufacture. One would think that this mode 
of matrimony would suit it exceedingly, and such was actually the case. 
And yet — the irony of world history is unfathomable — it was capitalist 
production that had to make the decisive breach in it. By transforming all 
things into commodities, it dissolved all traditional relations, and for 
inherited customs and historical rights it substituted purchase and sale, 
"free" contract. And H. S. Maine, the English jurist, believes that he has 
made a colossal discovery when he says that our entire progress in com- 
parison with previous epochs consists in our having evolved from status 
to contract, from conditions handed down traditionally to those volun- 
tarily contracted — a statement which in so far as it is correct, was con- 
tained long ago in the Communist Manifesto* 

But contracts can be concluded by people who can freely dispose of 
their persons, actions and possessions, and who meet each other on equal 
terms. To create such "free" and "equal" people was precisely one of 
the chief tasks of capitalist production. Although in the beginning this 
took place only in a semi-conscious manner, and in a religious guise, 
nevertheless, from the time of the Lutheran and Calvinistic Reformation 
it became a firm principle that a person was only completely responsible 



* See The Communist Manifesto, Chapter II. — Ed. Eng. ed. 
5—286 65 



for his actions if he possessed the fullest free will in performing them, 
and that it was a moral duty to resist all compulsion to commit immoral 
acts. But how does this fit in with the previous practice of matrimony? 
According to bourgeois conceptions, matrimony was a contract, an affair 
of law, indeed the most important of all, since it disposed of the body 
and mind of two persons for life. True, formally speaking, they were 
entered into voluntarily; it was not done without the consent of the par- 
ties; but how this consent was obtained, and who really arranged the 
marriage was known only too well. But if real freedom to decide was 
demanded for all other contracts, why not for this? Had not the two young 
people about to be united the right freely to dispose of themselves, their 
bodies and its organs? Did not sexual love become the fashion as a con- 
sequence of chivalry, and was not the love of husband and wife its 
correct bourgeois form, as against the adulterous love of the knights? But 
if it was the duty of married people to love each other, was it not just 
as much the duty of lovers to marry each other and nobody else? And 
did not the right of these lovers stand higher than that of parents, relations 
and other traditional marriage makers and marriage brokers? If the right 
of free personal discrimination unceremoniously forced its way into the 
church and religion, how could it halt at the intolerable claim of the 
older generation to dispose of body and soul, over the property, the 
happiness and the unhappiness of the younger generation? 

These questions were bound to arise in a period which loosened all 
the old social ties and which shook the foundations of all traditional 
conceptions. At one stroke the size of the world increased nearly ten-fold. 
Instead of only a quadrant of a hemisphere the whole globe was now open 
to the gaze of the West Europeans w T ho hastened to take possession of the 
other seven quadrants. And the thousand-year-old barriers set up by 
medieval modes of thought vanished in the same way as did the old, 
narrow, territorial barriers. An infinitely wider horizon opened out both 
to man's mind and to his gaze. Of what avail were the good intentions of 
respectability, the honoured guild privileges handed down through the 
generations, to the young man who was allured by India's riches, by the 
gold and silver mines of Mexico and Potosi? It was the knight-errant 
period of the bourgeoisie; it had its romance also, and its love dreams, but 
on a bourgeois basis and, in the last analysis, with bourgeois ends in view. 
Thus it happened that the rising bourgeoisie, particularly of the Prot- 
estant countries, where the existing order was shaken up most of all, 
increasingly recognized freedom of contract for marriage also and carried 
it through in the manner described above. Marriage remained class-mar- 
riage, but, within the confines of the class, the parties were accorded a 
certain degree of freedom of choice. And on paper, in moral theory as 



66 



in poetry, nothing was more unshakably established than that every mar- 
riage not based on mutual sex love and on the really free agreement of 
man and wife, was immoral. In short, love-marriage was proclaimed 
a human right; not only as "droit de l'homme"* but also, strange to say, 
as "droit de la femme."** 

But in one respect this human right differed from all other so-called 
human rights. While, in practice, the latter remained limited to the ruling 
class, the bourgeoisie — the oppressed class, the proletariat, being directly 
or indirectly deprived of them — in the case of the former, the irony of 
history asserts itself once again. The ruling class continues to be domi- 
nated by the familiar economic influences and, therefore, only in excep- 
tional cases can it show really voluntary marriages; whereas, as we have 
seen, these are the rule among the subjected class. 

Thus, full freedom in marriage can become generally operative only 
when the abolition of capitalist production, and of the property rela- 
tions created by it, has removed all those secondary economic considera- 
tions which now exert so powerful an influence on the choice of a partner. 
Then, no other motive remains than mutual attraction. 

Since sex love is by its very nature exclusive — although this exclusive- 
ness is fully realized today only in the woman — then marriage based on 
sex love is by its very nature monogamy. We have seen how correct Bach- 
ofen was when he regarded the advance from group marriage to individual 
marriage chiefly as the work of the women ; only the advance from pair- 
ing marriage to monogamy can be placed to the men's account, and, histor- 
ically, this consisted essentially in the worsening of the position of 
women and in facilitating infidelity on the part of the men. With the 
disappearance of the economic considerations which compelled women to 
tolerate the customary infidelity of the men — the anxiety about their own 
existence and even more about the future of their children — the equality 
of woman thus achieved will, judging from all previous experience, result 
far more forcibly in the men becoming really monogamous than in the 
women becoming polyandrous. 

What will most definitely disappear from monogamy, however, are 
all those characteristics stamped on it as a consequence of its having 
arisen out of property relationships. These are, firstly, the supremacy of 
men, and secondly, the indissolubility of marriage. The supremacy of the 
man in marriage is simply a consequence of his economic supremacy, 
and will vanish w T ith it automatically. The indissolubility of marriage is 
partly the result of the economic conditions under which monogamy 
arose, and partly a tradition from the time when the connection between 



* Mans right. — Ed. Eng. ed. 
** Woman's right. — Ed. Eng. ed. 



67 



monogamy and these conditions was not yet quite fully understood and 
was perverted by religion. Today it has been undermined a thousand-fold. 
If only marriages that are based on love are moral, then, indeed, only 
those are moral in which love continues. The duration of the impulse of 
individual sex love differs very much according to the individual, parti- 
cularly among men; and a definite cessation of affection, or its displace- 
ment by a new passionate love, makes separation a blessing for both parties 
as well as for society. People will only be spared the experience of wad- 
ing through the useless mire of divorce proceedings. 

Thus, what we can conjecture at present about the regulation of sex- 
relationships after the impending downfall of capitalist production is, in 
the main, of a negative character, limited mostly to what will vanish. 
But what will be added? That will be settled after a new generation has 
grown up; a generation of men who never in all their lives have had 
occasion to purchase a woman's surrender either with money or with any 
other means of social power; and a race of women who have never been 
obliged to surrender to any man out of any consideration other than that 
of real love, or to refrain from giving themselves to their lovers for fear 
of the economic consequences. Once such people appear, they will not 
care a rap about what we today think they should do. They will establish 
their own practice and their own public opinion, conformable therewith, 
of the practice of each individual — and that's the end of it. 

In the meantime, let us return to Morgan, from whom we have strayed 
quite considerably. The historical investigation of the social institutions 
which developed during the period of civilization lies outside the scope of 
his book. Consequently, he concerns himself only briefly with the fate 
of monogamy during this period. He, too, regards the development of the 
monogamous family as an advance, as an approximation to the complete 
equality of the sexes, without, however, considering that this goal has 
been reached. But, he says, "when the fact is accepted that the family has 
passed through four successive forms, and is now in a fifth, the question 
arises whether this form can be permanent in the future. The only answer 
that can be given is that it must advance as society advances, and change 
as society changes, even as it has done in the past. It is the creature of 
the social system, and will reflect its culture. As the monogamian family 
has improved greatly since the commencement of civilization and very 
sensibly in modern times, it is at least supposable that it is capable of still 
further improvement until the equality of the sexes is attained. Should the 
monogamian family in the distant future fail to answer the requirements 
of society. . . it is impossible to predict the nature of its successor."* 



* Morgan, Ancient Society, p. 499. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

68 



CHAPTER THREE 
THE IROQUOdS GENS 

We now come to a further discovery of Morgan's, which is at least as 
important as the reconstruction of the primitive form of the family out of 
the systems of consanguinity. The demonstration of the fact that the groups 
within the American-Indian tribe, designated by the names of animals, 
are in essence identical with the genea of the Greeks and the gentes of 
the Romans; that the American was the original form of the gens and 
the Greek and Roman the later, derivative form; that the entire social 
organization of the Greeks and Romans of primitive times in gens, phratry 
and tribe finds its faithful parallel in that of the American Indians; 
that (as far as our present sources of information go) the gens is an 
institution common to all barbaric tribes up to their entry into civilization, 
and even afterwards — this demonstration cleared up at one stroke the 
most difficult parts of the earliest Greek and Roman history. At the same 
time it has thrown unexpected light on the fundamental features of the 
social constitution of primitive times — before the introduction of the state. 
Simple as this may seem when one knows it — nevertheless, Morgan dis- 
covered it only very recently. In his previous work, published in 1871,* 
he had not yet hit upon the secret, the discovery of which reduced for a 
time the usually so confident English pre-historians to a mouse-like silence. 

The Latin word gens, which Morgan employs as a general designation 
for this kinship association, is, like its Greek equivalent — genos, derived 
from the common Aryan root gan (in German, where the Aryan g is, 
according to rule,** replaced by k, it is kan), which means to beget. 
Gens, genos, the Sanscrit janas, the Gothic kuni (in accordance with the 
above-mentioned rule) , the ancient Nordic and Anglo-Saxon kyn, the Eng- 



* Refers to Systems of Consanguinity and Affinity of the Human Family (1871). 
Smithsonian Publications. Vol. XVII. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

** Engels refers here to Grimm's Law of the shifting of consonants in the Indo- 
European languages. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

69 



lish kin. the Middle High German kiinne. all equally signify elan, common 
descent. However, gens in the Latin and genos in the Greek are specially 
used for those kinship associations which boast a common descent (in 
this case from a common male ancestor) and which, through certain 
social and religious institutions, are linked together into a special com- 
munity, whose origin and nature had hitherto, nevertheless, remained ob- 
scure to all our historians. 

We have already seen above, in connection with the punaluan family, 
how a gens in its original form is constituted. It consists of all persons 
who. by virtue of punaluan marriage and in accordance with the concep- 
tions necessarily predominating therein, constitute the recognized descen- 
dants of a definite individual ancestress, the founder of the gens. Since 
paternity is uncertain in this form of the family, female lineage alone is 
valid. Since the brothers may not marry their sisters, but only women of 
different descent, the children born of such women fall, according to 
mother-right, outside the gens. Thus, only the offspring of the daughters 
of each generation remain in the kinship group, while the offspring of the 
sons go over into the gentes of their mothers. YA hat, then, becomes of this 
consanguine group once it constitutes itself as a special group, as against 
similar groups within the tribe? 

Morgan takes the gens of the Iroquois, particularly that of the Seneca 
tribe, as the classical form of the original gens. They have eight gentes 
named after the following animals: 1) Wolf; 2) Bear; 3) Turtle; 4) 
Beaver; 5) Deer; 6) Snipe; 7) Heron; 8) Hawk. The following usages 
prevail in each gens: 

,1) It elects its sachem (headman in times of peace) and its chief 
(leader in war). The sachem had to be elected from within the gens itself 
and his office was hereditary in the gens, in the sense that it had to be 
immediately filled whenever a vacancy occurred. The war chief could be 
elected also outside the gens and the office could at times remain vacant. 
The son of the previous sachem never succeeded to the office, since mother- 
right prevailed among the Iroquois, and the son therefore belonged to 
a different gens. The brother or the sister's son, however, was often elect- 
ed. All voted at the election — men and women alike. The choice, how- 
ever, had to be confirmed by the remaining seven gentes and only then was 
the elected person ceremonially installed; this being carried out by the 
general council of the entire Iroquois confederacy. The significance of 
this will be seen later. The sachem's authority within the gens was of a 
paternal and purely moral character. He had no means of coercion at 
his command. He was by virtue of his office a member also of the tribal 
council of the Senecas, as well as of the Council of the Confederacy of 
all the Iroquois. The war chief had a say only in military expeditions. 

70 



2) The gens can depose the sachem and war chief at will. This again 
is carried through jointly by the men and women of the gens. Thereafter, 
the deposed rank as simple warriors and private persons like the rest. 
The council of the tribe can also depose the sachems, even against the 
wishes of the gens. 

3) No member is permitted to marry within the gens. This is the fun- 
damental rule of the gens, the bond which keeps it together; it is the 
negative expression of the very positive blood-relationship, by virtue of 
which the individuals associated in it really become a gens. By the dis- 
covery of this simple fact Morgan, for the first time, revealed the nature 
of the gens. How little the gens had been understood until then is proved 
by the earlier reports concerning savages and barbarians, in which the 
various bodies constituting the gentile organization are ignorantly and 
indiscriminately referred ,to as tribe, clan, thum, etc.; and regarding these 
it is sometimes asserted that marriage within any such body is prohibited. 
This gave rise to the hopeless confusion in which Mr. McLennan could 
intervene as a Napoleon, creating order by his fiat: All tribes are divided 
into those in which marriage is forbidden (exogamous) and those in 
which it is permitted (endogamous). And after having thus thoroughly con- 
fused matters he could indulge in most profound investigations as to 
which of his two absurd classes was the older, exogamy or endogamy. This 
nonsense ceased automatically with the discovery of the gens based on 
blood relationship and the consequent impossibility of marriage between 
its members. Obviously, at the stage in which we find the Iroquois, the 
rule forbidding marriage within the gens is inflexibly adhered to. 

4) The property of deceased persons was distributed among the re- 
maining members of the gens — it had to remain in the gens. In view of 
the insignificance of the effects which an Iroquois could leave, the heri- 
tage was divided among the nearest relations in the gens. Thus, when a 
man died, his natural brothers and sisters and his maternal uncle appro- 
priated the effects; and when a woman died, then her children and natural 
sisters, but not her brothers, appropriated them. Precisely because of 
this, man and wife could not inherit from each other, nor could children 
inherit from their father. 

5) The members of the gens were bound to give one another assistance, 
protection and particularly support in avenging injuries inflicted by out- 
siders. The individual depended and could depend for his security on the 
protection of the gens. Whoever injured him injured the whole gens. 
From this — the blood ties of the gens — arose the obligation of blood 
revenge, which was unconditionally recognized by the Iroquois. If an 
outsider slew a member of the gens the whole gens to which the slain per- 
son belonged was pledged to blood revenge. First mediation was tried. A 

71 



council of the slayer's gens was held and propositions were made to 
the council of the victim's gens for a condonation of the act — ^nostly in 
the form of expressions of regret and presents of considerable value. If 
these were accepted, then the whole affair was settled. If not, the injured 
gens appointed one or more avengers, whose duty it was to track down 
and slay the murderer. If this was accomplished the gens of the latter 
had no right to complain, the matter was regarded as adjusted. 

6) The gens has definite names or series of names which it alone, 
in the whole tribe, is entitled to use, so that an individual's name also 
indicated the gens to which he belonged. A gentile name carried gentile 
rights with it as a matter of course. 

7) The gens can adopt strangers and thereby admit them into the tribe 
as a whole. Prisoners of war that were not slain became members of the 
Seneca tribe by adoption into a gens and thereby obtained the full 
tribal and gentile rights. The adoption took place at the request of indi- 
vidual members of the gens — men placed the stranger in the relation of a 
brother or sister, women in that of a child. For confirmation, ceremonial 
acceptance into the gens was necessary. Gentes exceptionally reduced in 
numbers were often replenished by mass adoption from another gens, with 
the latter's consent. Among the Iroquois, the ceremony of adoption into 
the gens was performed at a public council of the tribe, which turned 
it practically into a religious ceremony. 

8) 'It is difficult to discover evidence of special religious rites among 
the Indian gentes — but the religious ceremonies of the Indians are more 
or less connected with the gentes. Among the Iroquois, at their six annual 
religious festivals, the sachems and war chiefs of the individual gentes 
were reckoned among the "Keepers of the Faith" ex officio and exercised 
priestly functions. 

9) The gens has a common burial place. That of the Iroquois of New 
York State, who have been hemmed in by the whites, has now disappeared, 
but it formerly existed. It still survives amongst other Indian tribes, as, 
for instance, amongst the Tuscaroras, a tribe closely related to the Iro- 
quois, w T ho, although now Christian, still retain in their cemetery a special 
row for each gens, so that the mother is buried in the same row as her 
children, but not the father. And among the Iroquois also, all the members 
of the gens are mourners at the funeral, prepare the grave, deliver funeral 
orations and so forth. 

10) The gens has a council, the democratic assembly of all adult male 
and female members of the gens, all with equal voice. This council elects 
and deposes the sachems and war chiefs and, likewise, the remaining 
"Keepers of the Faith." It decides about blood-money, or blood revenge, 

72 



for murdered members of the gens. It adopts strangers into the gens. In 
short, it is the sovereign power in the gens. 

These are the rights and obligations of a typical Indian gens. "All 
the members of an Iroquois gens were personally free and they were bound 
to defend each other's freedom; they were equal in privileges and in per- 
sonal rights, the sachem and chiefs claiming no superiority; and they 
were a brotherhood bound together by ties of kin. Liberty, equality, and 
fraternity, though never formulated, were cardinal principles of the 
gens . . . the gens was the unit of a social . . . system, the foundation upon 
which Indian society was organized. . . . This structure serves to explain 
that sense of independence and personal dignity universally an attribute 
of Indian character."* 

At the time of their discovery, the Indians in all North America were 
organized in gentes in accordance with mother-right. Only in a few tribes, 
as amongst the Dakotas, had the gentes fallen out, while in some others, 
such as the Ojibwas and Omahas, they were organized in accordance with 
father-right. 

Among numerous Indian tribes having more than five or six gentes, 
we find three, four or more gentes united in a special group which Mor- 
gan — faithfully translating the Indian term by its Greek counterpart — 
calls the phratry (brotherhood). Thus, the Senecas have two phratries, 
the first embracing the gentes 1 to 4, and the second the gentes 5 to 8. 
Closer investigation shows that these phratries, in the main, represent 
those original gentes into which the tribe split at the outset; for with the 
prohibition of marriage within the gens, each tribe had necessarily to 
consist of at least two gentes in order to be capable of independent exis- 
tence. As the tribe increased, each gens again subdivided into two or 
more gentes, each of which now appears as a separate gens, while the 
original gens, which embraces all the daughter gentes, lives on as the 
phratry. Among the Senecas and most other Indian tribes, the gentes in 
one phratry are brother gentes, while those in others are their cousin 
gentes — designations which, as we have seen, have a very real and ex- 
pressive significance in the American system of consanguinity. Originally, 
indeed, no Seneca could marry within his phratry; but this prohibition 
has long since lapsed and is limited only to the gens. The Senecas had a 
tradition that the Bear and the Deer were the two original gentes, of which 
the others were off-shoots. Once this new institution had become firmly 
rooted, it was modified according to need. In order to maintain equilib- 
rium, whole gentes out of 'other phratries were occasionally transferred 
to those in which gentes had died out. This explains why we find gentes 



Morgan, Ancient Society, pp. 85-86. — Ed, Eng. ed. 

73 



of the same name variously grouped among the phratries in different 
tribes. 

Among the Iroquois the functions of the phratry are partly social 
and partly religious. 1) The ball game is played by phratries, one against 
the other; each phratry puts forward its best players, the remaining 
members of the phratry being spectators arranged according to phratry, 
who bet against each other on the success of their respectives sides. 
2) At the council of the tribe the sachems and war chiefs of each phratry 
sit together, the two groups facing each other, and each speaker addresses 
the representatives of each phratry as a separate body. 3) If a murder 
was committed in the tribe and the victim and the slayer did not belong 
to the same phratry, the aggrieved gens often appealed to its brother 
gentes; these held a phratry council and addressed themselves to the 
other phratry, as a body, asking it also to summon a council for the adjust- 
ment of the matter. Here again the phratry appears as the original gens 
and with greater prospects of success than the weaker individual 
gens, its offspring. 4) On the death of persons of importance, the opposite 
phratry undertook the arrangement of the funeral and the burial rites, 
while the phratry of the deceased participated as mourners. If a sachem 
died, the opposite phratry notified the federal council of the Iroquois of 
the vacancy in the office. 5) The council of the phratry again appeared 
on the scene at the election of a sachem. Confirmation by the brother 
gentes w r as regarded as rather a matter of course, but the gentes of the 
other phratry might oppose. In such a case the council of this phratry 
met and, if it upheld the opposition, the election was null and void. 
6) Formerly, the Iroquois had special religious mysteries, which white 
men called "medicine lodges." Among the Senecas these were celebrated 
by tw r o religious organizations, one for each phratry, with a regular 
ritual of initiation for new members. 7) If, as is almost certain, the four 
lineages (kinship groups) that occupied the four quarters of Tlascala 
at the time of the Conquest were really four phratries, then this proves 
that the phratries, as among the Greeks, and similar kinship unions 
among the Germans, served also as military units. These four lineages 
went into battle, each one as a separate unit, wearing a special costume, 
marching under its own banners and led by its own commander. 

Just as several gentes constitute a phratry, so, in the classical form, 
several phratries constitute a tribe. In many cases the middle link, the 
phratry, is absent among extremely weakened tribes. What distinguishes 
the Indian tribe in America? 

1) The possession of its own territory and its own name. In addition 
to the area of actual settlement, each tribe possessed considerable terri- 
tory for hunting and fishing. Beyond this there was a wide stretch of 

74 






neutral land reaching to the territory of the next tribe; the extent of 
this neutral territory was small or large, according as to whether the 
languages of the two tribes were related or not. Such neutral ground 
was the boundary forest of the Germans, the wasteland which surrounded 
the territory of Caesar's Suevi, the isarnholt (Danish jarnved, limes 
Danicus) between the Danes and the Germans, the Saxon forest and the 
branibor (defence forest in Slavonic) — from which Brandenburg derives 
its name — between Germans and Slavs. The territory thus marked out 
by imperfectly defined boundaries was the common land of the tribe, 
recognized as such by neighbouring tribes, and defended by the tribe 
against any encroachment. In most cases, the uncertainty of the boun- 
daries became a practical inconvenience only when the population had 
greatly increased. The tribal names appear to have been the result more 
of accident than of deliberate choice. As time passed it frequently hap- 
pened that a tribe was designated by neighbouring tribes with a name 
different from that which it itself used, as was the case with the Germans, 
whose first comprehensive historical name — Germans — was bestowed on 
them by the Celts. 

2) A special dialect peculiar to this tribe only. In fact, tribe and 
dialect are substantially co-extensive. The establishment of new tribes and 
dialects through sub-division was in progress in America until quite re- 
cently, and can hardly have ceased altogether even now. Where two 
weakened tribes have amalgamated into one, it happens, by way of ex- 
ception, that two closely related dialects are spoken in the same tribe. 
The average strength of American tribes is under 2,000. The Cherokees, 
however, are 26,000 strong — being the largest number of Indians in the 
United States that speak the same dialect. 

3) The right of investing the sachems and war chiefs elected by the 
gentes, and & 

4) The right to depose them again, even against the wishes of the 
gens to which they belong. As these sachems and war chiefs are members 
of the tribal council, these rights of the tribe in relation to them explain 
themselves. Wherever a confederacy of tribes was established and all the 
tribes were represented in its federal council, the above rights were 
transferred to this latter body. 

5) The possession of common religious ideas (mythology) and rites 
of worship. "After the fashion of barbarians the American Indians were 
a religious people."* Their mythology has not yet been critically in- 
vestigated by any means. They already personified their religious 
ideas — spirits of all kinds — in human form, but in the lower stage of 



* Morgan, Ancient Society, p. 117. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

75 



barbarism in which they lived there was as yet no plastic representation, 

no so-called idols. It is a nature and element worship — evolving to- 
wards polytheism. The various tribes had their regular festivals with 
definite forms of worship, particularly dancing and games. Dancing 
especially was an essential part of the ceremonies at all religious festivals, 
each tribe holding its own festivals separately. 

6) A tribal council for common affairs. It consisted of all the sachems 
and war chiefs of the individual gentes — the real representatives of the 
latter, because they could always be deposed. Its discussions were public, 
held in the midst of the other members of the tribe, who had the right 
to intervene and to secure a hearing for their opinions; power of decision 
lay with the council. As a rule it was open to everyone to address the 
council; even the women could express their views through a spokesman 
of their own choice. Among (the Iroquois the final decisions had to be 
unanimous, as was also the case with many of the decisions of the German 
mark communities. In particular, the regulation of relations with other 
tribes devolved upon the tribal council. It received and sent embassies, 
it declared war and concluded peace. When war broke out it was carried 
on mainly by volunteers. In theory each tribe was in a state of war 
with every other tribe with which it had not expressly concluded a treaty 
of peace. Military expeditions were for the most part organized against 
such enemies by a few outstanding warriors. They gave a war-dance; 
whoever joined in the dance thereby declared his intention to participate 
in the expedition. The war-party was immediately formed and it set out 
forthwith. When the tribal territory was attacked, its defence was in the 
same manner carried through mainly by volunteers. The departure and 
return of such war parties were always made the occasion for public festiv- 
ities. The sanction of the tribal council for such expeditions was not 
necessary. It w T as neither sought nor given. They were exactly like the 
private war expeditions of the German retainers, as Tacitus has described 
them, with the exception, that among the Germans the retainers had already 
assumed a more permanent character, constituted a strong nucleus and 
were already organized in times of peace; around this nucleus the re- 
maining /volunteers grouped themselves in the event of war. Such war- 
parties were seldom numerically strong. The most important expeditions 
of the Indians, even those at great distances, were carried through by 
insignificant fighting forces. When several such retinues gathered together 
for an important engagement, each group obeyed its own leader only. 
The unity of the plan of campaign was ensured, more or less, by a 
council of these leaders. It was the method of war adopted by the 
Alamanni of the Upper Rhine in the fourth century as described by 
Ammianus Marcellinus. 



76 



7) In some tribes we find a head chief, whose duties and powers, 
however, are very slight. He is one of the sachems, who in cases de- 
manding speedy action has to take provisional measures until such time 
as the council can assemble and make the final decision. This is a feeble 
but, as further development showed, generally fruitless tendency to create 
an official with executive authority; actually, as will be seen, it was the 
principal military commander who, in most cases, if not in all, developed 
into such an official. 

The great majority of American Indians never went beyond the stage 
of tribal organization. Constituting numerically small tribes, separated 
from one another by wide borderlands, and enfeebled by perpetual 
warfare, they occupied an enormous territory with but few people. Al- 
liances arising out of temporary emergencies were concluded here and 
there between kindred tribes and dissolved again with the passing of the 
emergency. But in certain areas the subdivisions of originally related 
tribes reunited in lasting confederacies, and so took the first step towards 
the building of nations. In the United States we find the most advanced 
form of such a confederacy among the Iroquois. Emigrating from their 
original home west of the Mississippi, where they probably constituted 
a branch of the great Dakota family, they settled down after protracted 
w T anderings in what is today the State of New York; they were divided 
into five tribes: Senecas, Cayugas, Onondagas, Oneidas and Mohawks. 
They subsisted on fish, game and the produce of a crude horticulture, 
and lived in villages protected mostly by stockades. Never more than 
20,000 strong, they had a number of gentes common to all the five tribes; 
they spoke closely-related dialects of the same language and occupied 
a continuous tract of territory that was divided among the five tribes. 
Since this area had been newly conquered, habitual co-operation among 
these tribes against those jhey displaced was only natural. At the 
beginning of the fifteenth century at the latest, this developed into a regular 
"permanent league," a confederacy, which, conscious of its new-found 
strength, immediately assumed an aggressive character and at the height 
of its power — about 1675 — conquered large stretches of the surrounding 
country, expelling some of the inhabitants and forcing others to pay 
tribute. The Iroquois Confederacy was the most advanced social organi- 
zation attained by the Indians who had not emerged from the lower stage 
of barbarism (that is, excepting the Mexicans, New Mexicans and Peru- 
vians). The fundamental features of the Confederacy were as follows: 

1) Permanent alliance of the five consanguine tribes on the basis 
of complete equality and independence in all internal tribal affairs. This 
blood-relationship constituted the true basis of the Confederacy. Of the 
five tribes, three were called the father-tribes and were brothers one to 



77 



another; the other two were called son-tribes and were likewise brother- 
tribes to each other. Three gentes — the oldest — were still represented in 
all the five tribes, while another three existed in three tribes. The members 
of each of these gentes were all mutually brothers throughout the five 
tribes. The common language, with mere dialectical differences, was the 
expression and the proof of common descent. 

2 i The organ of the Confederacy was a Federal Council comprised 
of fifty sachems, all equal in rank and authority; this Council exercised 
supreme power in all matters pertaining to the Confederacy. 

3 i At the time the Confederacy was constituted these fifty sachems 
were distributed among the tribes and gentes as the bearers of new offices, 
especially created to suit the aims of the Confederacy. They were elected 
anew by the gentes concerned whenever a vacancy arose, and could al- 
ways be deposed by them. The right to invest them with office belonged, 
however, to the Federal Council. 

4) These sachems of the Confederacy were also sachems in their own 
respective tribes, and each had a seat and a vote in the tribal council. 

5) All decisions in the Federal Council had to be unanimous. 

6) Voting took place according to tribes, so that each tribe and all 
the council members in each tribe had to agree before a binding decision 
could be made. 

7) Each of the five tribal councils could convene a Federal Council 
meeting, but the latter had no power to convene itself. 

8) Its meetings took place before the assembled people. Every Iroquois 
had the right to speak; the council alone decided. 

9) The Confederacy had no official head, or chief executive mag- 
istrate. 

10) It did however have two supreme war chiefs, enjoying equal 
authority and equal power (the two "kings" of the Spartans, the two 
consuls in Rome). 

This was the whole public constitution under which the Iroquois lived 
for over four hundred years, and under which they still live. I have given 
Morgan's account of it in some detail — because it gives us the opportunity 
of studying the organization of a society which as yet knows no state. 
The state presupposes a special public authority separated from the whole 
body of those concerned in each case; and Maurer with true instinct 
recognizes the German mark constitution as a purely social institution 
differing essentially from the state, although it largely served as its foun- 
dation later on. In all his writings, therefore. Maurer investigates the 
gradual rise of public authority out of and side by side with the original 
constitutions of the marks, villages, manors and towns. The North 
American Indians show how an originally united race gradually spread 

78 



over an immense continent; how tribes, through sub-division, became 
nations, whole groups of tribes; how the languages changed not only 
until they became mutually unintelligible, but until nearly every trace 
of original unity also disappeared; and how at the same time individual 
gentes within the tribes broke up into several; how the old mother gentes 
continued as phratries, and the names of these oldest gentes still remain 
the same among widely remote and long-separated tribes, e.g.: the Wolf 
and the Bear are still gentile names among a majority of all Indian tribes. 
Generally speaking, the constitution described above applies to them 
all — except that many of them did not attain to the confederation of 
related tribes. 

But we also see that once the gens as a social unit is given, the entire 
organization of gentes, phratries and tribes develops almost inevitably — 
because naturally — out of this unit. All three are groups of various de- 
grees of consanguinity, each complete in itself and managing its own 
affairs, but each also supplementing the rest. And the sphere of affairs 
devolving on them comprised the totality of the public affairs of the 
barbarians in the lower stage. Wherever, therefore, we discover the gens 
as the social unit of a people, we may also look for an organization 
of the tribe similar to that described above; and where sufficient sources 
are available, as, for example, amongst the Greeks and the Romans, we 
shall not only find them, but we shall also convince ourselves that, where 
the sources fail us, a comparison with the American social organization 
will help us out of the most difficult doubts and enigmas. 

And this gentile constitution is wonderful in all its childlike simplic- 
ity! Everything goes its allotted way, without soldiers, gendarmes or 
police; without nobles, kings, governors, prefects or judges; without 
prisons; without trials. All quarrels and disputes are decided by the 
whole body of those concerned — the gens, or the tribe, or the individual 
gentes among themselves. Blood revenge threatens only as an extreme 
and rarely applied measure, of which our capital punishment is only 
the civilized form, loaded with all the advantages and drawbacks of civili- 
zation. Although there are many more affairs in common than at present — 
the household is run in common and communistically by a group of 
families, the land is tribal property, only the gardens being temporarily 
assigned to the households — still, not a bit of our extensive and compli- 
cated machinery of administration is required. Those concerned decide, 
and in most cases century-old custom has already regulated everything. 
There can be no poor and needy members of the community — the gens 
and the communistic household know their duties towards the aged, the 
sick and those disabled in war. All are free and equal — including the 
women. There is as yet no room for slaves, nor, as a rule, for the subju- 

79 



gation of alien tribes. When the Iroquois conquered the Eries and the 
"Neutral Nation" about the year 1651, they invited them to join the 
Confederacy as equal members; only when the vanquished refused wero 
they driven out of their territory. And the kind of men and women that 
are produced by such a society is best indicated by the admiration felt 
by all white men who came into contact with uncorrupted Indians; 
admiration of the personal dignity, [straightforwardness, strength of 
character and bravery of these barbarians. 

We have witnessed quite recently examples of this bravery in Africa. 
The Zulu Kaffirs a few years ago, like the Nubians a couple of months 
ago — in both of which tribes gentile institutions have not yet died out — 
did what no European army could do. Armed only with pikes and spears 
and without firearms, they advanced, under a hail of bullets from the 
breech-loaders, right up to the bayonets of the English infantry — 
universally acknowledged as the best in the world for fighting in close 
formation — throwing them into disorder and even beating them back 
more than once; and this, despite the colossal disparity in weapons and 
despite the fact that they have no such things as military service and do 
not know what military exercises mean. Their capacity and endurance 
are best proved by the complaint of the English that a Kaffir can move 
faster and cover a longer distance in twenty-four hours than a horse. As 
an English painter says, their smallest muscle stands out, hard and steely, 
like whipcord. 

This is what mankind and human society were like before class 
divisions arose. And if we compare their status with that of the over- 
whelming majority of civilized people today, we will find an enormous 
gulf between the present-day proletarian and small peasant and the ancient 
free member of a gens. 

This is one side of the picture. Let us not forget, however, that this 
organization was doomed to extinction. It never developed beyond the 
tribe; the confederacy of tribes already signified the commencement of 
its downfall, as we shall see later, and as the attempts of the Iroquois 
to subjugate others has shown. What was outside the tribe was outside 
the law. Where no express treaty of peace existed^ war raged between 
tribe and tribe; and war was waged with the cruelty that distinguishes 
man from all other animals and which was abated only later in self- 
interest. The gentile constitution in full bloom, as we have seen it in 
America, presupposes an extremely undeveloped form of production, 
that is, an extremely sparse population spread over a wide territory, and 
therefore, the almost complete domination of strange and incomprehen- 
sible nature over man, a domination reflected in his childish religious 
ideas. The tribe remained the boundary for a man, in relation to him- 

80 



self as well as to outsiders. The tribe, the gens and their institutions 
were sacred and inviolable, a superior power instituted by nature, to 
which the individual remained absolutely subject in thought, word and 
deed. Impressive as the people of this epoch may appear to us, they differ 
in no way one from another, they are still bound, as Marx says, to the 
umbilical cord of primitive communistic society. The power of this prim- 
itive communistic society had to be broken, and it was broken. But 
it was broken by influences which from the outset appear to us as a 
degradation, a fall from the simple moral grandeur of the ancient gentile 
society. The lowest interests — base greed, brutal sensuality, sordid avarice, 
selfish plunder of common possessions — usher in the new civilized society, 
class society; the most disgraceful means — robbery, outrage, deceit and 
treachery — undermine and destroy the old classless gentile society. And 
the new society itself, during the 2,500 years of its existence, has been 
nothing but the development of the small minority at the expense of the 
great exploited and oppressed majority; and it is so today more than 
ever before. 



6— 2SG 



CHAPTER FOUR 
THE GRECIAN GENS 

Greeks, Pelasgians and other peoples of the same tribal origin were 
constituted since prehistoric times in the same organic series as the 
Americans: gens, phratry, tribe, confederacy of tribes. The phratry might 
be missing, as, e.g., among the Dorians; the confederacy of tribes might 
not be fully developed in every case; but the gens was everywhere the 
unit. At the time the Greeks entered into history, they were on the thresh- 
old of civilization. Two full periods of development lie between the 
Greeks and the above-mentioned American tribes, the Greeks of the Heroic 
Age being by so much ahead of the Iroquois. For this reason the Grecian 
gens no longer bore the archaic character of the Iroquois gens; the stamp 
of group marriage was becoming considerably blurred. Mother-right had 
given way to father-right; thereby rising private wealth made the first 
breach in the gentile constitution. A second breach naturally followed 
the first: after the introduction of father-right, the fortune of a wealthy 
heiress would, by virtue of her marriage, fall to her husband, that is to 
say, to another gens; and so the foundation of all gentile law was 
broken, and in such cases the girl w T as not only permitted, but obliged 
to marry within the gens, in order that the latter might retain the fortune. 

According to Grote's History of Greece, the Athenian gens in partic- 
ular was held together by: 

1. Common religious ceremonies, and exclusive privilege of priest- 
hood, in honour of the same god, supposed to be the primitive ancestor 
of the gens, and characterized by a special surname. 

2. A common burial place. (See Demosthenes' Eubulides.) 

3. Mutual rights of inheritance. 

4. Reciprocal obligations of help, defence and redress of injuries. 

5. Mutual right and obligation to marry within the gens in certain 
cases, especially for orphaned daughters or heiresses. 

6. Possession, in some cases, at least, of common property, an archon 
(magistrate) and treasurer of their own. 

82 



The phratry, binding together several gentes, was less intimate, but 
still included mutual rights and duties of an analogous character; espe- 
cially a communion of particular religious rites and the right of prose- 
cution in the event of a phrator being slain. Again, all the phratries of 
a tribe had certain periodical communion of sacred rites under the pres- 
idency of a magistrate called the phylo-basileus (tribal magistrate) 
selected from among the nobles (Eupatrids). 

So far Grote. And Marx adds: "In the Grecian gens the savage (e.g., 
the Iroquois) is unmistakably discerned." He becomes still more unmis- 
takable when we investigate somewhat further. For the Grecian gens 
has also the following attributes: 

7. Descent according to father-right. 

8. Prohibition of intermarrying in the gens except in the case of 
heiresses. This exception formulated as an obligation clearly proves the 
validity of the old rule. This foll'ows also from the universally accepted 
rule that when a woman married she renounced the religious rites of her 
gens and acquired those of the gens of her husband, in whose phratry 
she was also enrolled. This, and a famous passage in Dikaearchos, go 
to prove that marriage outside of the gens was the rule. Becker in Cliaricles 
directly < assumes that nobody was permitted to marry within his or her 
own gens. 

9. The right to adopt strangers into the gens; it was practised by 
adoption into the family, but with public formalities, and limited to 
special cases. 

10. The right to elect and depose the chiefs. We know that every 
gens had its archon; but nowhere is it stated that this office was hereditary 
in definite families. Until the end of barbarism, the probability is always 
against strict heredity, which would be totally incompatible with conditions 
where rich and poor had absolutely equal rights in the gens. 

Not only Grote, but also Niebuhr, Mommsen and all other historians 
of classical antiquity were puzzled by the gens. Although they correctly 
noted many of its distinguishing features, nevertheless, they always re- 
garded it as a group of families and thus prevented themselves from 
understanding the nature and origin of the gens. Under the gentile 
constitution, the family was never the unit of organization, nor could it 
be, for man and wife necessarily belonged to two different gentes. The 
gens as a whole belonged to the phratry, the phratry to the tribe; but in the 
case of the family, half belonged to the gens of the husband and half 
to that of the wife. Even the state does not recognize the family in public 
law; to this day it exists only in civil law. Nevertheless, written history 
so far takes as its point of departure the absurd assumption, which became 
inviolate in the eighteenth century, that the monogamous family, an 

6* 83 



institution scarcely older than civilization, is the nucleus around which 
society and the state gradually crystallized. 

"Mr. Grote will also please note," adds Marx, "that although the 
Greeks traced their gentes to mythology, the gentes are older than my- 
thology with its gods and demi-gods, which they themselves had created." 

Grote is quoted with preference by Morgan as a prominent and quite 
trustworthy witness. He relates further that every Athenian gens had a 
name derived from its reputed ancestor; that before Solon's time and 
even after, if a man died intestate it was customary for the gentiles 
(gennetes) to inherit his property; and that if a man was murdered, first 
his near relations, next his gennetes, and finally the phrators had the 
right and duty to prosecute the criminal in the courts. "All that we hear 
of the most ancient Athenian laws is based upon the gentile and phratric 
divisions. . . ."* 

The descent of the gentes from common ancestors has been a brain- 
racking puzzle to the "school-taught philistines" (Marx). Naturally, 
since they claim that this descent is purely mythical, they are at a loss 
to explain how the gentes developed out of parallel, originally totally 
unrelated families; but they must explain it somehow, if only to explain 
the existence of the gentes. So they circle round in a whirlpool of words and 
do not get beyond the phrase: the genealogy is indeed mythical, but the 
gens is real. And finally, Grote says — the parenthetical remarks are by 
Marx: "We hear of this genealogy but rarely, because it is only brought 
before the public in certain cases pre-eminent and venerable. But the 
humbler gentes had their common rites [rather peculiar, Mr. Grote!] 
and common superhuman ancestor and genealogy, as well as the more 
celebrated [how very peculiar this, Mr. Grote, in humbler gentes!] ; the 
scheme and ideal basis [my dear sir! Not ideal, but carnal, Germanice 
fleischlichl] was the same in all."** 

Marx sums up Morgan's reply to this as follows: "The system of 
consanguinity corresponding to the original form of the gens — which 
the Greeks once possessed like other mortals — preserved the knowledge 
of the mutual relation of all members of the gens. They learned this 
decisively important fact by practice from early childhood. With the 
advent of the monogamous family this dropped into oblivion. The gentile 
name created a genealogy compared with wdiich that of the monogamous 
family seemed insignificant. The purpose of this name was now to remind 
its bearers of their common ancestry. But the genealogy of the gens went 
so far back that its members could no longer prove their mutual kinship, 



^ .Morgan, Ancient Society, p. 236. — Ed. Eng. ed. 
** Quoted in Ancient Society, p. 239. — Ed. Eng. ed. 



84 



except in a limited number of cases of more recent common ancestors 
The name itself was the proof of a common ancestry, and valid proof 
except in cases of adoption. Actually to deny all kinship between gentiles 
a la Grote and Niebuhr. who transform the gens into a purely hypothet 
ical and fictitious creation of the brain, is indeed worthy of 'ideal 
scientists, that is, of bookworms. Because the relation of the generations 
especially with the introduction of monogamy, is removed into the dis 
tance, and the reality of the past seems reflected in mythological phan 
tasy, the brave old philistines concluded, and still conclude, that the imag 
inary genealogy created real gentes!" 

As among the Americans, the phratry was a mother-gens, split up into 
several daughter gentes, and at the same time uniting them, often tracing 
them all to a common ancestor. According to Grote "All the contemporary 
members of the phratry of Hekataeus had a common god for their an- 
cestor in the sixteenth degree." Thus, all the gentes of this phratry were 
literally brother gentes. The phratry is mentioned by Homer as a mili- 
tary unit in that famous passage where Nestor advises Agamemnon : "Sep- 
arate the troops by tribes and by phratries ... so that phratry may 
support phratry, and tribes, tribes." The phratry also has the right and 
the duty to prosecute the murderer of a phrator, indicating that in former 
times it had the duty of blood revenge. Furthermore, it has common reli- 
gious rites and festivals; for the development of the entire Grecian 
mythology from the traditional old Aryan cult of nature was essentially 
due to the gentes and phratries and took place within them. The phratry 
also had an official head (phratriarchos) and according to de Coulanges, 
assemblies which would make binding decisions, a tribunal and govern- 
ment. Even the state of a later period, while ignoring the gens, left cer- 
tain public functions to the phratry. 

A number of kindred phratries constituted a tribe. In Attica there 
were four tribes of three phratries each, each phratry consisting of 
thirty gentes. This accurate division of the groups reveals a conscious 
and planned interference with the natural arrangement. How, when and 
why this was done Grecian history does not disclose, for the Greeks 
themselves preserved memories that did not reach beyond the Heroic Age. 

Closely packed in a comparatively small territory as the Greeks were, 
their differences in dialect were less conspicuous than those that developed 
in the extensive American forests. Nevertheless, even here we find only 
tribes of the same main dialect united in a larger organization ; and even 
little Attica had its owm dialect, which later on became the prevailing 
language in Grecian prose. 

In the epics of Homer we generally find the Greek tribes already 
combined into small nations, within which, however, the gentes, phratries 

85 



and tribes still retained their full independence. They already lived in 
walled cities. The population increased with the growth of the herds, 
with field agriculture and the beginnings of the handicrafts. With this 
came increased differences in wealth, which gave rise to an aristocratic 
element within the old primitive democracy. The various little nations 
engaged in constant warfare for the possession of the best land and also 
for the sake of loot. The enslavement of prisoners of war was already 
a recognized practice. 

The constitution of these tribes and little nations was as follows: 

1. The permanent authority was the council (boule), originally com- 
posed of the chiefs of the gcntes, but later on. when their number became 
too large, recruited by selection, which created the opportunity to develop 
and 'strengthen the aristocratic element. Dionysius definitely speaks of 
the council at the time of the heroes as being composed of notables 
(kratistoi 1 . The council had the final decision in all important matters. 
In Aeschylus, the council of Thebes passes an order that was binding 
in the given case, that the body of Eteocles be buried with full honours, 
and that the body of Polynices be thrown out to be devoured by the 
dogs. Later, with the rise of the state, this council was transformed into 
the senate. 

2. The assembly of the people (agora). Among the Iroquois we saw- 
that the people, men and women, attended the council meetings, taking 
an ordered part in the discussions and influencing its decisions. Among 
the Homeric Greeks, this '"Umstand." to use an old German legal expres- 
sion, had developed to a complete public assembly, as was also the case 
with the ancient Germans. The assembly was convened by the council 
to decide important matters; every man had the right to speak. The 
decision was made by a show of hands (Aeschylus in The Suppliants). 
or by acclamation. The decision of the meeting was supreme and final, 
for, as Schomann says in Antiquities of Greece, "whenever a matter is 
discussed that requires the co-operation of the people for its execution, 
Homer gives no indication of any means by which the people could be 
forced to it against their will/' At this time, when every adult male 
member of the tribe was a warrior, there was as yet no public authority 
separated from the people that could be opposed to it. Primitive de- 
mocracy was still in full bloom, and this must be the point of departure 
in judging the power and the status of the council and of the basileus. 

3. The military commander (basileus i. On this point. Marx makes 
the following comment: 'The European savants, mostly born servants 
of princes, represent the basileus as a monarch in the modern sense. 
The Yankee republican Morgan objects to this. Very ironically, but 
truthfully, he savs of the oilv Gladstone and his 'Juventus Munch' : 



86 



'Mr. Gladstone, who presents to his readers the Grecian chiefs of the 
Heroic Age as kings and princes, with the superadded qualities of gentle- 
men, is forced to admit that, on the whole we seem to have the custom 
or law of primogeniture sufficiently but not oversharply defined.' r 
As a matter of fact, Mr. Gladstone himself must have perceived that a 
system of primogeniture sufficiently but not oversharply defined is as 
good as none at all. 

What the position as regards heredity was in the case of the sachems 
and chiefs among the Iroquois and other Indians we have already seen. 
In so far as all officials were elected mostly in the gens, to that extent, 
they were hereditary in the gens. A vacancy was filled preferably by 
the next gentile relative — the brother or the sister's son — unless good 
reasons existed for passing him over. The fact that in Greece, under 
father-right, the office of basileus was generally transmitted to the son, 
or one of the sons, only indicates that the probability of succession by 
public election was in favour of the sons; but it by no means implies legal 
succession without public election. Here we perceive, simply, among 
the Iroquois and Greeks, the first rudiments of special aristocratic fami- 
lies within the gentes, and among the Greeks also the first rudiments of 
the future hereditary chieftainship or monarchy. Hence the evidence sup- 
ports the view that among the Greeks the basileus was either elected by 
the people or, at least, had to be confirmed by its recognized organ — the 
council, or agora — las was the case with the Roman "king" (rex). 

In the Iliad the ruler of men, Agamemnon, appears, not as the supreme 
king of the Greeks, but as commander of a federal army before a besieged 
city. And when dissension broke out among the Greeks, it is to this quality 
that Odysseus points in the famous passage: the rule of many is not a 
good thing; let us have one rule, etc. (to which the popular passage 
about the sceptre was added later). "Odysseus is not here lecturing on 
the form of government, but is demanding obedience to the commander 
of the army in the field. For the Greeks, who appear before Troy only 
as an army, the proceedings of the agora are sufficiently democratic. 
When speaking of gifts, that is, the division of the spoils, Achilles always 
leaves the division, not to Agamemnon or to some other basileus, but 
to the 'sons of the Achaeans,' that is to say, the people. The attributes, 
'descendant of Zeus,' 'bred by Zeus,' do not prove anything, because every 
gens is descended from some god, and the gens of the tribal chief from 
a 'prominent' god, in this case Zeus. Even bondsmen, such as the swine- 
herd Eumaeos and others, are 'divine' (dioi or theioi), even in the 
Odyssey, which belongs to a much later period than the Iliad, In the same 

* The passage Marx refers to is in Morgan, Ancient Society, p. 255. — Ed. 
Eng. ed. 

87 



Odyssey, the name of 'Heros' is given to the herald Mulios as well as to 
the blind bard Demodocus. In short, the word 'basileia,' which the Greek 
writers apply to Homer's so-called kingships (because military leader- 
ship is its distinguishing mark), side by side with the council and popular 
assembly, means merely — military democracy" {Marx). 

Besides military functions, the basileus had also priestly and judicial 
functions; the latter are not quite specified, but the former was inherent 
in his office of chief representative of the tribe, or of the confederation 
of tribes. There is no reference anywhere to civil, administrative func- 
tions; but it seems that he was ex officio a member of the council. Etymo- 
logically, it is quite correct to translate "basileus" as "king," because 
king (kuning) is derived from Kuni, Kiinne, and signifies chief of a 
gens. But the modern meaning of the word king in no way defines the 
functions of the Grecian basileus. Thucydides expressly refers to the old 
basileia as patrike, that is, "derived from the gens," and states that it 
had specified, that is, restricted functions. And Aristotle says that the 
basileia of the Heroic Age was the leadership of free men, and that the 
basileus was the military chief, judge and high priest. Hence, the basileus 
had no governmental power in a modern sense.* 

Thus, in the Grecian constitution of the Heroic Age, we still find the old 
gentile system in full vitality; but we also see the beginning of its decay: 
father-right and the inheritance of property by the father's children, 
which favoured the accumulation of wealth in the family and gave the 
latter power as against the gens; the effect of differentiation in wealth 
on the constitution seen in the first rudiments of a hereditary nobility 
and monarchy; slavery, first limited to prisoners of war, but already 
paving the way to the enslavement of fellow members of the tribe and 
even of the gens ; the degeneration of the old tribal warfare to systematic 
raids, on land and sea, for the purpose of capturing cattle, slaves, and 
treasure as a regular means of subsistence. In short, wealth is praised 
and respected as the highest treasure, and the old gentile institutions are 
spurned in order to justify forcible robbery of w r ealth. Only one thing 
was missing: an institution that would not only safeguard the newly 
acquired property of private individuals against the communistic tra- 



* Like the Grecian basileus, the Aztec military chief has been wrongly pre- 
sented as a prince in the modern sense. Morgan was the first to subject to histor- 
ical criticism the reports of the Spaniards, who at first misunderstood and exag- 
gerated, and later deliberately misrepresented the functions of this office, and 
showed that the Mexicans were in the middle stage of barbarism, but on a higher 
plane than the New Mexican Pueblo Indians^ and that their constitution, so far 
as the garbled accounts enable us to judge, corresponded to this stage: a con- 
federacy of three tribes, which had made a number of others tributary, and which 
was administered by a federal council and a federal military chief, whom the 
Spaniards described as an "emperor." — F. E. 

88 



ditions of the gens, would not only sanctify private property, formerly 
held in such slight esteem, and pronounce the protection of this sacred 
property as the highest purpose of human society, but would also stamp 
the gradually developing new forms of acquiring property, and conse- 
quently, of constantly increasing wealth, with the seal of public sanc- 
tion; an institution that would perpetuate, not only the newly rising 
class division of society, but also the right of the possessing classes to 
exploit and rule the non-possessing classes. 

And this institution arrived. The state was invented. 



CHAPTER FIVE 
THE RISE OF THE ATHENIAN STATE 

The first act of the drama showing how the state gradually developed, 
how some of the organs of the gentile constitution were changed, some 
replaced by new organs, and, finally, all superseded by real state author- 
ities — while the place of the actual "nation in arms" defending itself 
through its gentes, phratries and tribes was taken by an armed "public 
power" at the service of these state authorities and, therefore, also avail- 
able against the mass of the people — all this can best be seen in ancient 
Athens. The changes outlined below are, in the main, described by Mor- 
gan, but the economic causes which gave rise to them I had largely to 
add myself. 

In the Heroic Age, the four tribes of the Athenians were still installed 
in separate parts of Attica. Even the twelve phratries comprising them 
seem to have had separate seats in the twelve towns of Cecrops. The con- 
stitution was that of the Heroic Age: a public assembly, a council and 
a basileus. As far back as written history goes we find the land already 
divided up and transformed into private property, which corresponds 
with the fairly well developed state of commodity production and its 
concomitant trade towards the end of the higher stage of barbarism. 
In addition to cereals, wine and oil were cultivated. Commerce on the 
Aegean Sea passed more and more out of the hands of the Phoenicians 
into those of the Athenians. As a result of the purchase and sale of land 
and the continued division of labour between agriculture and handi- 
crafts, trade and navigation, the members of gentes, phratries and tribes 
very soon intermingled. The districts of the phratry and the tribe received 
inhabitants who, although they were fellow countrymen, did not belong 
to these bodies and, therefore, were strangers in their own homes. For 
in time of peace, every phratry and every tribe administered its own 
affairs without consulting the council or the basileus in Athens. But in- 
habitants not belonging to the phratry or the tribe could not take part 
in the administration of these bodies. 



90 



Thus, the regulated functioning of the organs of the gentile consti- 
tution became so disturbed that a change was already needed in the 
Heroic Age. A constitution, attributed to Theseus, was introduced. The 
main feature of this change was the institution of a central administra- 
tion in Athens, that is to say, part of the affairs that hitherto had been 
conducted independently by the tribes was declared to be common affairs 
and transferred to a general council sitting in Athens. Thereby, the 
Athenians went a step farther than any ever taken by the aborigines of 
America: the simple federation of neighbouring tribes was now sup- 
planted by the coalescence of all the tribes into one nation. This gave 
rise to a common Athenian law, which stood above the legal traditions 
of the tribes and gentes. It bestowed on the citizens of Athens, as such, 
certain rights and additional legal protection even in tribal territory 
that was not their own. This, however, was the first step towards under- 
mining the gentile constitution; for it was the first step towards the sub- 
sequent admission of citizens who were alien to all the Attic tribes and 
were and remained outside the pale of the Athenian gentile constitution. 
A second institution attributed to Theseus was the division of the entire 
nation, irrespective of gentes, phratries and tribes, into three classes: 
eupatrides or "well-born," geomoroi or "husbandmen," and demiurgi, or 
"artisans," and the granting to the well-born of the exclusive right to 
public office. True, apart from reserving to the well-born the right to 
hold public office, this division remained inoperative, as it created no 
other legal distinctions between the classes. It is important, however, 
because it reveals to us the new social elements that had quietly developed. 
It shows that the customary holding of office in the gens by certain fami- 
lies had already developed into a practically uncontested privilege; that 
these families, already powerful owing to their wealth, began to unite 
outside of their gentes into a privileged class; and that the nascent state 
sanctioned this usurpation. It shows, furthermore, that the division of 
labour between husbandmen and artisans had become strong enough 
to contest the supremacy of the old gentile and tribal division of society. 
And finally, it proclaimed the irreconcilable antagonism between gentile 
society and the state. The first attempt to form a state consisted in break- 
ing up the gentes by dividing their members into a privileged and an 
inferior class, and the latter again into two vocational classes, setting 
one against the other. 

The ensuing political history of Athens up to the time of Solon is only 
incompletely known. The office of basileus fell into disuse; archons, 
elected from among the aristocracy became the heads of the state. The 
rule of the aristocracy steadily increased until, round about 600 B.C., 
it became unbearable. The principal means for stifling the liberty of 

91 



the people were — money and usury. The aristocracy lived mainly in and 
around Athens, where sea commerce, with occasional piracy as a side 
line, enriched them and concentrated money wealth in their hands. From 
this point the developing money system penetrated like a corroding acid 
into the traditional life of the rural communities founded on natural 
economy. The gentile constitution is absolutely incompatible with the 
money system. The ruin of the Attic small allotment farmers coincided 
is i 1 1 1 the loosening of the old gentile bonds that protected them. Creditors' 
bills and mortgage bonds — for by then the Athenians had also invented 
mortgage — respected neither the gens nor the phratry. But the old gentile 
constitution knew nothing of money, credit and debt. Hence the con- 
stantly expanding money rule of the aristocracy also gave rise to a new 
common law, which protected the creditor against the debtor and sanc- 
tioned the exploitation of the small farmer by the money-owners. All the 
rural districts of Attica bristled with mortgage posts bearing the legend 
that the lot on which they stood was mortgaged to such and such for so 
much. The fields that were not so designated had for the most part been 
sold on account of expiring mortgages or non-payment of interest and 
had become the property of the aristocratic usurers; the farmer was glad 
if he was permitted to remain as a tenant and live on one-sixth of the prod- 
uct of his labour while paying five-sixths to his new master as rent. 
More than that: if the sum obtained from the sale of the lot did not 
cover the debt, or if such a debt was not secured by a pledge, the debtor 
had to sell his children into slavery abroad in order to satisfy the cred- 
itor's claim. The sale of the children by the father — such was the first 
fruit of father-right and monogamy! And if the bloodsucker was still 
unsatisfied, he could sell the debtor himself into slavery. Such was the 
pleasant dawn of civilization among the Athenian people. 

Formerly, when the conditions of life of the people were in keeping 
with the gentile constitution, such a revolution would have been impos- 
sible; but here it had come about, nobody knew how. Let us return for 
a moment to the Iroquois. Among them a state of things like that which 
had now imposed itself on the Athenians without their own doing, so to 
say, and certainly against their will, was inconceivable. There the mode 
of production, which, year in and year out, remained unchanged, could 
never give rise to such conflicts, imposed from without, as it were; to 
antagonism between rich and poor, between exploiters and exploited. 
The Iroquois were still far removed from controlling the forces of nature; 
but within the limits set for them by nature they w T ere masters of their 
production. Apart from bad harvests in their little gardens, the exhaus- 
tion of the fish supply in their lakes and rivers, or of game in their 
forests, they always knew what the outcome would be of their mode of 

92 



gaining a livelihood. The outcome would be: means of sustenance, meagre 
or abundant; but it could never be unpremeditated social upheavals, the 
breaking of gentile bonds, or the splitting of the members of gentes and 
tribes into antagonistic classes. Production was carried on within the 
most restricted limits, but — the producers owned what they produced. 
This was the immense advantage of barbarian production that was lost 
in the transition to civilization; and to win it back on the basis of the 
enormous control man now exercises over the forces of nature, and 
of the free association that is now possible, will be the task of the next 
generations. 

Not so among the Greeks. The advent of private property in herds 
of cattle and articles of luxury led to exchange between individuals, to 
the transformation of products into commodities. Here lies the root of 
the entire revolution that followed. When the producers no longer directly 
consumed their product, but let it go out of their hands in the course 
of exchange, they lost control over it. They no longer knew what became 
of it, and the possibility arose that the product might be turned against 
the producers, used as a means of exploiting and oppressing them. Hence, 
no society can for any length of time remain master of its own produc- 
tion and continue to control the social effects of the process of produc- 
tion, unless it abolishes exchange between individuals. 

The Athenians were soon to learn, however, that after i individual ex- 
change is established and products are converted into commodities, the 
product manifests its rule over the producer. With the production of 
commodities came the tilling of the soil by individual cultivators for 
their own account, soon followed by individual ownership of the land. 
Then came money, that universal commodity for which all others can 
be exchanged. But when men invented money they little suspected that 
they were creating a new social power, the one universal power to which 
the whole of society must bow. It was the rule of this new power, sud- 
denly sprung into existence without the will and intention of its own 
creators, that the Athenians felt in all the brutality of its youth. 

What was to be done? The old gentile organization had not only 
proved impotent against the triumphant march of money; it was also 
absolutely incapable of providing a place within its confines for such 
things as money, creditors, debtors and the forcible collection of debts. 
But the new social power was there, and neither pious wishes nor a long- 
ing for the return of the good old times could drive money and usury 
out of the world. Moreover, a number of other, minor breaches had been 
made in the gentile constitution. The indiscriminate mingling of the gen- 
tiles and phrators throughout the whole of Attica, and especially in 
Athens, assumed larger proportions from generation to generation, in 

93 



spite of the fact that a citizen of Athens, while allowed to sell his plot 
of land out of his gens, was still prohibited from selling his house. The 
division of labour between the different branches of production — agri- 
culture, handicraft, numerous crafts within the various handicrafts, trade, 
navigation, etc. — had developed more fully with the progress of industry 
and commerce. The population was now divided according to occupation 
into rather well defined groups, each of which had a number of new, 
common interests that found no place in the gens or phratry and, there- 
fore, necessitated the creation of new offices. The number of slaves had 
increased considerably and must have far exceeded that of the free Athen- 
ians even at this early stage. Gentile society originally knew no slavery 
and was, therefore, ignorant of any means of holding this mass of bonds- 
men in check. And finally, commerce had attracted a great many strangers 
who settled in Athens for the sake of the easier means of making money 
it afforded, and according to the old constitution these strangers had 
neither civil rights nor the protection of the law. In spite of traditional 
toleration, they remained a disturbing and foreign element. 

In short, the gentile constitution was coming to an end. Society was 
daily growing more and more out of it; it was powerless to check or 
allay even the most distressing evils that were arising under its very eyes. 
In the meantime, how r ever, the state had quietly developed. The new 
groups formed by division of labour, first between town and country, 
then between the various branches of urban industry, had created new 
organs to protect their interests. Public offices of every description were 
instituted. Above all, the young state needed its own fighting forces, 
which among the seafaring Athenians could at first be only naval forces, 
to be used for occasional small expeditions and to protect merchant ves- 
sels. At some uncertain time before Solon, the naucraries were instituted, 
small territorial districts, twelve in each tribe. Every naucrary had to 
furnish, equip and man a war vessel and in addition, detail two horse- 
men. This arrangement was a twofold attack on the gentile constitution. 
Firstly, it created a public power which was no longer identical with 
the armed nation; secondly, it for the first time divided the people for 
public purposes, not according to kinship groups, but according to com- 
mon domicile. We shall soon see what this signified. 

As the gentile constitution could not come to the assistance of the 
exploited people, they could look only to the rising state. And the state 
brought help in the form of the constitution of Solon, while at the same 
time strengthening itself at the expense of the old constitution. Solon — 
the manner in which his reforms of 594 B.C. were brought about does 
not concern us here — started the series of so-called political revolutions 
by an encroachment on property. All revolutions until now have been 

94 



revolutions for the protection of one kind of property against another 
kind of property. They cannot protect one kind without violating another. 
In the Great French Revolution feudal property was sacrificed in order 
to save bourgeois property; in Solon's revolution, creditors' property 
had to suffer for the benefit of debtors' property. The debts were simply 
annulled. We are not acquainted with the exact details, but Solon boasts 
in his poems that he removed the mortgage posts from the encumbered 
lands and enabled all who had fled or had been sold abroad for debt 
to return home. This could have been done only by openly violating 
property. And indeed, the object of all so-called political revolutions 
was to protect one kind of property — by confiscating, also called steal- 
ing — another kind of property. It is absolutely true that for 2,500 years 
private property could be protected only by violating property. 

But now a way had to be found to prevent this re-enslavement of 
the free Athenians. This was first achieved by general measures, e.g., the 
prohibition of contracts which involved the personal liberty of the debtor. 
Furthermore, a maximum was fixed for the amount of land any one 
individual could ow r n, in order to put some curb, at least, on the craving 
of the aristocracy for the peasants' land. Then followed constitutional 
amendments, of which the most important for us are the following: 

The council was increased to four hundred members, one hundred 
from each tribe. Here, then, the tribe still served as a basis. But this was 
the only side of the old constitution that was incorporated in the new 
body politic. For the rest, Solon divided the citizens into four classes, 
according to the amount of land owned and its yield. Five hundred, 
three hundred and one hundred and fifty medimnoi of grain (1 medimnos 
equals 1.16 bushels) were the minimum yields for the first three classes; 
whoever had less land or none at all belonged to the fourth class. Only 
members of the first three classes could hold office; the highest 
offices were filled by the first class. The fourth class only had the right 
to speak and vote in the public assembly. But here all officials were 
elected, here they had to give account of their actions, here all the laws 
were made, and here the fourth class was in the majority. The aristo- 
cratic privileges were partly renewed in the form of privileges of wealth, 
but the people retained the decisive power. The four classes also formed 
the basis for the reorganization of the fighting forces. The first two classes 
furnished the cavalry; the third had to serve as heavy-armed infantry; 
the fourth served as light-armed infantry, or in the navy, and probably 
were paid. 

Thus, an entirely new T element was introduced into the constitution: 
private ownership. The rights and duties of the citizens were graduated 
according to the amount of land they owned; and as the propertied classes 

95 



gained influence the old consanguine groups were driven into the back- 
ground. The gentile constitution suffered another defeat. 

The gradation of political rights according to property, however, was 
not an indispensable institution for the state. Important as it may have 
been in the constitutional history of states, nevertheless, a good many 
states, and the most completely developed at that, did without it. Even 
in Athens it played only a transient role. Since the time of Aristides, all 
offices were open to all the citizens. 

During the next eighty years Athenian society gradually took the 
course on which it further developed in subsequent centuries. Land spec- 
ulation, rampant in the pre-Solon period, was checked, as also was the 
unlimited concentration of landed property. Commerce, handicraft and 
the useful arts, conducted on an increasing scale as slave labour increased, 
became the predominating branches of industry. Public enlightenment 
advanced. Instead of exploiting their own fellow citizens in the old brutal 
manner, the Athenians now exploited mainly the slaves and outside 
clients. Movable property, wealth in money, slaves and ships, increased 
more and more; but instead of being simply a means for purchasing 
land, as in the old stupid times, it became an end in itself. This, on the 
one hand, gave rise to the successful competition of the new, wealthy indus- 
trial and commercial class with the aristocracy, but on the other hand 
it deprived the old gentile constitution of its last foothold. The gentes. 
phratries and tribes, whose members were now scattered all over Attica 
and completely intermingled, thus became entirely useless as political 
bodies. A large number of citizens of Athens did not belong to any gens; 
they were immigrants who had been adopted into citizenship, but not 
into any of the old consanguine groups. Besides, there was a steadily in- 
creasing number of foreign immigrants who only enjoyed legal pro- 
tection. 

Meanwhile, the struggles of the parties proceeded. The aristocracy 
tried to regain their former privileges and for a short time recovered 
their supremacy, until the revolution of Cleisthenes (509 B.C.) brought 
about their final downfall; and with them fell the last remnants of the 
gentile constitution. 

In his new constitution, Cleisthenes ignored the four old tribes based 
on the gentes and phratries. Their place was taken by an entirely new 
organization based exclusively on the division of the citizens according 
to place of domicile, already attempted in the naucraries. Not member- 
ship of a consanguine group, but place of domicile ,was now the deciding 
factor. Not people, but territory was now divided; politically, the in- 
habitants became mere attachments of the territory. 

The whole of Attica was divided into one hundred self-governing 



96 



townships, or denies. The citizens of a deme (demots) elected their official 
head (demarch), treasurer and thirty judges with jurisdiction in minor 
cases. They also received their own temple and a divine guardian or 
heros. whose priest they elected. The supreme power in the deme was 
the assembly of the demots. This, as Morgan correctly remarks, is the 
prototype of the self-governing American township. The modern state in 
its highest development has arrived at the very unit with which the rising 
state in Athens started out. 

Ten of these units (demes) formed a tribe, which, however, as dis- 
tinct from the old gentile system, was now called a local tribe. The local 
tribe was not only a self-governing political body, but also a military 
body. It elected a phylarch or tribal head who commanded the cavalry, 
the taxiarch who commanded the infantry, and the strategos who was in 
command of the entire contingent raised in the tribal territory. Further- 
more, it furnished five war vessels with crews and commander; and it 
received an Attic hero, by whose name it was known, as its guardian 
deity. Finally, it elected fifty councillors to the council of Athens. 

Thus, we arrive at the Athenian state, governed by a council of five 
hundred — elected by the ten tribes — and, in the last instance, by the 
popular assembly, which every Athenian citizen could attend and vote 
at. Archons and other officials attended to the different departments of 
administration and justice. In Athens there was no supreme official 
representing the executive power. 

By this new constitution and by the admission of a large number of 
tolerated citizens, partly immigrants and partly freed slaves, the organs 
of the gentile constitution were eliminated from public affairs. They sank 
to the position of private associations and religious societies. But their 
moral influence, the traditional conceptions and views of the old gentile 
period, survived for a long time and expired only gradually. This was 
evident in another state institution. 

We have seen that an essential feature of the state is a public power 
divorced from the mass of the people. At that time Athens possessed 
only a militia and a navy equipped and manned directly by the people. 
These afforded protection against external enemies and held the slaves 
in check, who at that time already constituted the great majority of the 
population. For the citizens, this public power at first only existed in 
the shape of the police force, which is as old as the state, and that is 
why the naive Frenchmen of the eighteenth century spoke, not of civi- 
lized, but of policed nations (nations policees). Thus, simultaneously 
with their state, the Athenians established a police force, a veritable 
gendarmerie of foot and mounted bowmen — Landjager, as they say in 
South Germany and Switzerland. This gendarmerie consisted — of slaves. 

7—286 97 



The free Athenian regarded this police duty as being so degrading that 
he preferred being arrested by an armed slave rather than perform such 
ignominious duties himself. This was still an expression of the old 
gentile mentality. The state could not exist without a police force, but it 
was still young and did not yet command sufficient moral respect to give 
prestige to an occupation that necessarily appeared infamous to the old 
gentiles. 

How well this state, now completed in its main outlines, suited the 
social condition of the Athenians was apparent from the rapid growth 
of wealth, commerce and industry. The class antagonisms on which the 
social and political institutions rested were no longer those between 
the aristocracy and the common people, but those between slaves and 
freemen, tolerated aliens and citizens. When Athens was at the height of 
prosperity the total number of free Athenian citizens, women and children 
included, amounted to about 90,000; the slaves of both sexes numbered 
365.000, and the tolerated aliens — immigrants and freed slaves — 45,000. 
Thus, for every adult male citizen there were at least eighteen slaves and 
more than two tolerated aliens. The large number of slaves is explained by 
the fact that many of them worked together in large workshops under 
overseers. With the development of commerce and industry came the 
accumulation and concentration of wealth in a few hands; the mass of 
the free citizens were impoverished and had to choose between going into 
handicrafts and competing with slave labour, which was considered 
ignoble and vile, and, moreover, promised little success, or still further 
degradation. Under the prevailing circumstances they necessarily chose the 
latter, and being in the majority they dragged the whole Athenian state 
down with them. It was not democracy that caused the downfall of 
Athens, as the European schoolmasters who cringe before royalty would 
have us believe, but slavery, which brought the labour of the free citizen 
into contempt. 

The rise of the state among the Athenians presents a very typical 
example of state-building; on the one hand, it took place in a pure 
form, without the interference of violent external or internal influences — ■ 
the short period of usurpation by Pisistratus left no trace behind it; on 
the other hand, it represented the rise of a highly developed form of 
state, the democratic republic, out of gentile society; and lastly, we are 
sufficiently acquainted with all the essential details of the process. 



CHAPTER SIX 
THE GENS AND THE STATE IN ROME 

According to the myth about the foundation of Rome, the first coloniza- 
tion was undertaken by a number of Latin gentes (one hundred, the 
legend says) united into one tribe. A Sabellian tribe (also said to consist 
of one hundred gentes) soon followed, and finally a third tribe of various 
elements, but again numbering one hundred gentes, joined them. The 
whole story reveals at the very first glance that here little more than 
the gens was the natural product, and that the gens itself, in certain cases, 
was only an offshoot of an old mother gens still existing in the old 
habitat. The tribes bear the mark of having been artificially constituted; 
nevertheless, they consisted mostly of kindred elements and w T ere formed 
on the model of the old, natural, not artificially constituted tribe; and 
it is not improbable that a genuine old tribe formed the nucleus of each 
of these three tribes. The connecting link, the phratry, contained ten 
gentes and was called the curia. Hence, there were thirty curiae. 

That the Roman gens is an institution identical with the Grecian gens 
is a recognized fact; if the Grecian gens is a continuation of the social 
unit, the primitive form of which was presented by the American Indians, 
then the same, naturally, holds good for the Roman gens. Hence, we can 
be more brief in its treatment. 

At least during the earliest times of the city, the Roman gens had 
the following constitution: 

1. Mutual right of succession to the property of deceased gentiles; 
the property remained in the gens. As father-right was already in force 
in the Roman gens, as it was in the Grecian gens, the offspring of female 
lineage were excluded. According to the law of the Twelve Tables, the 
oldest written law of Rome known to us, the natural children had the 
first title to the estate; in case no natural children existed, the agnates 
(kin of male lineage) took their place; and last in line came the gentiles. 
In all cases the property remained in the gens. Here we observe the 
gradual introduction into gentile practice of new legal provisions, caused 

7* 99 



by increased wealth and monogamy. The originally equal right of in- 
heritance of the gentiles was first limited in practice to the agnates, 
probably at a very remote date as mentioned above, and afterwards to 
the natural children and their offspring in the male line: of course in 
the Twelve Tables, this appears in inverse order. 

2. Possession of a common burial place. The patrician gens of Clau- 
dius, on immigrating into Rome from Regilli, received land and also 
a burial place in the city. Even under Augustus, the head of Varus, who 
had been killed in the Teutoburg Forest, was brought to Rome and In- 
terred in the gentilitius tumulus; hence, his gens (Quinctilia) still had its 
own tomb. 

3. Common religious rites. These, the sacra gentilitia, are well 
known. 

4. Obligation not to marry in the gens. In Rome this does not appear 
to have become a written law, but the custom remained. Of the in- 
numerable names of Roman couples that have come down to our day there 
is not a single case where husband and wife have the same gentile name. 
The law of inheritance also proves this rule. A woman by her marriage 
forfeited her agnatic rights, left her gens, and neither she nor her children 
could inherit her father's property, or that of his brothers, for otherwise 
the father's gens would lose the property. This rule has a meaning only 
on the assumption that the woman was not permitted to marry a member 
of her own gens. 

5. Possession of land in common. In primeval times this always 
obtained when the tribal territory was first divided. Among the Latin 
tribes we find the land partly in the possession of the tribe, partly of 
the gens, and partly of households that could hardly have represented 
single families at such an early date. Romulus is credited with being the 
first to assign land to single individuals, about two and a half acres (two 
jugera) to each man. Nevertheless, even later, w T e still find land in the 
hands of the gentes, not to mention state lands, around which the whole 
internal history of the republic turned. 

6. Reciprocal obligation of members of the gens of help, defence and 
redress of injuries. Written history records only remnants of this law; 
from the outset the Roman state manifested such superior power, that the 
duty of redress of injury devolved upon it. \\~hen Appius Claudius was 
arrested, his whole gens, including his personal enemies, put on mourning. 
At the time of the second Punic w T ar the gentes united to ransom their 
fellow gentiles who were in captivity, but were forbidden to do this by 
the senate. 

7. Right to bear the gentile name. This was in force until the lime 
of the emperors. Freed slaves w T ere permitted to assume the gentile names 

100 



of their former masters, although they did not thereby acquire gentile 
rights. 

8. Right of adopting strangers into the gens. This was done by adop- 
tion into the family (as among the Indians) which brought with it adop- 
tion into the gens. 

9. The right to elect and depose chiefs is nowhere mentioned. Inas- 
much, however, as during the first period of Rome's existence all offices, 
from the elected king downward, were filled by election or nomination, 
and as the curiae elected also their own priests, we are justified in as- 
suming that the same existed in regard to the gentile chiefs (principes) — 
no matter how well established the rule of choosing the candidates from 
the same family may have been already. 

Such were the rights and duties of a Roman gens. With the exception 
of the complete transition to father-right, they are the true image of the 
rights and duties of an Iroquois gens. Here, too, "the Iroquois is plainly 
discerned." 

The confusion that still reigns even among our recognized historians 
on the question of the Roman gens is shown by the following example: 
In his treatise on Roman family names of the Republican and Augus- 
tinian era (Romische Forschungen* Berlin, 1864, Vol. I), Mommsen 
writes: "The gentile name is not only borne by all male gentiles, including 
adopted persons and wards, except, of course, the slaves, but also by the 
women. . . . The tribe (so Mommsen translates gens) is a community 
resulting from a common — actual, assumed or even invented — ancestor 
and united by common rites, burial places and inheritance. All free indi- 
viduals, hence women also, may and must be registered in them. But the 
definition of the gentile name of the married woman offers some difficulty. 
This indeed is obviated as long as women were prohibited from mar- 
rying any one but members of their own gens; and evidently, for a long 
time the women found it much more difficult to marry outside the gens 
than in it. This right of marrying outside, the gentis enuptio, was still 
bestowed as a personal privilege and reward during the sixth century. . . . 
But wherever such outside marriages occurred in primeval times, the 
woman must have been transferred to the tribe of her husband. 
Nothing is more certain than that by the old religious marriage 
the woman joined the legal and sacramental community of her husband 
and left her own. Who does not know that the married woman forfeits 
her active and passive right of inheritance in respect to her gentiles, but 
enters the inheritance group of her husband, her children and his gen- 
tiles? And if her husband adopts her, as it were, and brings her into 
his familv. how can she remain separated from his gens?" (Pages 9-11.) 
* Roman Researches. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

101 



Thus. Mommsen asserts thai the Roman women belonging to a certain 
gens were originally free to marry only within their gens; according to 
him, the Roman gens, therefore, was endogamous, not exogamous. This 
opinion, which contradicts the experience of all other nations, is prin- 
cipally, if not exclusively, based on a single much disputed passage of 
Livy (Book XXXIX, c. 19) according to which the senate decreed in the 
year 568 of the city. i. e.. 186 B.C., uti Feceniae Hispallae datio, demi- 
nutio gentis enuptio, tutoris optio item esset quasi ei vir testamento dedis- 
set : utique ei ingenuo nubere liceret, neu quid ei qui earn duxisset, ob 
id fraudi ignominiaeve esset — that Fecenia Hispalla shall have the right 
to dispose of her property, to diminish it, to marry outside of the gens, 
to choose a guardian, just as if her (deceased) husband had conferred 
this right on her by testament; that she shall be permitted to marry a 
freeman and that for the man who marries her this shall not constitute 
a misdemeanour or disgrace. 

Undoubtedly, Fecenia, a freed slave, here obtains permission to marry 
outside of the gens. And it is equally doubtless that the husband has the 
right to confer on his wife by testament the right to marry outside of the 
gens after his death. But outside of which gens? 

If a woman had to marry in her gens, as Mommsen assumes, then 
she remained in this gens after her marriage. In the first place, however, 
this assertion that the gens was endogamous must be proved. In the second 
place, if the woman had to marry in the gens, then naturally the man 
had to do the same, otherwise he could never obtain a wife. Thus, we 
arrive at the conclusion that the man could by testament confer on his 
wife a right which he did not possess himself, which brings us to a legal 
absurdity. Mommsen realizes this, and therefore adds: "marriage outside 
of the gens most probably required not only the consent of the testator, 
but of all members of the gens." (Page 10, footnote.) Firstly, this is 
a very bold assertion; and secondly, it contradicts the clear wording of 
the passage. The senate gives her this right as her husband's proxy; it 
expressly gives her no more and no less than her husband could have 
given her; but what it does give is an absolute right, free from all restric- 
tion, so that, if she should make use of it, her new 7 husband shall not 
suffer in consequence. The senate even instructs the present and future 
consuls and praetors to see that she suffers no inconvenience from the 
use of this right. Mommsen's assumption, therefore, appears to be ab- 
solutely inadmissible. 

Then again: suppose a woman married a man from another gens, 
but remained in her own gens. According to the passage quoted above, 
her husband would then have the right to permit his wife to marry out- 
side of her own gens. That is. he would have the right to make provisions 

102 



in regard to the affairs of a gens to which he did not belong at all. 
The thing is so utterly unreasonable that we need say no more about it. 
Nothing remains but to assume that in her first marriage the woman 
wedded a man from another gens and thereby became a member of her 
husband's gens, which Mommsen himself admits for such cases. Then 
the whole matter at once explains itself. The woman, torn from her old 
gens by her marriage, and adopted into her husband's gentile group, 
occupies a special position in the new gens. She is now a gentile, but 
not a kin by blood; the manner in which she was adopted excludes from 
the outset all prohibition of marrying in the gens into which she has 
entered by marriage. She has been adopted into the marriage group of 
the gens and on the death of her husband inherits some of his property, 
that is to say, the property of a fellow member of the gens. What is 
more natural than that this property should remain in the gens and that 
she should be obliged to marry a member of her husband's gens and 
no other? If, however, an exception is to be made, who is more com- 
petent to authorize this than the man who bequeathed this property to 
her, her first husband? At the time he bequeathed a part of his property 
to her and simultaneously gave her permission to transfer this property 
to another gens by marriage, or as a result of marriage, he was still 
the owner of this property; hence he w r as literally disposing of his own 
property. As for the woman and her relation to her husband's gens, it 
was the husband who, by an act of his own free will — the marriage — 
introduced her into his gens. Thus, it appears quite natural that he should 
be the proper person to authorize her to leave this gens by another mar- 
riage. In short, the matter appears simple and obvious as soon as we 
discard the strange conception of an endogamous Roman gens and, with 
Morgan, regard it as having been originally an exogamous gens. 

Finally, there is still another view 7 , which has probably found the 
largest number of advocates, viz., that the passage in Livy only means 
"that freed slave girls (libertae) cannot, without special permission, e 
gente enubere (marry outside of the gens), or take any step which, being 
connected with capitis deminutio minima w T ould cause the liberta to leave 
the gentile group.' 7 (Lange, Romische Altertumer* Berlin, 1856, I. 
p. 195, w T here the passage we have taken from Livy is explained by a 
reference to Huschke.) If this view is correct, then the passage proves 
still less as regards the status of free Roman women, and there is so 
much less ground for speaking of their obligation to marry in the gens. 
The expression enuptio gentis occurs only in this single passage and 
is not found anvwhere else in the entire Roman literature. The word 



Roman Antiquities. — Ed. Eng. cd. 

103 



enubere, to marry outside, is found only three times in Li\y. and even 
then it lias no reference to the gens. The phantastic idea that Roman 
women were obliged to marry only in their gens owes its existence solely 
to this single passage. But it cannot be sustained; for either the passage 
refers to special restrictions for freed slave women, in which case it 
proves nothing for free born women (ingenuae) ; or it applies also to 
free born women, in which case it rather proves that the women as a 
rule married outside of the gens and were by their marriage transferred 
to their husbands' gens. Thus it proves that Morgan is right and Mommsen 
wrong. 

Three hundred years after the foundation of Rome the gentile bonds 
were still so strong that a patrician gens, the Fabians, could obtain per- 
mission from the senate to undertake by itself an expedition against the 
neighbouring town of Veii. Three hundred and six Fabians are said to 
have marched out and to have been killed in an ambuscade. Only one 
boy was left behind to propagate the gens. 

As we have said, ten gentes formed a phratry, w T hich here was called 
a curia, and was endowed with more important functions than the Grecian 
phratry. Every curia had its own religious rites, sacred relics and priests. 
The latter in a body formed one of the Roman colleges of priests. Ten 
curiae formed a tribe, which probably had originally its own elected 
chief — leader in war and high priest — like the rest of the Latin tribes. 
The three tribes together formed the populus Romanus, the Roman people. 

Thus, only those could belong to the Roman people who were members 
of a Roman gens, and hence, of a curia and tribe. The first constitution 
of the Roman people was as follows. Public affairs were conducted by 
the senate composed, as Niebuhr was the first to state correctly, of the 
chiefs of the three hundred gentes; as the elders of the gentes they were 
called patres, fathers, and as a body senatus (council of elders, from 
senex, old). Here also the customary choice of men from the same family 
of the gens brought into being the first hereditary aristocracy. These fami- 
lies called themselves patricians and claimed the exclusive right to the 
seats in the senate and to all other offices. The fact that in the course 
of time the people admitted this claim so that it became an actual right 
is expressed in the legend that Romulus bestowed the rank of patrician 
and its privileges on the first senators and their descendants. The senate, 
like the Athenian boule, had power to decide in many affairs and to 
undertake the preliminary discussion of more important measures, 
especially of new laws. These were decided by the popular assembly, 
the so-called comitia curiata (assembly of curiae). The people met in 
curiae, probably grouped by gentes, and in deciding questions, each of 
the thirty curiae had one vote. The assembly of curiae adopted or rejected 

104 



the laws, elected all higher officials including the rex (so-called king), 
declared war (but the senate concluded peace), and decided as a supremo 
court, on appeal, all cases involving capital punishment for Roman 
citizens. Finally, by the side of the senate and the popular assembly 
stood the rex, corresponding exactly to the Grecian basileus, and by no 
means such an almost absolute monarch as Mommsen represents him to 
be.* The rex was also military commander, high priest and president 
of certain courts. He had no civil functions, or any pow T er over life, 
liberty and property of the citizens, except such as resulted from his 
disciplinary power as military commander, or from his power to pass 
sentence as president of a court. The office of 'rex was not hereditary; 
on the contrary, he was first elected, probably on the nomination of his 
predecessor, by the assembly of curiae and then solemnly invested by 
a second assembly. That he could also be deposed is proved by the fate 
of Tarquinius Superbus. 

Like the Greeks in the Heroic Age, the Romans at the time of the 
so-called kings lived in a military democracy based on genres, phratries 
and tribes, from which it developed. Even though the curiae and tribes 
may have been partly artificial formations, they were moulded after the 
genuine and natural models of the society in which they originated and 
which still surrounded them. And though the natural patrician aristocracy 
had already gained ground, though the reges attempted gradually to 
enlarge the scope of their functions — this does not change the original 
and fundamental character of the constitution, and this is the whole 
point. 

Meanwhile, the population of the city of Rome and of the Roman 
territory, enlarged by conquest, increased, partly by immigration, partly 
through the inhabitants of the annexed, mostly Latin, districts. All these 
new citizens (w r e leave out the question of the clients for the moment) 
were outside of the old gentes, curiae and tribes, and so were not part 
of the populus Romanus, the Roman people proper. They were personally 
free, could own land, had to pay taxes and were liable to military service. 
But they were not eligible for office and could neither participate in the 
assembly of curiae nor in the distribution of conquered state lands. They 



* The Latin rex is equivalent to the Celtic-Irish righ (tribal chief) and the 
Gothic reiks. That this, like the German Fiirst, (English first and Danish forste), 
originally signified gentile or tribal chief is evident from the fact that the Goths 
in the fourth century already had a special term for the king of later times, the 
military chief of a whole nation, viz, thiudans. In Ulfila's translation of the Bible 
Artaxerxes and Herod are never called reiks, but thiudans, and the empire of the 
Emperor Tiberius not reiki, but thiudinassus. In the name of the Gothic thiudans, 
or king, as we inaccurately translate it, Thiudareiks (Theodoric, German Dietrich), 
both names flow together. — F. E. 

105 



constituted the plebeians, those excluded from all public rights. Owing 
to their continually increasing numbers, their military training and 
armament, they became a menace to the old populus who had now closed 
their ranks hermetically against all new elements. The land, moreover, 
seems to have been fairly evenly divided between populus and plebeians, 
while the mercantile and industrial wealth, though as yet not very con- 
siderable, may have been mainly in the hands of the plebeians. 

In view of the utter darkness that enshrouds the whole legendary 
origin of Rome's historical beginning — a darkness intensified by the ra- 
tionalistic and pragmatic interpretations and reports of later legally 
trained authors who wrote on the subject — it is impossible to make any 
definite statements about the time, the course and the motive of the 
revolution that put an end to the old gentile constitution. The only thing 
we are certain of is that its causes lay in the conflicts between the ple- 
beians and the populus. 

The new constitution attributed to rex Servius Tullius and based on 
the Grecian model, more especially that of Solon, created a new popular 
assembly including or excluding all, populus and plebs alike, according 
to whether they rendered military service or not. The whole male popula- 
tion that was liable to military service w T as divided into six classes accord- 
ing to wealth. The property qualifications in the five classes were: 
I, 100,000 asses; II, 75,000 asses; III, 50.000 asses; IV, 25,000 asses; 
V, 11,000 asses; which according to Dureau de la Malle is equal to about 
14,000, 10,500, 7,000, 3.600 and 1.570 marks respectively. The sixth 
class, the proletarians, consisted of those who possessed less and were 
exempt from military service and taxation. In the new assembly of cen- 
turiae (comitia centuriata) the citizens formed ranks after the manner 
of soldiers, in companies of one hundred (centuria), and each centuria 
had one vote. The first class placed 80 centuriae in the field; the second 
22, the third 20, the fourth 22, the fifth 30 and the sixth, for propriety's 
sake, one. To these were added 18 centuriae of horsemen composed of the 
most wealthy. Hence, there were 193 centuriae. Thus, for a majority, 
97 votes were required. But the horsemen and the first class alone had 
together 98 votes, thus being in the majority; when they w r ere united 
valid decisions could be made without the consent of the other classes. 

This new assembly of centuriae assumed all the political rights of 
the former assembly of curiae (a few nominal privileges excepted) ; 
the curiae and the gentes composing them were thereby, as was the case 
in Athens, degraded to the position of private and religious associations 
and as such they vegetated for a long time, while the assembly of curiae 
soon fell into oblivion. In order to eliminate the three old tribes also 
from the state, a svstem of four territorial tribes was introduced, each 



06 



tribe being assigned to a quarter of the city and receiving certain political 
rights. 

Thus, in Rome also, the old social order based on personal ties of 
blood kinship was destroyed even before the abolition of the so-called 
kingship, and a new constitution, based on territorial division and distinc- 
tion of wealth, a real state constitution, took its place. The public power 
here consisted of citizens liable to military service, to be used not only 
against the slaves, but also against the so-called proletarians, who were 
excluded from military sendee and the right to carry arms. 

After the expulsion of the last rex, Tarquinius Superbus, who had 
really usurped royal power, the new constitution was further developed 
by the institution, in place of the rex, of two military commanders 
(consuls) with equal powers (as among the Iroquois). Within this con- 
stitution moves the whole history of the Roman republic; all its struggles 
between patricians and plebeians for admission to office and participa- 
tion in the allotment of state lands; and the final dissolution of the 
patrician aristocracy in the new class of big land and money-owners — 
who gradually absorbed all the land of the small farmers who had been 
ruined by military service, cultivated the enormous new tracts thus 
created with the aid of slaves, depopulated Italy, and thus opened the 
gates not only to the imperial tyrants, but also to their successors, the 
German barbarians. 



CHAPTER SEVEN 
THE GENS AMONG CELTS AND GERMANS 

Space prevents us from going into the gentile institutions still found 
in a more or less pure form among the most diverse savage and bar- 
barian peoples of the present day; or into the traces of such institutions 
found in the ancient history of civilized nations in Asia. One or the other 
is met with everywhere. A few illustrations may suffice: Even before the 
gens had been recognized it was pointed out and accurately described 
in its main outlines by the man who took the greatest pains to misunder- 
stand it, McLennan, who wrote of this institution among the Kalmucks, 
the Circassians, the Samoyeds and three Indian nations: the Waralis. the 
Magars and the Munnieporees. Recently it was described by M. Kova- 
levsky. who discovered it among the Pshavs, Khevsurs, Svanetis and 
other Caucasian tribes. Here we will confine ourselves to a few brief 
notes on the existence of the gens among Celts and Germans. 

The oldest Celtic laws that have come down to our day show the 
gens in full vitality. In Ireland it is alive, at least instinctively, in the 
popular mind to this day, after the English have forcibly destroyed it. 
It was in full bloom in Scotland until the middle of the eighteenth cen- 
tury, and here, too, it succumbed only to the arms, laws and courts of 
the English. 

The old Welsh laws, written several centuries before the English 
conquest, not later than the eleventh century, still show communal agri- 
culture of whole villages, although only as exceptions and as the sur- 
vival of a former universal custom. Every family had five acres for its 
own cultivation; another plot was at the same time cultivated in common 
and its yield divided among the different families. Judging by the Irish 
and Scotch analogies there cannot be any doubt that these village com- 
munities represent gentes or subdivisions of gentes, even though a re-investi- 
gation of the Welsh laws, which I cannot undertake for lack of time 
(my notes are from 1369), should not directly corroborate this. The thing, 
however, that the Welsh sources, and the Irish, do prove conclusively 

108 



is that among the Celts the pairing family had not yet given way to 
monogamy in the eleventh century. In Wales, marriage did not become 
indissoluble by divorce, or rather by notification, until after seven years. 
Even if only three nights were wanting to make up the seven years, 
a married couple could still separate. Then their property was divided 
between them: the woman divided, the man made his choice. The fur- 
niture w r as divided according to certain very funny rules. If the marriage 
was dissolved by the man, he had to return the woman's dowry and 
a few other articles; if the woman desired a separation, she received less. 
Of three children the man took two, the woman one, viz., the second 
child. If the woman married again after her divorce, and her first husband 
claimed her back, she was obliged to follow him, even if she already 
had one foot in her new husband's bed. But if two people had lived 
together for seven years, they were considered man and wife, even 
without the preliminaries of a formal marriage. Chastity among girls be- 
fore marriage was by no means strictly observed, nor was it demanded; 
the regulations governing this subject are of an extremely frivolous nature 
and run counter to all bourgeois morals. When a woman committed 
adultery, her husband had a right to beat her — this was one of three 
cases when he could do so without incurring a penalty — but after that 
he could not demand any other redress, for "the same ofTence shall either 
be atoned for or avenged, but not both." The reasons that entitled a 
woman to a divorce without losing her separation rights were of a very 
diverse nature: the man's foul breath was a sufficient reason. The redemp- 
tion money to be paid to the tribal chief or king for the right of the 
first night (gobr merch, hence the medieval name marcheta, French 
marquette) plays a conspicuous part in the legal code. The women had 
the right to vote at the popular assemblies. Add to this that similar con- 
ditions are shown to have existed in Ireland; that time marriages were 
also quite the custom there, and that the women were assured of liberal 
and well defined privileges in case of divorce, even to the point of re- 
muneration for domestic services; that a "first wife" existed by the side 
of others, and in dividing a deceased parent's property no distinction was 
made between legitimate and illegitimate children — and we have a picture 
of the pairing family compared with which the marriage laws valid 
in North America seem strict; but this is not surprising in the eleventh 
century for a people who in Caesar's time were still living in group 
marriage. 

The Irish gens (sept; the tribe was called clainne, clan) is confirmed 
and described not only by the ancient law books, but also by the English 
jurists of the seventeenth century who were sent across for the purpose 
of transforming the clan lands into domains of the King of England. 



109 



Up to this time, the land had been the common property of the clan or 
gens, except where the chiefs had already claimed it as their private 
domain. When a gentile died, and a household was thus dissolved, the 
gentile chief (called caput cognationis by the English jurists) re-distrib- 
uted the whole gentile land among the other households. This distribu- 
tion must have taken place according to rules such as were observed in 
Germany. We still find a few villages — very numerous forty or fifty 
years ago — with fields combined in so-called rundales. The peasants, 
individual tenants on the soil that once was the common property of the 
gens, but had been seized by the English conquerors, each paid rent for 
his particular plot, but all the arable and meadow land was combined 
and shared out, according to situation and quality, in strips, or "Gewan- 
ne," as they are called on the Mosel, and each one received a share of 
each Gewann. Moorland and pastures were used in common. As recently 
as fifty years ago, re-division was still practised occasionally, sometimes 
annually. The plan of such a rundale village looks exactly like that of 
a German "Gehoferschaft" on the Mosel or in the Hochwald. The gens 
also survives in the "factions." The Irish peasants often form parties 
that seem to be founded on absolutely absurd and senseless distinctions, 
quite incomprehensible to Englishmen. The only purpose of these fac- 
tions is apparently to rally for the popular sport of hammering the life 
out of one another. They are artificial reincarnations, modern substitutes 
for the dispersed gentes that in their own peculiar way demonstrate the 
continuation of the old gentile instinct. Incidentally, in some localities 
members of the same gens still live together on what is practically their 
old territory. During the thirties, for instance, the great majority of the 
inhabitants of the old county of Monaghan had only four family names, 
i.e., they were descended from four gentes or clans.* 

The downfall of the gentile order in Scotland dates from the suppres- 



* Note to fourth edition: During a few days that I spent in Ireland, I again 
realized to what extent the rural population is still living in the conceptions of the 
gentile period. The big landlord, whose tenant the peasant is, still enjoys a position 
similar to that of a clan chief, who supervises the cultivation of the soil in the 
interest of all, is entitled to tribute from the peasant in the form of rent, but 
also has to assist the peasant in cases of need. Likewise, everyone in comfortable 
circumstances is considered under obligation to help his poorer neighbours when- 
ever they are in need. Such assistance is not charity; it is what the poor clansman 
receives by right from his rich fellow clansman or clan chief. This explains why 
the professors of political economy and the jurists complain of the impossibility of 
inculcating the modern idea of bourgeois property into the minds of the Irish peas- 
ants. Property that has only rights, but no duties, is absolutely beyond the ken of 
the Irishman. No wonder so many Irishmen who are suddenly cast into the modern 
great cities of England and America, among a population with entirely different 
moral and legal standards, despair of all morals and justice, lose all hold and often 
succumb to demoralization in masses. — F. E. 

110 



sion of the rebellion in 1745. What link in this order the Scotch clan 
represented remains to be investigated; that it is a link, is beyond doubt. 
Walter Scott's novels bring the clan in the Highlands of Scotland vividly 
before our eyes. It is, as Morgan says, "an excellent type of the gens in 
organization and in spirit, and an extraordinary illustration of the power 
of the gentile life over its members. . . . We find in their feuds and blood 
revenge, in their localization by gentes, in their use of lands in common, 
in the fidelity of the clansmen to their chief and of the members of the 
clan to each other, the usual and persistent features of gentile society. . . . 
Descent was in the male line, the children of the males remaining mem- 
bers of the clan, while the children of its female members belonged to 
the clans of their respective fathers."" The fact that mother-right was 
formerly in force in Scotland is proved by the royal family of the Picts, 
in which, according to Bede, inheritance in the female line prevailed. 
We even see evidences of the punaluan family preserved among the Scots 
and the Welsh until the Middle Ages in the right of first night, which 
the chief of the clan, or king, the last representative of the former 
common husbands, could claim with every bride, unless redeemed. 



That the Germans were organized in gentes up to the time of the migra- 
tion of peoples is an indisputable fact. Evidently they settled in the ter- 
ritory between the Danube, the Rhine, the Vistula and the northern seas 
only a few centuries before our era; the Cimbri and Teutons were still 
in full migration, and the Suevi did not settle down until Caesar's time. 
Caesar expressly states that they settled down in gentes and kins (gen- 
tibus cognatibusque), and in the mouth of a Roman of the Julia gens 
the term gentibus has a definite meaning that cannot possibly be mis- 
construed. This holds good for all Germans; even the settling of the 
conquered Roman provinces appears to have proceeded in gentes. The 
Alemannian laws confirm the fact that the people settled on the con- 
quered land south of the Danube in gentes (genealogiae) ; genealogia 
is used in exactly the same sense as Mark or Dorfgenossenschaft** was 
used later. Recently Kovalevsky has stated that these genealogiae were 
large household communities among which the land was divided, and 
from which the village communities developed later on. The same may 
be true of the fara, the term which the Burgundians and Langobards — a 
Gothic and a Herminonian or High German tribe — applied to nearly, if 



* Morgan, Ancient Society, pp. 368-69. — Ed, Eng. ed. 
** Village community. — Ed. Eng. ed. 



11 



not exactly, the same thing that in the Alemannian book oi laws is called 
genealogiae. Whether this really represents the gens or the household 
community is a matter that must be further investigated. 

The language records leave us in doubt as to whether all the Germans 
had a common expression for gens, and if so, as to what this term was. 
Etymologically, the Greek genos, the Latin gens, corresponds to the 
Gothic kuni, Middle High-German kiinne, and is used in the same sense. 
We are led back to the time of mother-right by the terms for "woman" 
which are derived from the same root: Greek gyne, Slav zhena, Gothic 
qvino, Old Norse kona, kuna. — Among Langobards and Burgundians we 
find, as I have said, the term fara, which Grimm derives from the hypo- 
thetical root fisan, to beget. I should prefer to trace it to the more obvious 
root faran, fahren, to wander, a term which designates a certain well 
denned section of the nomadic train, composed, it almost goes without 
saying, of relatives; a term which, in the course of centuries of wandering 
first to the East and then to the Wert, was gradually applied to the 
family community itself. — Further, there is the Gothic sibja, Anglo-Saxon 
sib, Old High-German sippia, sippa, Sippe. Old Norse has only the plural 
sifjar, the relatives; the singular occurs only as the name of a goddess, 
Sif. — Finally, another expression occurs in the Hildebrand Song, where 
Hildebrand asks Hadubrand "who is your father among the men of the 
nation ... or what is your kin?" (eddo huellihhes cnuosles du sis). If 
there was a common German term for gens, it might well have been the 
Gothic kuni; this is not only indicated by its identity with the correspond- 
ing term in kindred languages, but also by the fact that the word kuning, 
konig, which originally signified chief of gens or tribe, is derived from 
it. Sibja, Sippe, does not appear worthy of consideration; in old Norse, 
at least, sifjar signifies not only kinship in blood, but also by marriage; 
hence it comprises the members of at least two gentes, and the term sif 
cannot have been applied to the gens itself. 

Among the Germans, as among the Mexicans and Greeks, the horse- 
men as wall as the wedge-like columns of infantry were arranged in 
battle order in gentes. When Tacitus says: "by families and kinships," 
the indefinite term he uses is explained by the fact that in his time the 
gens had long ceased to be a living body in Rome. 

Of decisive significance is a passage in Tacitus where he says: The 
mother's brother regards his nephew as his son; some even hold that the 
blood tie between the maternal uncle and the nephew is more sacred and 
close than that between father and son, so that when hostages are de- 
manded the sister's son is considered a better pledge than the natural 
son of the man whom they desire to place under bond. Here we have 
a living survival of the matriarchal, and hence original, gens, and it 

112 



is described as something which particularly distinguishes the Germans.* 
If a member of such a gens gave his own son as a pledge for an obli- 
gation he had undertaken, and if this son became the victim of his 
father's breach of faith, that was the concern of the father alone. When 
the son of a sister was sacrificed, however, then the most sacred gentile 
law was violated. The next of kin who was bound above all others to 
protect the boy or young man, was held responsible for his death; he 
should either have refrained from giving the boy as a pledge, or have 
kept the contract. If we had no other trace of gentile organization among 
the Germans, this one passage would be sufficient proof of its existence. 
Still more decisive, as it comes about eight hundred years later, is a 
passage in the Old Norse song of the twilight of the gods and of the 
end of the world, the Voluspa. In this "Vision of the Seeress," which, 
as Bang and Bugge have now shown, also contains elements of Christian- 
ity, the description of the period of universal decay and corruption pre- 
ceding the cataclysm contains this passage 

Broedhr munu bejask ok at bonum verdask 
Munu systrungar sifjum spilla. 

"Brothers will wage war against one another and become each other's 
slayers, and sisters' children will break the bonds of kinship." Systrun- 
gar means the sons of the mother's sister, and in the poet's eyes, their 
repudiation of blood relationship is the climax to the crime of fratricide. 
The climax lies in systrungar, which emphasizes the kinship on the 
maternal side. If the term syskina-born, brother's and sister's children, 
or syskina-synir, brother's and sister's sons, had been used, the second 
line would not have been a crescendo but a weakening diminuendo. Thus, 
even in the time of the Vikings, when the Voluspa was composed, the 
memory of mother-right in Scandinavia was not yet obliterated. 

For the rest, in Tacitus' time, at least among the Germans with whom 
he was more familiar, mother-right had already given way to father- 
right: the children were the heirs of the father; in the absence of children, 



* The Greeks know this special sacredness of the bond between the mother's 
brother and his nephew, a relic of mother-right found among many nations, only 
in the mythology of the Heroic Age. According to Diodorus, IV, 34, Meleager kills 
the sons of Thestius, the brothers of his mother Althaea. The latter regards this 
deed as such a heinous crime that she curses the murderer, her own son, and prays 
for his death. It is related that "the gods fulfilled her wish and ended Meleager's 
life." According to the same Diodorus (IV, 44,) the Argonauts under Herakles landed 
in Thracia and there found that Phineus, at the instigation of his second wife, 
shamefully maltreats his two sons, the offspring of his first deserted wife, Cleopatra, 
the Boreade. But among the Argonauts there are also some Boreades, the brothers 
of Cleopatra, the uncles of the maltreated boys. They at once come to their nephews' 
aid, set them free and kill their guards. — F. E. 



8—286 



13 



the brothers aiul uncles on both father and mother sides were the heirs. 
The admission of the mother's brother to inheritance is connected with the 
preservation of the above-mentioned custom, and also proves how recent 
father-right was among the Germans at that time. We find traces of 
mother-right even late in the Middle Ages. In this period fatherhood 
was still a matter of doubt, especially among serfs, and when a feudal 
lord demanded the return of a fugitive serf from a city, it was required, 
for instance, in Augsburg, Basel and Kaiserslautern, that the fact of his 
serfdom should be established by the oaths of six of his immediate blood 
relations, exclusively on his mother's side. (Maurer, Stadtevcrjassung, 
I, p. 381.) 

.Another relic of mother-right, then just falling into decay, was the, 
from the Roman standpoint, almost inexplicable respect the Germans 
had for the female sex. Young girls of noble family were regarded as 
the best hostages guaranteeing the keeping of contracts with Germans. 
In battle, nothing stimulated their courage so much as the horrible thought 
that their wives and daughters might be captured and carried into slavery. 
They regarded the woman as being holy and something of a prophetess, 
and they heeded her advice in the most important matters. Veleda, the 
Bructerian priestess on the river Lippe, was the moving spirit of the 
whole Batavian insurrection, in which Civilis, at the head of German 
and Belgian tribes, shook the foundations of Roman rule in Gaul. The 
women appear to have held undisputed sway in the house. Tacitus says 
that they, with the old men and children, had to do all the work, for 
the men went hunting, drank and loafed; but he does not say who culti- 
vated the fields, and as according to his explicit statement the slaves 
only paid dues and performed no compulsory labour, it would appear 
that what little agricultural work was required had to be performed by 
the adult men. 

As was stated above, the form of marriage was the pairing family 
gradually passing to monogamy. It was not yet strict monogamy, for 
polygamy was permitted for the prominent. On the whole, unlike the 
Celts, they insisted on strict chastity among girls. Tacitus speaks with 
particular warmth of the sacredness of the matrimonial bond among 
the Germans. He gives adultery on the part of the woman as the sole 
reason for a divorce. But his report contains many gaps, and further- 
more, it too openly holds up the mirror of virtue to the dissipated 
Romans. So much is certain: if the Germans in their forests were such 
exceptional models of virtue, only a slight contact with the outer world 
was required to bring them down to the level of the other European 
average man; in the w T hirl of Roman life the last trace of strict morality 
disappeared even faster than the German language. It is enough to read 

114 



Gregory of Tours. It goes without saying that refined voluptuousness 
could not exist in the primeval forests of Germany as it did in Rome, 
and so we may say that in this respect also the Germans were superior 
to the Roman world, without ascribing to them a moderation in carnal 
matters that has never prevailed among any nation as a whole. 

From the gentile system arose the obligation to inherit the feuds as 
well as the friendships of one's father and relatives; and also wergeld, 
the fine paid in atonement for murder or injury, in place of blood re- 
venge. A generation ago this wergeld was regarded as a specifically 
German institution, but it has since been proved that hundreds of peoples 
practised this milder form of gentile blood revenge. Like the obligation 
of hospitality, it is found, for instance, among the American Indians. 
Tacitus' description of the manner in which hospitality w r as observed 
(Germania, chap. 21) is almost identical with Morgan's. 

The heated and ceaseless controversy as to whether or not the Germans 
in Tacitus' time had already divided up the cultivated land and how 
the passages relating to this question should be interpreted, is now a 
thing of the past. After it had been established that the cultivated land 
of nearly all peoples was tilled in common by the gens and later on 
by communistic family groups, a practice which Caesar still found among 
the Suevi; that later the land was allotted periodically to the individual 
families; and that this periodical allotment of the cultivated land has 
been preserved in parts of Germany down to this day — after such evi- 
dence we need not waste any more breath on the subject. If the Germans 
in one hundred and fifty years passed from common cultivation, such 
as Caesar expressly attributes to the Suevi — they have no divided or private 
tillage whatsoever, he says — to individual cultivation with the annual 
redistribution of the land in Tacitus' time, it is surely progress enough; 
the transition from the previous stage to the complete private ownership 
of land in such a short period and without any outside intervention was 
an utter impossibility. Hence I can read in Tacitus only what he states 
in so many wordb: They change (or re-divide) the cultivated land every 
year, and enough land is left for common use. It is the stage of agri- 
culture and appropriation of the soil, which exactly tallies with the gen- 
tile constitution of the Germans of that time. 

I leave the preceding paragraph unchanged, just as it stood in former 
editions. Meantime the question has assumed another aspect. Since Kova- 
levsky has demonstrated (see above p. 48) that the (patriarchal house- 
hold community was widespread, if not universal, as the connecting link 
between the matriarchal communistic family and the modern isolated 
family, the question is no longer whether the land was common or pri- 
vate property, as discussed between Maurer and Waitz, but the form 

8* 115 



common property assumed. There is no doubt whatever that in Caesar's 
time the Suevi not only owned their land in common, but also tilled 
it in common for common account. The questions whether their economic 
unit was the gens, or the household community, or an intermediate com- 
munistic kinship group, or whether all three of these groups existed as 
a result of different local conditions will remain subjects of controversy 
for a long time yet. Kovalevsky maintains that the conditions described 
by Tacitus were not founded on the mark or village community, but 
on the household community, which, much later, developed into the 
village community, owing to the growth of the population. 

Hence, the German settlements on the territory they occupied in the time 
of the Romans, and on the territory they later took from the Romans, must 
have been not villages, but large family communities comprising several 
generations, who cultivated a correspondingly large tract o'f land and used 
the surrounding wild land as a common mark with their neighbours. 
This being the case, the passage in Tacitus concerning the changing of 
the cultivated land would indeed have an agronomic meaning, viz., that 
the community cultivated a different piece of land every year, and the 
land cultivated during the previous year was left in fallow, or entirely 
abandoned. The sparsity of the population would have left enough spare 
wild land to make all disputes about land unnecessary. Only after the 
lapse of centuries, when the members of the household had increased, 
so that the common cultivation became impossible under the prevailing 
conditions of production, were the household communities dissolved. The 
former common fields and meadows were then divided in the well-known 
manner among the various individual households that had now formed, 
at first periodically, and later once and for all, while forest, pasture and 
water remained common property. 

As far as Russia is concerned, this process of development appears 
to have been fully proved historically. As for Germany, and for other 
Germanic countries, it cannot be denied that, in many respects, this 
view affords a better interpretation of the sources and an easier solution 
of difficulties than the idea of tracing the village community to the time 
of Tacitus. The oldest documents, e.g., of the Codex Laureshamensis, 
are on the whole more easily explained by the household community than 
by the village community. On the other hand, it presents new difficulties 
and new problems that need solution. Here, only further investigation 
can decide. I cannot deny, however, that it is highly probable that the 
household community was also the intermediate stage in Germany, Scan- 
dinavia and England. 

\Hiile the Germans of Caesar's time had partly just taken up settled 
abodes, and partly were still seeking such, they had been settled for a 

116 



full century in Tacitus' time; the resulting progress in the production 
of means of subsistence is unmistakable. They lived in log houses; 
their clothing was .still of the primitive forest type, consisting of rough 
woolen cloaks and animal skins, and linen underclothing for the women 
and the notables. They lived on milk, meat, wild fruit and, as Pliny 
adds, oatmeal porridge, which is the Celtic national dish in Ireland 
and Scotland to this day. Their wealth consisted of cattle, of an inferior 
breed, however. The kine were small, uncouth and hornless; the horses 
were small ponies, not fast runners. Money, Roman coin only, was little 
and rarely used. They made no gold or silver ornaments, nor did they 
attach any value to these metals. Iron was scarce and, at least among 
the tribes on the Rhine and the Danube, was apparently imported, not 
mined by themselves. The runic script (imitations of Greek and Latin 
letters) was only used as a secret code and exclusively for religious 
sorcery. Human sacrifices were still in vogue. In short, they were a 
people just emerged out of the middle stage of barbarism into the upper 
stage. While, however, the tribes whose immediate contact with the 
Romans facilitated the import of Roman manufactured goods were there- 
by prevented from developing a metal and textile industry of their own, 
there is not the least doubt that the tribes of the Northeast, on the 
Baltic, developed these industries. The pieces of armour found in the 
bogs of Sleswig — a long iron sword, a coat of mail, a silver helmet, 
etc., together with Roman coins from the close of the second century — 
and the German metal ware spread by the migration of peoples represent 
a peculiar type of fine workmanship, even such as were modeled after 
Roman originals. With the exception of England, emigration to the 
civilized Roman empire everywhere put an end to this native industry. 
How uniformly this industry arose and developed is shown, e. g., by the 
bronze spangles. The specimens found in Burgundy, in Rumania and on 
the Azov Sea, might have been manufactured in the same workshops as 
those found in England or Sweden, and are of undoubted Germanic 
origin. 

Their constitution was also in keeping with the upper stage of bar- 
barism. According to Tacitus, there was a council of chiefs (principes) 
which decided matters of minor importance and prepared important mat- 
ters for the decision of the popular assemblies. The latter, in the lower 
stage of barbarism, at least where we know anything about them, among 
the American Indians, are held only in the gentes, not in tribes or con- 
federacies of tribes. The magistrates (principes) were still sharply dis- 
tinguished from the war chiefs (duces), just as among the Iroquois. The 
magistrates were already living, in part, on honorary gifts, such as cattle, 
grain, etc., from their fellow tribesmen. As in America, they were general- 

117 



ly elected from the same family. The transition to father-right favoured, 
as in Greece and Rome, the gradual transformation of elective office into 
hereditary office, thus giving rise to an aristocratic family in each gens. 
Most of this old, so-called tribal aristocracy disappeared during the migra- 
tion of peoples, or shortly after. The military leaders were elected solely 
on their merits, irrespective of birth. They had little power and had to 
rely on force of example. As Tacitus explicitly states, actual disciplinary 
power in the army was held by the priests. The popular assembly was 
the real power. The king or tribal chief presided; the people decided: 
a murmur signified "no," acclamation and clanging of weapons meant 
"aye." The popular assembly was also the court of justice. Complaints 
were brought up here and decided: and death sentences were pronounced, 
the latter only in cases of cowardice, treason or unnatural vices. The 
gentes and other subdivisions also decided in a body, presided over by 
the chief, who. as in all original German courts, was only the director 
of the proceedings and questioner. Among the Germans, always and 
everywhere, sentence was pronounced by the commonality. 

Confederacies of tribes came into existence from Caesar's time. Some 
of them already had kings. The first supreme military commander began 
to aspire to despotic power, as among the Greeks and Romans, and 
sometimes succeeded in achieving it. These successful usurpers were by 
no means absolute rulers; nevertheless, they began to break the fetters 
of the gentile constitution. While freed slaves generally occupied an in- 
ferior position, because they could not be members of any gens, they 
often gained rank, wealth and honours as favourites of the new kings. 
The same thing occurred after the conquest of the Roman Empire by 
those military leaders who had now become kings of large countries. 
Among the Franks, the king's slaves and freedmen played a leading role 
first at court and then in the state: a large part of the new aristocracy 
was descended from them. 

There was one institution that especially favoured the rise of royalty: 
the military retinue. We have already seen how among the American 
Indians private war groups were formed independently of the gens. 
Among the Germans, these private associations had developed into stand- 
ing bodies. The military commander who had acquired fame, gathered 
around his person a host of booty-loving young warriors pledged to 
loyalty to him as he was to them. He fed them, gave them gifts and 
organized them on hierarchical principles: a body guard and a troop 
ready for immediate contingencies and short expeditions, a trained corps 
of officers for larger campaigns. Weak as these retinues must have 
been, as indeed they proved to be later under Odoaker in Italy, they, 
nevertheless, served as the germ of decay of the old popular liberties, 

118 



and served as such during and after the migration of peoples. Firsth, 
they created favourable soil for the rise of the royal power. Secondly, 
as Tacitus observed, they could only be held together by continuous 
warfare and plundering expeditions. Loot became the main object. If 
the chieftain found nothing to do in his neighbourhood, he marched his 
troops to other countries, where there was war and the prospect of booty. 
The German auxiliaries who under the Roman standard even fought the 
Germans in large numbers, partly consisted of such retinues. They were 
the first germs of the Landsknecht profession, the shame and curse of the 
Germans. After the conquest of the Roman Empire, these kings' retainers, 
together with the bonded and Roman courtiers, formed the major part 
of the aristocracy of later days. 

In general, then, the German tribes, combined into nations, had the 
same constitution that had developed among the Greeks of the Heroic 
Age and among the Romans at the time of the so-called kings: popular 
assemblies, councils of gentile chiefs and military commanders who were 
already aspiring to kingly power. It was the highest constitution the 
gentile order could produce; it was the model constitution of the higher 
stage of barbarism. As soon as society passed beyond the limits for which 
this constituion sufficed, the gentile order was finished. It collapsed and 
the state took its place. 



CHAPTER EIGHT 
THE FORMATION OF THE STATE AMONG THE GERMANS 

According to Tacitus the Germans were a very numerous people. An 
approximate idea of the strength of the different German peoples is given 
by Caesar; he puts the number of Usipetans and Tencterans who appeared 
on the left bank of the Rhine at 180.000, including women and children. 
Thus, about 100,000* to a people, considerably more than the Iroquois, 
for example, numbered in their most flourishing period, when 20,000 
became the terror of the w T hole country, from the Great Lakes to the Ohio 
and Potomac. If we were to attempt to group on a map the peoples of 
the Rhine country, who are better known to us from historical reports, 
we would find that such a people would occupy on the average the area 
of a Prussian administrative district, about 10,000 square kilometres, or 
182 geographical square miles.** The Germania Magna of the Romans, 
reaching to the Vistula, comprised about 500,000 square kilometres. 
Counting an average of 100,000 for any single people, the total popu- 
lation of Germania Magna would have amounted to five million; a rather 
high figure for a barbarian group of peoples, although 10 inhabitants to 
the square kilometre, or 550 to the geographical square mile, is Very 
little when compared to present conditions. But this does not include all 
the Germans then living. We know that German peoples of Gothic origin, 
Bastarnians, Peukinians and others, lived all along the Carpathian moun- 
tains away down to the mouth of the Danube. They were so numerous 
that Pliny designated them as the fifth main division of the Germans; 
in 180 B. C. they were already serving as mercenaries of the Macedonian 
King Perseus, and in the first years of the reign of Augustus they were 



* The number taken here is confirmed by a passage in Diodorus on the Celts 
of Gaul: "In Gaul live numerous peoples of unequal strength. The strongest of 
them numbers about 200,000, the weakest 50,000." (Diodorus Siculus, V, 25.) That 
gives an average of 125,000. The peoples inhabiting Gaul, being more highly de- 
veloped, must certainly have been more numerous than the Germans. — F. E. 
** I.e., German sq. miles. About 3,000 English sq. miles. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

120 



still pushing their way as far as the vicinity of Adrianopolc. If we assume 
that they numbered one million, then, at the beginning of the Christian 
era, the Germans numbered probably no less than six million. 

After the final settlement in Germany, the population must have grown 
with increasing rapidity. The industrial progress mentioned above is 
sufficient to prove it. The objects found in the bogs of Schleswig, to judge 
by the Roman coins found with them, date from the third century. Hence 
at that time the metal and textile industry was already well developed on 
the Baltic, a lively trade was carried on with the Roman Empire, and 
the wealthier class enjoyed a certain luxury — all evidences of a greater 
density of population. At this time, however, the Germans started their 
general assault along the whole line of the Rhine, the Roman Wall and 
the Danube, a line stretching from the North Sea to the Black Sea — direct 
proof of the ever growing population striving outwards. During the three 
centuries of struggle, the whole main body of the Gothic peoples, with 
the exception of the Scandinavian Goths and the Burgundians, pressed 
towards the Southeast and formed the left wing of the long line of 
attack; the High Germans (Herminonians) fought in the centre on the 
Upper Danube and the Iskaevonians, now called Franks, pushed for- 
ward on the right wing along the Rhine. The conquest of Britain fell to 
the lot of the Ingaevones. At the end of the fifth century the Roman 
Empire, exhausted, bloodless, and helpless, lay open to the invading 
Germans. 

In preceding chapters we stood at the cradle of ancient Greek and 
Roman civilization. Now we are standing at its grave. The levelling plane 
of Roman w r orld power had been gliding for centuries over all the Medi- 
terranean countries. Where the Greek language offered no resistance all 
national languages gave way to corrupted Latin. There were no longer 
any distinctions of nationality, no more Gauls, Iberians, Ligurians, 
Noricans; all had become Romans. Roman administration and Roman 
law had everywhere dissolved the old gentile bodies and thus crushed 
the last remnants of local and national self-expression. The new-fangled 
Romanism could not compensate for this loss, for it did not express any 
nationality; it only expressed lack of nationality. The elements for the 
formation of new nations existed everywhere. The Latin dialects of the 
different provinces diverged more and more; the natural boundaries that 
had once made Italy, Gaul, Spain, Africa independent territories, still 
existed and made themselves felt. Yet nowhere was there a force capable 
of combining these elements into new nations; nowhere was there the 
least trace of any capacity for development or any power of resistance, 
much less of creative power. The immense human mass of that enormous 
territory was held together by one bond alone — the Roman state; and 



121 



ihis, in time, became their worst enemy and oppressor. The provinces 

had ruined Rome; Rome itself had become a provincial town like all 
the others, privileged, but no longer ruling, no longer the centre of the 
world empire, no longer even the seat of the emperors and vice-emperors, 
who lived in Constantinople, Treves and Milan. The Roman state had 
become an immense complicated machine, designed exclusively for the 
exploitation of its subjects. Taxes, state imposts and levies of all kinds 
drove the mass of the people deeper and deeper into poverty. The extor- 
tionate practices of the procurators, tax collectors and soldiers caused 
the pressure to become intolerable. This is what the Roman state with 
its world power had brought things to: It had based its right to existence 
on the preservation of order in the interior and protection against the 
barbarians outside. But this order was worse than the worst disorder, 
and the barbarians, against whom the state pretended to protect its citizens, 
were hailed by them as saviours. 

Social conditions were no less desperate. During the last years of the 
republic, Roman rule was already based on the ruthless exploitation of 
the conquered provinces. The emperors had not abolished this exploita- 
tion; on the contrary, they had made it the rule. The more the empire 
fell into decay, the higher rose the taxes and imposts; and the more 
shamelessly the officials robbed and blackmailed the people. Commerce 
and industry were never the business of the domineering Romans. Only 
in usury did they excel all others, before and after them. The commerce 
that existed and managed to maintain itself for a time was ultimately 
ruined by official extortion ; what survived was carried on in the eastern, 
Grecian part of the empire, but this is beyond the scope of our study. 
Universal impoverishment; decline of commerce, handicrafts, the arts, 
and of the population; decay of the towns; retrogression of agriculture 
to a lower stage — this was the final result of Roman world supremacy. 

Agriculture, the most prominent branch of production in the whole 
of the ancient world, now became so more than ever. In Italy, the im- 
mense estates (latifundiae) which had covered nearly the whole country 
since the end of the republic, had been utilized in two ways; either as 
pastures, on which the population had been replaced by sheep and oxen, 
the care of which required only a few slaves; or as country estates, on 
which horticulture on a large scale had been carried on with the aid of 
masses of slaves, partly to serve the luxurious needs of the owners and 
partly for sale in the markets of the towns. The great pastures had been 
preserved and even enlarged. But the country estates and their horti- 
culture fell into ruin owing to the impoverishment of their owners and 
the decay of the towns. Latifundian economy based on slave labour was 
no longer profitable; but at that time it was the only possible form of 

122 



large-scale agriculture. Small-scale farming again became the only prof- 
itable form. Estate after estate was parcelled out and leased in small 
lots to hereditary tenants, who paid a fixed rent, or to partiarii, farm 
managers rather than tenants, who received one-sixth or even only one- 
ninth of the year's product for their work. Mainly, however, these small 
plots were distributed to colons who paid a fixed sum annually, were tied 
to the land and could be sold together with the plots. These were not 
slaves, but they were not free; they could not marry free citizens, and 
marriage with members of their own class was not regarded as valid 
marriage, but as concubinage (contubernium), as in the case of the 
slaves. They were the forerunners of the medieval serfs. 

The slavery of antiquity became obsolete. Neither in large-scale agri- 
culture in the country, nor in the manufactories of the towns did it any 
longer bring in a return for the labour put in — the market for its prod- 
ucts had disappeared. Small-scale agriculture and small handicrafts, 
to which the gigantic production of the flourishing times of the empire 
was now reduced, had no room for numerous slaves. Society found room 
only for the house and luxury slaves of the rich. But this declining slavery 
was still sufficiently virile to brand productive work as slave labour, 
unworthy of the dignity of free Romans; and everybody was now a free 
Roman. Thus, on the one hand, there was an increase in the number of 
superfluous slaves who, having become a drag on their owners, were dis- 
missed; on the other hand, there was an increase in the number of colons 
and of degraded free men (similar to the poor whites in the ex-slave 
states of America). Christianity is perfectly innocent of this gradual 
dying out of ancient slavery. It had tolerated slavery in the Roman Em- 
pire for centuries, and later did nothing to prevent the slave trade of 
Christians, either of the Germans in the North, or of the Venetians on 
the Mediterranean, or the Negro slave trade of later years.* Slavery no 
longer paid, and so it died out; but it left behind its poisonous sting by 
branding as ignoble the productive work of free men. This was the blind 
alley in which the Roman world was caught: slavery was economically 
impossible, while the labour of free men was under a moral ban. The 
one could no longer exist, the other could not yet serve as the basic form 
of social production. Only a complete revolution could save the situation. 

Things were no better in the provinces. Most of the reports we have 
concern Gaul. By the side of the colons, small free farmers still existed 
there. In order to protect themselves against the brutal extortions of the 



* According to Bishop Liutprand of Cremona, the principal industry of Verdun 
in the tenth century, that is, in the so-called Holy German Empire, was the manu- 
facture of eunuchs, who were exported with great profit to Spain for the harems 
of the Moors. — F. E. 

123 



officials, judges and usurers, they frequently placed themselves under the 
protection, the patronage, of men of influence and power; and they did 
this not only as single individuals, but in whole communities, so much 
so, that the emperors of the fourth century often issued decrees prohibit- 
ing this practice. How did this help those who sought this protection? 
The patron imposed the condition that they transfer the title of their 
lands to him, and in return he ensured them the free enjoyment of their 
land for life — a trick which the Holy Church remembered and freely 
imitated during the ninth and tenth centuries, for the greater glory of 
God and the enlargement of its own landed possessions. In the fifth cen- 
tury, however, about the year 475, Bishop Salvianus of Marseilles still 
vehemently denounced such robbery and related that the methods of the 
Roman officials and great landlords became so oppressive that many 
"Romans" fled to the districts occupied by the barbarians, and the Romans 
who had settled there feared nothing so much as falling under Roman 
rule again. That poor parents frequently sold their children into slavery 
in those days is proved by a law forbidding this practice. 

In return for liberating the Romans from their own state, the bar- 
barians appropriated two-thirds of the entire land and divided it among 
themselves. The distribution was made in accordance with the gentile 
system; as the conquerors were relatively small in number, large tracts 
remained undivided, partly in the possession of the whole people and 
partly in that of the tribes or gentes. In each gens the land was distributed 
for cultivation and pastures among the individual households in equal 
lots. We do not know whether repeated divisions took place at that time; 
at all events, this practice was soon discarded in the Roman provinces, 
and the individual allotment became saleable private property, the alo- 
dium. Forests and pastures remained undivided for common use; this 
use and the mode of cultivating the divided land was regulated by an- 
cient custom and the will of the community. The longer the gens existed in 
its village, and the more Germans and Romans merged in the course of time, 
the more the kinship character of the ties retreated before territorial ties. 
The gens disappeared in the mark community, in which, however, suffi- 
cient traces of the original kinship of the members were visible. Thus, 
the gentile constitution, at least in those countries where mark communes 
were preserved — in the North of France, in England, Germany and Scan- 
dinavia — was gradually transformed into a territorial constitution, and 
thus became capable of being fitted into a state. Nevertheless, it retained 
its natural democratic character which distinguishes the whole gentile 
order, and thus preserved a piece of the gentile constitution even in its 
enforced degeneration of later times, thereby leaving a weapon in the 
hands of the oppressed, ready to be wielded even in modern times. 

124 



The rapid disappearance of the blood tie in the gens was due to the 
fact that its organs in the tribe and the whole people had also degenerated 
as a result of the conquest. We know that rule over a subjugated people 
is incompatible with the gentile order. Here we see it on a large scale. 
The German peoples, masters of the Roman provinces, had to organize 
their conquests; but they could neither adopt the Romans as a body 
into their gentes, nor rule them with the aid of gentile organs. A substitute 
for the Roman state had to be placed at the head of the Roman local 
administrative bodies, which at first largely continued to function, and 
this substitute could only be another state. Thus, the organs of the gentile 
constitution had to be transformed into organs of the state, and owing 
to the pressure of circumstances, this had to be done very quickly. The 
first representative of the conquering people was the military com- 
mander, however. The internal and external safety of the conquered ter- 
ritory demanded that his power be increased. The moment had arrived 
for transforming military leadership into kingship. This was done. 

Let us take the kingdom of the Franks. ;Here, not only the wide domin- 
ions of the Roman state, but also all the large tracts of land that had 
not been assigned to the large and small gau and mark communities, 
especially of all the large forests, fell into the hands of the victorious 
Salians. The first thing the king of the Franks, transformed from an 
ordinary military commander into a real monarch, did was to convert 
this national property into a royal estate, to steal it from the people and 
to donate or give it in fief to his retainers. This retinue, originally com- 
posed of his personal military retainers and the rest of the sub-com- 
manders of the army, was soon augmented not only by Romans, i.e., 
Romanized Gauls, who quickly became almost indispensable to the king 
owing to their knowledge of writing, their education and familiarity 
with the language and laws of the country and with the language of 
Latin literature, but also by slaves, serfs and freed men, who constituted 
his Court and from among whom he chose his favourites. All these Were 
granted tracts of public land, first as gifts and later in the form of 
benefices — originally lasting during the lifetime of the king — and so the 
basis was laid for a new aristocracy at the expense of the people. 

But this was not all. The far flung empire could not be governed by 
means of the old gentile constitution. The council of chiefs, even if it 
had not long become obsolete, could not assemble and was replaced by 
the king's permanent retainers. The old popular assembly was still 
ostensibly preserved, but more and more as an assembly of the sub-com- 
manders of the army and the newly rising notables. The free land-owning 
peasants, the mass of the Frankish people, were exhausted and reduced 
to penury by continuous civil war and wars of conquest, the latter par- 

125 



ticularly under Charlemagne, just as the Roman farmers had been during 
the last period of the republic. These peasants, who originally had funned 
the whole army, and after the conquest of France had been its core, were 
so impoverished at the beginning of the ninth century that scarcely one 
out of five could provide the accoutrements of war. The former army of 
free peasants, called up directly by the king, was replaced by an army 
composed of dependents of the new aristocracy. Among these servants 
were also villeins, the descendants of the peasants who formerly had 
acknowledged no master but the king, and a little earlier had acknowl- 
edged no master at all, not even a king. Under Charlemagne's successors 
the ruin of the Frankish peasantry was aggravated by internal wars, the 
weakness of the royal power and corresponding usurpations of the nobles, 
whose ranks were augmented by the gau Counts, established by Charle- 
magne, who strove to make their titles hereditary. The incursions of the 
Normans completed the ruin of the peasantry. Fifty years after the death 
of Charlemagne, the Frankish Empire lay as helpless at the feet of the 
Normans as four hundred years previously the Roman Empire had lain 
at the feet of the Franks. 

Not only the external impotence, but the internal order, or rather, 
disorder, of society, was almost the same. The free Frankish peasants 
found themselves in a position similar to that of their predecessors, the 
Roman colons. Ruined by war and plunder, they had to seek the protec- 
tion of the new nobility, or the Church, for the royal power was too weak to 
protect them; but they had to pay dearly for this protection. Like the 
Gallic peasants before them, they had to transfer the titles of their land 
to their patrons, and received it back from them as tenants in different 
and varying forms, but always on (condition of performing services and 
paying dues. Once driven into this form of dependence, they gradually 
lost their personal freedom; after a few generations most of them became 
serfs. How rapidly the free peasants were degraded is shown by Irminon's 
land records of the Abbey Saint Germain de Pres, then near, now in, Paris. 
Even in Charlemagne's time, on the vast estates of this abbey, stretching 
into the surrounding country, there were 2,788 households, nearly all 
Franks with German names; 2,080 of them were colons, 35 lites,* 
220 slaves and only 8 freeholders! The custom by which the peasants 
transferred their land to the patron receiving from him only the 
usufruct of it for life, the custom denounced as ungodly by Salvianus, 
was now universally practised by the Church in its dealings with the peas- 
ants. Compulsory labour, now coming more and more into vogue, was 
modelled as much on the lines of the Roman angariae. compulsory ser- 



* I.e.. semi-free peasants. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

126 



vice for the state, as on the services rendered by the members of the 
German mark in bridge and road building and other work for common 
purposes. Thus, it looked as if, after four hundred years, the mass of 
the population had come back to the point it had started from. 

This proved two things, however: Firstly, that the social division 
and the distribution of property in the declining Roman Empire cor- 
responded entirely to the then prevailing stage of production in agri- 
culture and industry, and hence was unavoidable; secondly, that this stage 
of production had not sunk or risen to any material extent in the course 
of four hundred years, and, therefore, had necessarily produced the same 
distribution of property and the same class division of population. During 
the last centuries of the Roman Empire, the town lost its supremacy over 
the country, and did not regain it during the first centuries of German 
rule. This presupiposes a low stage of agriculture and of industry. Such 
a general condition necessarily gives rise to big ruling landowners and 
dependent small peasants. How impossible it was to graft either the 
Roman latifundian economy run with slave labour or the new large 
scale farming run with serf labour on to such a society, is proved by 
Charlemagne's very extensive experiments with his famous imperial es« 
tates, which passed away without leaving hardly a trace. These experi- 
ments were continued only by the monasteries and were fruitful only 
for them; but the monasteries were abnormal social institutions, founded 
on celibacy. They could do the exceptional, and for that very reason had 
to remain exceptions. 

Nevertheless, progress was made during these four hundred years. 
Even if in the end we find the same main classes as in the beginning, 
still, the people who constituted these classes had changed. The ancient 
slavery had disappeared; gone were also the degraded poor freemen, who 
had despised work as slavish. Between the Roman colon and the new serf 
there had been the free Frankish peasant. The "useless reminiscences and 
vain strife" of decaying Rome were dead and buried. The social classes 
of the ninth century had taken shape not amidst the demoralization of a 
declining civilization, but in the travail of a new civilization. The new 
race, masters as well as servants, were a race of men compared to their 
Roman predecessors. The relation of powerful landlords to serving 
peasants, which for the former had been the hopeless form of the decline 
of the world of antiquity, was for the latter the starting point of a new 
development. Moreover, unproductive as these four hundred years appear 
to be, they, nevertheless left one great product behind them: the modern 
nationalities, the regrouping and division of West European humanity 
for impending history. The Germans, in fact, had infused new life into 
Europe; and that is why the dissolution of the states in the German period 

i 

127 



ended, not in Norse-Saracen subjugation, but in the continued devel- 
opment from the royal benefices and patronage (commendatio) to feu- 
dalism, and in such a tremendous increase in the population that the 
drain of blood caused by the Crusades barely two centuries later could 
be borne without injury. 

What was the mysterious charm with which the Germans infused 
new vitality into dying Europe? Was it the innate magic power of the 
German race, as our jingo historians would have it? By no means. Of 
course, the Germans were a highly gifted Aryan tribe, especially at that 
time, in full process of vigorous development. It was not their specific 
national qualities that rejuvenated Europe, how r ever, but their barbarism, 
their gentile constitution. 

Their personal efficiency and bravery, their love of liberty, and their 
democratic instinct which regarded all public affairs as its own affairs, 
in short, all those qualities which the Romans had lost and which were 
alone capable of forming new states and of raising new nationalities out 
of the muck of the Roman w r orld — what w T ere they but the characteristic 
features of barbarians in the upper stage, fruits of the gentile consti- 
tution? 

If they transformed the ancient form of monogamy, reduced male 
rule in the family and gave a higher status to women than the classic 
world had ever known, what enabled them to do so, if not their bar- 
barism, their gentile customs, their still living heritage of the time of 
mother-right? 

If they were able in at least three of the most important countries — 
Germany, North of France and England — to preserve and carry over 
to the feudal state a piece of the genuine gentile constitution in the form 
of the mark communes, and thus give local cohesion and the means of 
resistance to the oppressed class, the peasants, even under the hardest 
conditions of medieval serfdom — means which neither the slaves of 
antiquity nor the modern proletarian found ready at hand — to what did 
they owe this, if not to their barbarism, their exclusively barbarian mode 
of settling in gentes? 

And lastly, if they w 7 ere able to develop and universally introduce 
the milder form of servitude which they had been practising at home, 
and which more and more displaced slavery also in the Roman Empire; 
a form which, as Fourier first stated, gave to the oppressed the means 
of their gradual emancipation as a class (fournit aux cultivateurs des 
moyens d'affranchissement collectif et progressif)* and is therefore far 



* Gave the peasants the means of their collective and gradual emancipation. 
Ed. Eng. ed. 

128 



superior to slavery, which permits only the immediate enfranchisement; 
of the individual without any transitory stage (antiquity did not know 
any abolition of slavery by a victorious rebellion) — whereas the serfs 
of the Middle Ages, step by step, achieved their emancipation as a class — 
to what was this due, if not their barbarism, thanks to which they had 
not yet arrived at complete slavery, either in the form of the ancient 
labour slavery or in that of the oriental house slavery? 

All that was vital and life-bringing that the Germans infused into 
the Roman world was barbarism. In fact, only barbarians are capable 
of rejuvenating a world labouring in the throes of a dying civilization. 
And the higher stage of barbarism, to which and in which the Germans 
worked their way up, previous to the migration of peoples, was the most 
favourable one for this process. This explains everything. 



9— 28G 



CHAPTER NINE 
BARBARISM AND CIVILIZATION 

We have traced the dissolution of the gentile order in the three great 
examples: Greek, Roman, and German. We will investigate, in conclusion, 
the general economic conditions that had already undermined the gentile 
organization of society in the upper stage of barbarism and finally 
abolished it with the advent of civilization. For this, Marx's Capital will 
be as necessary as Morgan's book. 

Growing out of the middle stage and developing further in the upper 
stage of savagery, the gens reached its prime, as far as our sources enable 
us to judge, in the lower stage of barbarism. With this stage, then, we 
will begin our investigation. 

At this stage, for which the American Indians must serve as our 
example, we find the gentile system fully developed. A tribe was divided 
up into several, in most cases, two gentes; with the increase of the popula- 
tion, these original gentes again divided into several daughter gentes, 
in relation to which the mother gens appeared as the phratry; the tribe 
itself split up into several tribes, in each of which, in most cases, we 
again find the old gentes. In some cases, at least, a confederacy united 
the kindred tribes. This simple organization was fully adequate for the 
social conditions from which it sprang. It was nothing more than the 
spontaneous, natural grouping, capable of smoothing out all internal 
conflicts likely to arise in a society organized on these lines. External 
conflicts were settled by war, which could end in the annihilation of a 
tribe, but never in its subjugation. The grandeur, and at the same time, 
the limitation of the gentile order was that it found no place for rulers 
and ruled. There was as yet no distinction between rights and duties; 
the question of whether participation in public affairs, blood revenge, or 
atonement for injuries were rights or duties never confronted the Indian; 
it would have appeared as absurd to him as the question of whether 
eating, sleeping or hunting were rights or duties. Nor could any tribe 

130 



or gens split up into different classes. This leads us to the investigation 
of the economic basis of those conditions. 

The population was very sparse: it was concentrated in the habitat 
of the tribe, surrounded by its wide hunting grounds and beyond these 
the neutral protective forests which separated it from other tribes. Divi- 
sion of labour was quite primitive; the work was simply divided between 
the two sexes. The men went to w r ar, hunted, fished, provided the raw 
material for food and the tools necessary for these pursuits. The women 
cared for the house, and prepared food and clothing; they cooked, weaved 
and sewed. Each was master in his or her own field of activity; the men 
in the forest, the women in the house. They owned the tools they made 
and used: the men, the weapons and the hunting and fishing tackle, the 
women, the household goods and utensils. The household was com- 
munistic, comprising several, and often many, families.* Whatever was 
produced and used in common, was common property: the house, the 
garden, the long boat. Here, and only here, then, do we find the "earned 
property" which jurists and economists have attributed to civilized society, 
the last false legal pretext on which modern capitalist property rests. 

But man did not everywhere remain in this stage. In Asia he found 
animals that could be domesticated and propagated in captivity. The wild 
buffalo cow had to be hunted down; the domestic cow gave birth to a 
calf once a year, and also provided milk. A number of the most advanced 
tribes — Aryans, Semites, perhaps also the Turanians — made the taming, 
and later the raising and tending of domestic animals their principal 
occupation. Pastoral tribes singled themselves out of the rest of the bar- 
barians: this was the first great social division of labour. These pastoral 
tribes not only produced more articles of food, but also a greater variety 
than the rest of the barbarians. They not only had milk, milk products 
and meat in greater abundance than the others, but also skins, wool, 
goat's hair, and the spun and woven fabrics which the growing abundance 
of the raw material brought into common use. This, for the first time, 
made a regular exchange of products possible. In the preceding stages, 
exchange could only take place occasionally; exceptional ability in man- 
ufacturing w r eapons and tools may have led to a transient division of 
labour. Thus, unquestionable remains of workshops for stone implements 
of the neolithic period have been found in many places. The artists who 
developed their ability in those workshops most probably worked for 
the community, as the permanent handicraftsmen of the Indian gentile 



* Especially on the northwest coast of America; see Bancroft. Among the 
Haidahs of the Queen Charlotte Islands some households gather as many as seven 
hundred members under one roof. Among the Nootkas, whole tribes lived under 
one roof. — F. E. 



9* 13 



order still do. At any rate, no other exchange than that within the tribe 
could exist in that stage, and even that was an exception. After the pastoral 
tribes had singled themselves out, however, we find all the conditions 
favourable for exchange between members of different tribes, and for 
its further development and establishment as a regular institution. Orig- 
inally, tribe exchanged with tribe through the agency of their gentile 
chiefs. When, however, the herds began to pass into private hands, ex- 
change between individuals predominated more and more, until eventually 
it became the sole form. The principal article which the pastoral tribes 
offered their neighbours for exchange was cattle; cattle became the com- 
modity by which all other commodities were appraised, and was every- 
where readily taken in exchange for other commodities — in short, cattle 
assumed the function of money and served as money already at this 
stage. Such was the necessity and rapidity with which the demand for a 
money commodity developed at the very beginning of exchange of com- 
modities. , 

Horticulture, probably unknown to the Asiatic barbarians of the 
lower stage, arose, at the latest, at the middle stage of barbarism, as the 
forerunner of agriculture. The climate of the Turanian Highlands does 
not admit of a pastoral life without a supply of fodder for the long and 
severe winter. Hence, the cultivation of meadows and grain was indispensa- 
ble. The same is true of the steppes north of the Black Sea. Once grain 
was grown for cattle, it soon became human food. The cultivated land 
6till remained tribal property and was assigned first to the gens, which, 
later, in its turn distributed it to the household communities for their 
use, and finally to individuals; these may have had certain rights of 
tenure, but no more. 

Of the industrial acquisitions of this stage two are particularly im- 
portant. The first is the weaving loom, the second the smelting of metal 
ore and the working up of metals. Copper, tin, and their alloy, bronze, 
were by far the most important; bronze furnished useful tools and weap- 
ons, but could not displace stone implements. Only iron could do 
that, but the production of iron was as yet unknown. Gold and silver 
were already used) for ornament and decoration, and must already have 
been of far higher value than copper and bronze. 

The increase of production in all branches — cattle breeding, agri- 
culture, domestic handicrafts — enabled human labour power to produce 
more than was necessary for its maintenance. At the same time, it in- 
creased the amount of work that daily fell to the lot of every member 
of the gens, household community, or single family. The acquisition of 
more labour power became desirable. This was furnished by war; captives 
were made slaves. Under the given historical conditions, the first great 



132 



social division of labour, by increasing the productivity of labour, i.e., 
wealth, and enlarging the field of production, necessarily carried slavery 
in its wake. Out of the first great social division of labour arose the first 
great division of society into two classes: masters and slaves, exploiters 
and exploited. 

How and when the herds were converted from the common property 
of the tribe, or gens, into the property of the individual heads of fam- 
ilies, we do not know to this day; but it must have occurred, in the 
main, in this stage. The herds and the other new objects of wealth brought 
about a revolution in the family. Procuring the means of subsistence had 
always been the business of the man; he manufactured and owned the 
tools of production. The herds were the new tools of production, and 
their original taming and tending was his work. Hence, he owned the 
cattle and the commodities, and the slaves obtained in exchange for them. 
All the surplus now resulting from production fell to the man; the 
woman shared in consuming it, but she had no share in owning it. The 
"savage" warrior and hunter had been content to occupy second place 
in the house and give precedence to the woman. The "gentler" shepherd, 
backed by his wealth, pushed forward to first place and forced the woman 
into second place. And she could not complain. Division of labour in 
the family had regulated the distribution of property between man and 
wife. This division of labour remained unchanged, and yet it put the 
former domestic relation topsy turvy simply because the division of 
labour outside the family had changed. The very cause that had formerly 
made the woman supreme in the house, viz., her being confined to domestic 
work, now assured supremacy for the man: the woman's housework lost 
its significance compared with the man's work in obtaining a livelihood; 
the latter was everything, the former a negligible auxiliary. Here we see 
already that the emancipation of women and their equality with men 
are impossible and must remain so as long as women are excluded from 
social production and restricted to housework. The emancipation of 
women becomes possible only when women are enabled to take part in 
production on a large, social scale, and when domestic duties require 
their attention only to a minor degree. And this has become possible 
only as a result of modern large-scale industry, which not only permits 
of the participation of women in production in large numbers, but actu- 
ally calls for it and, moreover, strives to convert domestic work also 
into a public industry. 

The achievement of actual supremacy in the house threw down the 
last barrier to the man's autocracy. This autocracy was confirmed and 
perpetuated by the overthrow of mother-right, the introduction of father- 
right and the gradual transition from the pairing family to monogamy. 

133 



This made a breach in the old gentile order: The monogamie family 
became a power and rose threateningly against the gens. 

The next step brings us to the upper stage of barbarism, the period 
in which all civilized nations passed through their Heroic Age: it is the 
period of the iron sword, but also of the iron ploughshare and axe. Iron 
became the servant of man, the last and most important of all raw mate- 
rials that played a historical, revolutionary role, the last — if we except 
the potato. Iron made possible agriculture on a larger scale and 'the 
clearing of extensive forest tracts for cultivation; it gave the craftsman 
a tool of such hardness and sharpness that no stone, no other known 
metal, could withstand it. All this came about gradually; the first iron 
produced was often softer than bronze. Thus, stone implements disap- 
peared very slowly; stone axes were still used in battle not only in the 
Hildebrand Song, but also at the battle of Hastings, in 1066. But prog- 
ress was now irresistible, less interrupted and more rapid. The town, 
inclosing houses of stone or brick w r ithin its turreted and crested stone 
walls, became the central seat of the tribe or confederacy of tribes. It 
marked rapid progress in the art of building; but it was also a symptom 
of increased danger and of the need for protection. Wealth increased 
rapidly, but it was the wealth of private individuals. Weaving, metal work 
and the other crafts that were becoming more and more specialized dis- 
played increasing variety and artistic finish in their products; agriculture 
now provided not only cereals, leguminous plants and fruit, but also 
oil and wine, /the preparation of which had now been learned. Such diverse 
activities could not be conducted by any single individual; the second 
great division of labour took place: handicrafts separated from agriculture. 
The continued increase of production and w 7 ith it the increased produc- 
tivity of labour enhanced the value of human labour power. Slavery, 
which had been a rising and sporadic factor in the preceding stage, now 
became an essential part of the social system. The slaves ceased to be 
simply assistants, they were now driven in scores to work in the fields 
and workshops. The division of production into two great branches, 
agriculture and handicrafts, gave rise to production for exchange, the 
production of commodities; and with it came trade, not only in the in- 
terior and on the tribal boundaries, but also overseas. All this was still 
very undeveloped; the precious metals gained preference as the universal 
money commodity, but it was not yet minted and was exchanged merely 
by bare weight. 

The distinction between rich and poor was added to that between 
free men and slaves — and with the new division of labour came a new 
class division of society. The differences in the wealth of the various 
heads of families caused the old communistic households to break up 

134 



wherever they had still been preserved; and this put an end to the com- 
mon cultivation of the soil for the account of the community. The cul- 
tivated land was assigned for use to the several families, first for a 
limited time and later in perpetuity; the transition to complete private 
ownership was accomplished gradually and simultaneously with the trans- 
ition from the pairing family to monogamy. The individual family began 
to be the economic unit of society. 

The increased density of the population necessitated closer consolida- 
tion against internal and external foes. The federation of kindred tribes 
became a necessity, and soon after, their amalgamation; and thence the 
amalgamation of the separate tribal territories into one national territory. 
The military commander — rex, basileus, thiudans — became an indispensa- 
ble and permanent official. The popular assembly was instituted wher- 
ever it did not yet exist. The military commander, the council of chiefs, 
and the popular assembly formed the organs of the military democracy 
that had grown out of the gentile constitution. A military democracy — ■ 
because war and organization for war were now regular functions of 
national life. The wealth of the neighbours excited the greed of the peo- 
ples who began to regard the acquisition of wealth as one of the main 
purposes of life. They were barbarians: plunder appeared to them easier 
and even more honourable than production. War, once waged simply to 
avenge aggression or as a means of enlarging territory that had become too 
restricted, was now waged for the sake of plunder alone, and became a 
regular profession. It was not for nothing that threatening walls towered 
around the new fortified towns: their yawning moats were the graves of 
the gentile constitution, and their turrets already reached up into civi- 
lization. Internal affairs underwent a similar change. The robber wars 
increased the power of the supreme military commander as well as of 
the sub-commanders. The customary election of successors from one 
family, especially after the introduction of father-right, was gradually 
transformed into hereditary succession, first tolerated, then claimed and 
finally usurped; the foundation of hereditary royalty and hereditary 
nobility was laid. In this manner the organs of the gentile constitution 
were gradually torn from their roots in the people, tribe, phratry and 
gens, and the whole gentile order was transformed into its antithesis: 
from an organization of tribes for the free adminstration of their own 
affairs it was transformed into an organization for plundering and op- 
pressing their neighbours; and correspondingly, its organs were trans- 
formed from instruments of the will of the people into the independent 
organs for ruling and oppressing their own people. This could not have 
happened had not the greed for wealth divided the members of the gentes 
into rich and poor; had not the "difference of property in a gens changed 

135 



the community of interest into antagonism between members of a gens" 
(Marx) ; and had not the growth of slavery already begun to cause working 
for a living to be branded as slavish and more ignominious than engag- 
ing in plunder. » 



This brings us to the threshold of civilization. This stage is inaugur- 
ated by further progress in division of labour. In the lower stage of 
barbarism production was carried on for use only; exchange was con- 
fined to single cases when a surplus was accidentally obtained. In the 
middle stage of barbarism we find that the pastoral peoples have in 
their cattle a form of property which, with sufficiently large herds, can 
regularly provide a surplus over and above their needs; and we also 
find a division of labour between the pastoral peoples and backward 
tribes without herds, so that there were two different stages of production 
side by side, which created the conditions for regular exchange. The upper 
stage of barbarism introduced a new division of labour as between agri- 
culture and handicrafts, resulting in the production of a continually in- 
creasing quantity of commodities especially for the purpose of exchange, 
so that exchange between individual producers became a vital necessity 
for society. Civilization strengthened and increased all the established 
divisions of labour, particularly by intensifying the antagonism between 
town and country (either the town may have economic supremacy over 
the country, as was the case in antiquity, or vice versa, as in the Middle 
Ages) and added a third division of labour, peculiar to itself and vitally 
important: it created a class that took no part in production, but engaged 
exclusively in exchanging products — the merchants. All previous trends 
towards the formation of classes w r ere exclusively connected with pro- 
duction; they divided those engaged in production into supervisors and 
supervised, or into producers on a large scale and producers on a small 
scale. Here, however, a class appears for the first time which, without 
taking any part in production, captures control of production in general 
and economically subjugates the producers to its rule; a class that makes 
itself the indispensable intermediary between two producers and exploits 
them both. On the pretext of saving the producers the trouble and risk 
of exchange, of finding distant markets for their products, and so claiming 
to have become the most useful class in society, a class of parasites arises, 
genuine social ichneumones, who, as a reward for very insignificant real 
services, skim the cream off production at home and abroad, rapidly 
amass enormous wealth and corresponding social influence, and for this 
reason reap ever new honours and gain increasing control over production 

136 



during the period of civilization, until they at last create a product of 
their own — periodical commercial crises. 

At the stage of development we are discussing, our young merchant 
class had no inkling as yet of the big things that were in store for it. 
But it continued to grow and make itself indispensable, and that was 
sufficient. With it, however, metal money, minted coins, came into use, 
and with this a new means by which the non-producer could rule the 
producers and their products. The commodity of commodities which con- 
cealed within itself all other commodities was discovered; the charm 
that could be transformed at will into anything desirable and desired. 
Whoever possessed it ruled the world of production; and who had it 
above all others? The merchant. In his hands the cult of money was safe. 
He took care to make it plain that all commodities, and hence all pro- 
ducers, must grovel in the dust before money. He proved by practice 
that all other forms of wealth were mere semblances compared with this 
incarnation of wealth as such. Never has the power of money revealed 
itself with such primitive crudity and violence as it did in this period 
of its youth. After the sale of commodities for money came the borrowing 
of money, resulting in interest and usury. And no legislation of any later 
period throws the debtor so pitilessly and helplessly at the feet of the 
usurious creditor as the ancient Greek and Roman codes — both the spon- 
taneous products of common law, exclusively the result of economic 
pressure. 

Besides wealth in commodities and slaves, and besides money wealth, 
wealth in the form of land came into being. The titles of individuals to 
land formerly assigned to them by the igens or tribe had become so well 
established that it became their hereditary property. The thing they hadi 
been striving for most just before that time was liberation from the claim 
of the gentile community to their land, a claim which had become a 
veritable fetter for them. They were freed from this fetter — but soon after 
they were also freed from their land. The full, free ownership of land 
implies not only unrestricted and uncurtailed possession, but also the 
right to sell. As long as the land belonged to the gens this was impossible. 
But when the new landowner shook off the chains of the superior claim 
of the gens and tribe, he also tore the bond that had so long tied him 
inseparably to the soil. What that meant was made plain to him by the 
money invented simultaneously with the advent of private property in 
land. Land could now become a commodity which could be sold and 
pledged. Hardly had the private ownership of land been introduced than 
mortgage was discovered (see Athens). Just as hetaerism and prostitution 
clung to the heels of monogamy, so from now on mortgage clung to 

137 



private ownership of land. You clamoured for frrr. full, saleable land. 
Well, here you have it — tu Fas voulu, Georges Dandin! 

Commercial expansion, money, usury, landed properly and mortgage 
were thus accompanied by the rapid concentration and centralization of 
wealth in the hands of a small class, on the one hand, and by the in- 
creasing impoverishment of the masses and a growing mass of paupers 
on the other. The new aristocracy of wealth, in so far as it did not from 
the outset coincide with the old tribal aristocracy, forced the latter per- 
manently into the background (in Athens, in Rome, among the Germans). 
And this division of free men into classes according to their wealth was 
accompanied, especially in Greece, by an enormous increase in the 
number of slaves* whose forced labour formed the basis on which the 
whole superstructure of society w r as reared. 

Let us now see what became of the gentile constitution as a result 
of this social revolution. It stood powerless in face of the new elements 
that had grown up without its aid. It was dependent on the condition 
that the members of a gens, or of a tribe, should live together in the same 
territory and be its sole inhabitants. This had long ceased to be the case. 
Gentes and tribes were everywhere mixed up; everywhere slaves, wards 
and foreigners lived among the citizens. The settled state which had 
been acquired only towards the end of the middle stage of barbarism 
was time and again interrupted by migrations and changes of abode, owing 
to the dictates of commerce, changes of occupation and the transfer of 
land. The members of the gentile organization could no longer meet for 
the purpose of discussing their common affairs; only matters of little 
importance, such as religious festivals, were still indifferently observed. 
Beside the wants and interests for the care of which the gentile organs 
were appointed and fitted, new wants and interests had arisen from the 
revolution in the conditions of existence and the resulting change in 
social classification. These new wants and interests were not only alien 
to the old gentile order, but thwarted it in every way. The interests of 
the groups of craftsmen created by division of labour, and the special 
needs of the towns as opposed to the country, required new organs; but 
each of these groups was composed of people from different gentes, phra- 
tries, and tribes; they even included aliens. Hence, the new organs neces- 
sarily had to form outside the gentile constitution, parallel with it, and 
that meant against it. And again, in every gentile organization the con- 
flict of interests made itself felt and reached its apex by combining rich 
and poor, usurers and debtors, in the same gens and tribe. Then there 



* The number of slaves in Athens was 365,000. In Corinth, at its zenith, it 
was 460",000, and in Aegina 470,000: in both, ten times the number of free cit- 
izens. — F. E t 

138 



was the mass of inhabitants, strangers to the gentile communities, who, 
as in Rome, could become a power in the land, and were too numerous 
to be gradually absorbed by the consanguine gentes and tribes. The gen- 
tile communities confronted these masses as exclusive, privileged bodies; 
what had originally been a natural democracy had been transformed into 
a hateful aristocracy. Lastly, the gentile constitution had grown out of 
a society that knew no internal antagonisms, and was adapted only to 
such a society. It had no coercive power except public opinion. But now 
a society had developed that by the force of all its economic conditions 
of existence had to split up into freemen and slaves, into exploiting rich 
and exploited poor; a society that was not only incapable of reconciling 
these antagonisms, but was driving them more and more to a .head. Such 
a society could only exist, either in a state of continuous, open struggle 
of these classes against one another, or under the rule of a third power 
which, while ostensibly standing above the struggling classes, suppressed 
their open conflict and permitted a class struggle only on the economic 
field, in a so-called legal form. The gentile constitution died out. It was 
destroyed by the division of labour and by its result, the division of society 
into classes. Its place was taken by the state. 



In the preceding chapters we discussed separately each of the three 
main forms in which the state was built up on the ruins of the gentile 
constitution. Athens represented the purest, classical form: here the state 
sprang directly and mainly out of class antagonisms that developed within 
gentile society. In Rome the gentile organization became an exclusive 
aristocracy amidst numerous plebeians, standing outside of it, having no 
rights, but only duties. The victory of the plebeians burst the old gentile 
constitution asunder and erected on its ruins the state, in which both the 
gentile aristocracy and the plebeians were soon absorbed. Finally, among 
the German conquerors of the Roman Empire, the state sprang up as 
a direct result of the conquest of large foreign territories, which the 
gentile constitution had no means of controlling. As this conquest did 
not necessitate either a serious struggle with the indigenous population 
or a more advanced division of labour, and as conquerors and conquered 
were almost in the same stage of economic development, the economic 
basis of society remained unchanged, and the gentile constitution could 
continue for many centuries in a changed, territorial form in the shape 
of a mark constitution, and even rejuvenate itself for a time in a modified 



139 



form in the aristocratic and patrician families of later years, or even 
in peasant families, as e.g., in Dithmarschcn.* 

The state, then, is by no means a power forced on society from outside; 
nor is it the "reality of the moral idea," "the image and the reality of 
reason," as Hegel maintains. It is rather a product of society at a certain 
stage of development; it is the admission that this society has become 
entangled in an insoluble contradiction with itself, that it is cleft into 
irreconcilable antagonisms which it is powerless to dispel. In order that 
these antagonisms, these classes with conflicting economic interests may 
not annihilate each other and society in sterile struggle, a power, ap- 
parently standing above society, became necessary for the purpose of 
moderating the conflict and keeping it within the bounds of "order"; 
and this power, arising out of society, but placing itself over it, and in- 
creasingly alienating itself from it, is the state. 

The state differs from the old gentile organization, firstly, in that 
it divides its citizens according to territory. As we have seen, the old 
gentile communities, built upon and held together by ties of blood, became 
inadequate, largely because they assumed that the members were bound 
to a given territory, a condition which had long ceased to exist. The 
territory remained, but the people became more mobile. Hence, division 
according to territory was taken as the point of departure, and citizens 
were allowed to exercise their rights and duties wherever they settled, 
irrespective of gens and tribe. This organization of citizens according to 
territory is a feature common to all states. That is why it seems natural 
to us; but we have seen what long and arduous struggles were needed 
before it could replace, in Athens and Rome, the old organization accord- 
ing to tribes. 

The second is the establishment of a public power of coercion which 
no longer coincided with the people organized as an armed force. This 
special power of coercion was necessary, because an independent armed 
organization of the population became impossible with the division of 
society into classes. The slaves also belonged to the population; the 
90,000 citizens of Athens formed only a privileged class as against the 
365,000 slaves. The people's army of the Athenian democracy was an 
aristocratic public power as against the slaves, whom it kept in restraint; 
we have seen, however, that a gendarmerie also became necessary to keep 
the citizens in restraint, as we related above. This public power of coer- 
cion exists in every state; it is not only composed of armed men, but 
also of material accessories such as prisons and institutions of coercion 



* The first historian who had at least an approximate idea of the nature of 
the gens was Niebuhr, thanks to his knowledge of the Dithmarschen families^ 
which, however, is also responsible for his errors, — F. E. 

140 



of all kinds, of which gentile society knew nothing. It may be very insig* 
nificant, almost infinitesimal, in societies where class antagonisms are 
undeveloped and in out of the way places, as was the case in certain 
times and in certain regions in the United States. It becomes stronger, 
however, in proportion as class antagonisms in the state become more 
acute, and as neighbouring states become larger and more populated. 
It is sufficient to glance at our modern Europe, where the class struggles 
and rivalry in conquest have raised the public power to such a height that 
it threatens to swallow the whole of society and the state itself. 

In order to maintain this public power, contributions from the citizens 
become necessary — taxes. These were absolutely unknown in gentile 
society; but we know enough about them today. As civilization advances, 
these taxes become inadequate; the state makes drafts on the future, 
contracts loans, public debts. Old Europe can tell a tale about these too. 

In possession of the public power and of the right to impose taxes, 
the officials are now organs of society standing over society. The free 
and voluntary respect that was accorded to the organs of the gentile con- 
stitution does not satisfy them, even if they could get it; being the repre- 
sentatives of a power that is divorced from society, respect for them must 
be enforced by means of exceptional laws which make them specially 
sacred and inviolable. The lowest police officer in the civilized state has 
more "authority" than all the organs of gentile society put together; but 
the most powerful prince and the greatest statesman, or general, of civi- 
lization may envy the humblest gentile sachem for the spontaneous and 
undisputed respect that was paid to him. The one stood in the midst of 
society, the other is forced to assume a position outside and over it. 

The state came into existence owing to the necessity of curbing class 
antagonisms; but having arisen amidst these conflicts, it, as a rule, is the 
state of the most powerful class, the class which rules in economics and 
with its aid, becomes also the class which rules in politics, and thus ac- 
quires new means of holding down and exploiting the oppressed class. 
Thus, the state of antiquity was the state of the slave owners for the 
purpose of holding down the slaves, as the feudal state was the organ 
of the nobility for holding down the peasant serfs and bondsmen, and 
the modern representative state is a tool for the exploitation of wage 
labour by capital. There are periods in which, as an exception, the con- 
flicting classes balance each other so nearly that the public power for a 
time gains a certain degree of independence of both, seemingly as a 
mediator between them. Such was the case with the absolute monarchy of 
the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries which held the balance between 
the nobility and the burghers; such was the case with Bonapartism in the 
First, and still more in the Second Empire, which played the proletariat 



141 



against the bourgeoisie and the bourgeoisie against the proletariat. The 
latest performance of this kind, in which ruler and ruled appear equally 
ridiculous, is the new German Empire of the Bismarck nation: here 
capitalists and workers are balanced against each other and equally 
cheated for the benefit of the depraved Prussian cabbage junkers. 

In most of the historical states, the rights of citizens are apportioned 
according to their wealth, thus directly expressing the fact that the state 
is organized for the protection of the possessing class against the non- 
possessing class. This was already seen in the Athenian and Roman prop- 
city qualifications. It was seen in the medieval feudal state, in which 
political power was commensurate with the amount of land owned. It is 
seen in the electoral qualifications of the modern representative states. 
The political recognition of differences in wealth is by no means essential. 
On the contrary, it marks a low stage of state development. The highest 
form of the state, the democratic republic, the form of state which under 
our modern conditions of society is more and more becoming an un- 
avoidable necessity, and in which alone the last decisive struggle between 
proletariat and bourgeoisie can be fought out — the democratic republic 
officially knows nothing of property distinctions. In it wealth exercises 
its power indirectly, but all the more surely. This is done either by the 
direct corruption of officials, of which the United States provides the 
classical example, or by an alliance between the government and Stock 
Exchange, which becomes easier to achieve the more the public debt in- 
creases and the more joint stock companies concentrate in their hands 
not only the means of transport, but also production itself, using the Stock 
Exchange as their centre. The United States and the latest French repub- 
lic are striking examples; and good old Switzerland has contributed 
its share in this field. That a democratic republic is not essential for this 
bond of fraternity between the government and the Stock Exchange is 
proved by England and also by the new German Empire, where it is 
difficult to say who was elevated most by universal suffrage, Bismarck or 
Bleichroeder. And lastly, the possessing class rules directly through the 
medium of universal suffrage. As long as the oppressed class, in our case 
the proletariat, is not yet ripe to emancipate itself, the majority of them 
will regard the existing order of society as the only one possible, and, 
politically, will form the tail of the capitalist class, its extreme left wing. 
To the extent, however, that the proletariat matures for its self-emancipa- 
tion, it will constitute itself as its own party and elect its own represen- 
tatives, and not the capitalists'. Thus, universal suffrage is the gauge of 
the maturity of the working class. It cannot and never will be anything 
more in the modern state; but that is sufficient. On the day the ther- 



142 



mometer of universal suffrage registers boiling point among the workers, 
both they and the capitalists will know what it is all about. 

The state, then, has not existed from all eternity. There have been 
societies that did without it, that had no idea of what the stale and state 
power mean. At a certain stage of economic development, which was 
necessarily accompanied by the division of society into classes, the state 
became necessary as a result of this division. We are now rapidly ap- 
proaching a stage in the development of production in which the existence 
of classes not only ceases to be a necessity, but becomes a positive fetter 
on production. They will fall as inevitably as they arose. With them the 
state will inevitably fall. The society that will reorganize production on 
the basis of the free and equal association of the producers will put the 
machinery of state where it will then belong: into the Museum of Anti- 
quities by the side of the spinning wheel and the bronze axe. 



Thus, from the foregoing we have seen that civilization is that stage 
of society in which division of labour, the resulting exchange between 
individuals, and the production of commodities which combines the two, 
reach their fullest development and revolutionize the whole of hitherto 
existing society. 

Production in all former stages of society was mainly collective, and 
consumption took place by the direct distribution of the products within 
larger or smaller communistic communities. This production in common 
was carried on within the narrowest limits, but the producers were masters 
of the process of production and of the product. They knew what became 
of the product: they consumed it, it did not leave their hands; and as 
long as production was carried on on this basis, it could not grow beyond 
the control of the producers, and it could not raise any strange, phantom 
forces against them, as is the regular and inevitable rule under civi- 
lization. 

But gradually, division of labour permeated this process of produc- 
tion. It undermined the collective nature of production and appropriation, 
it made appropriation by individuals the prevailing rule, and thus intro- 
duced exchange between individuals — how this came about, we examined 
above. Gradually, the production of commodities became the prevailing 
form. 

With the production of commodities, in which production is not car- 
ried on to satisfy one's own needs, but for the purpose of exchange, the 
products necessarily pass from hand to hand. The producer parts with 
his product in the course of exchange; he no longer knows what becomes 



143 



of it. With the advent of money, and with it of the merchant, who fcteJM 
in as a middleman between the producers, the process of exchange becomes 
still more complicated; the ultimate fate of the product becomes still 
more uncertain. The merchants are numerous and one does not know 
what the other is doing. Commodities now pass not only from hand to 
hand, but also from market to market. The producers have lost control 
of production in their various spheres, and the merchants have not ac- 
quired it. Products and production become the playthings of chance. 

But chance is only one pole of an interrelation, the other pole of which 
is called necessity. In nature, where chance also seems to reign, we have 
long ago demonstrated the innate necessity and law that determines this 
chance in each particular field. What is true of nature, holds good also 
for society. The more a social function, or series of social phenomena, 
becomes too powerful for conscious human control, grows beyond human 
reach ; the more it seems to have been left to pure chance, the more does 
its peculiar and innate laws operate in this chance, as if by natural 
necessity. Such laws also control the fortuities of the production and 
exchange of commodities; these laws confront the individual producers 
and exchangers as strange and, at first, even as unknown forces, the nature 
of which must be laboriously investigated and ascertained. These eco- 
nomic laws of production are modified by the different stages of devel- 
opment of this form of production; on the whole, however, the entire 
period of civilization has been dominated by these laws. To this day, the 
product is master of the producer; to this day, the total production of 
society is regulated, not by a collectively thought-out plan, but by blind 
law r s, which operate with elemental force, in the last resort, in the storms 
of periodical commercial crises. 

We saw above that human labour power was able at a very early 
stage of production to produce considerably more than was needed for 
the producer's maintenance, and that this stage, in the main, coincided 
with the first appearance of the division of labour and of exchange be- 
tween individuals. Now, it was not long before the great "truth" was 
discovered that man, too, may be a commodity, and that human labour 
power may be exchanged and exploited by converting a man into a 
slave. Men had barely started to engage in exchange when men themselves 
were exchanged. The active became a passive, whether man wanted it 
or not. 

With slavery, which reached its fullest development in civilization, 
came the first great division of society into an exploiting and an exploited 
class. This division has continued during the whole period of civilization. 
Slavery was the first form of exploitation, peculiar to the world of anti- 
quity; it was followed by serfdom in the Middle Ages, and by w T age 

144 



labour in modern limes. These are the three great forms of servitude, 
characteristic of the three great epochs of civilization; open and, in 
modern times, disguised slavery has always accompanied it. 

The stage of commodity production, with which civilization began, 
is marked economically by the introduction of (1) metal money and, 
thus, of money capital, interest and usury; (2) the merchants acting as 
middlemen between producers; (3) private ownership of land and mort- 
gage; (4) slave labour as the prevailing form of production. The form 
of the family corresponding to civilization and under it becoming the 
definitely prevailing form is monogamy, the supremacy of the man over 
the woman, and the individual family as the economic unit of society. 
The binding force of civilized society is the state, which in all the typical 
periods is exclusively the state of the ruling class, and in all cases essen- 
tially a machine for keeping down the oppressed and exploited class. Other 
marks of civilization are : on the one hand, the permanent antithesis between 
town and country as the basis of the entire division of social labour; on 
the other hand, the introduction of the bequest, by which the property 
holder is able to dispose of his property even after his death. This institu- 
tion, which was a direct blow at the old gentile constitution, was unknown 
in Athens until the time of Solon; in Rome it was introduced very early, 
but we do not know when.* Among the Germans it was introduced by the 
priests in order that the honest German might without hindrance bequeath 
his property to the Church. 

With this fundamental constitution, civilization has accomplished 
things for which the old gentile society was totally unfitted. But it accom- 
plished them by playing on the most sordid instincts and passions of 
man, and by developing them at the expense of all his other faculties. 
Naked greed has been the moving spirit of civilization from the first day 
of its existence to the present time ; wealth, more wealth and wealth again ; 
wealth, not for society, but for this miserable individual, was its sole and 
determining aim. If, in the pursuit of this aim, the increasing development 
of science and repeated periods of the fullest blooming of art fell into its lap, 



* Lassalle's System der erworbenen Rechte {System of Acquired Rights) turns, 
in its second part, mainly around the proposition that the Roman bequest is as old 
as Rome itself, and that in Roman history there was never "a time when the be- 
quest did not exist"; that the bequest arose in pre-Roman times out, of the cult of 
the dead. As a confirmed Hegelian of the old school, Lassalle traced the provisions 
of the Roman law, not to the social condition of the Romans, but to the "speculative 
conception" of will, and thus arrives at this totally anti-historic assertion. This is 
not to be wondered at in a book that from the same speculative conception draws 
the conclusion that the transfer of property was purely a secondary matter in 
Roman inheritance. Lassalle not only believes in the illusions of Roman jurists, 
especially of the earlier ones, but he even excels them. — F. E. 



10— 28G 



145 



it was only because without them the full realization of the attributes of 
wealth would have been impossible in our time. 

Since the exploitation of one class by another is the basis of civiliza- 
tion, its whole development moves in a continuous contradiction. Every 
advance in the sphere of production is at the same time a retrogression 
in the conditions of the oppressed class, that is, of the great majority. 
What is a boon for one is bane for another; the emancipation of 
one class always means the oppression of another class. The most 
striking proof of this is furnished by the introduction of machinery, 
the effects of which are well knowm today. And while among barbarians, 
as w r e have seen, hardly any distinction could be made between rights 
and duties, civilization makes the difference and contradiction between 
these two plain even to the dullest mind by giving one class nearly all the 
rights and assigning to the other class nearly all the duties. 

But this is not what ought to be. What is good for the ruling class 
should be good for the whole of society, with which the ruling class 
identifies itself. That is w r hy the more civilization advances, the more it 
is compelled to cover the evils it necessarily creates w 7 ith the cloak of 
love, to excuse them, or to deny their existence; in short, to introduce 
conventional hypocrisy — unknown both in previous forms of society and 
in the earliest stages of civilization — that culminates in the declaration: 
The exploiting class exploits the oppressed class solely in the interest of 
the exploited class itself; and if the latter fails to recognize this, and 
even becomes rebellious, it thereby shows the worst ingratitude to its bene- 
factors, the exploiters.* 

And now, in conclusion, let me add Morgan's verdict on civilization : 

"Since the advent of civilization, the outgrowth of property has been 
so immense, its forms so diversified, its uses so expanding and its man- 
agement so intelligent in the interest of its owners that it has become, 
on the part of the people, an unmanageable power. The human mind 
stands bewildered in the presence of its own creation. The time will come, 
nevertheless, when human intelligence will rise to the mastery over prop- 
erty, and define the relations of the state to the property it protects, as 
well as the obligations and the limits of the rights of its owners. The 



* I had intended at the outset to place the brilliant critique of civilization, 
scattered through the works of Fourier, by the side of Morgan's and my own. 
Unfortunately, I cannot spare the time. I only wish to remark that Fourier already 
considered monogamy and private property in land as the main characteristics of 
civilization, and that he described them as a war of the rich against the poor. We 
also find in his work the deep appreciation of the fact that in all imperfect societies, 
those torn by conflicting interests, the individual families (les families incoherentes) 
are the economic units. — F. E. 

146 



interests of society are paramount to individual interests, and the two 
must be brought into just and harmonious relations. A mere property 
career is not the final destiny of mankind, if progress is to be the law 
of the future as it has been of the past. The time which has passed away 
since civilization began is but a fragment of the past duration of man's 
existence; and but a fragment of the ages yet to come. The dissolution 
of society bids fair to become the termination of a career of which prop- 
erty is the end and aim, because such a career contains the elements 
of self-destruction. Democracy in government, brotherhood in society, 
equality in rights and privileges, and universal education, foreshadow 
the next higher plane of society to which experience, intelligence and 
knowledge are steadily tending. It will be a revival, in a higher form, 
of the liberty, equality and fraternity of the ancient gentes." (Morgan, 
Ancient Society, pp. 561-62.) 



io< 



APPENDIX 



F. ENGELS 

A NEWLY DISCOVERED CASE OF GROUP MARRIAGE 

(From Neue Zeit, 1892, Vol. XI, No. 1, pp. 373-75) 

Recently it has become the fashion among certain rationalist ethnog- 
raphists to deny the existence of group marriage. Hence, the following 
report, which I have translated from Russkie Vedomosti {Russian Ga- 
zette), Moscow, October 14, 1892, Old Style, will be of interest. Not only 
is group marriage, e.g., the right of sexual intercourse between a number 
of men and a number of women, expressly stated to be in full practice, 
but it is shown to bear a form closely identical with the punalua marriage 
of the Hawaiians, that is, one of the most developed and most classical 
phases of group marriage. Whereas the typical punaluan family consisted 
of a number of brothers (natural and remote) married to a number of 
natural and remote sisters, on the Island of Sakhalin we find that a man 
is married to all his brothers' wives and to all his wife's sisters, which, 
from the female viewpoint, means that his wife has the right to have 
free sexual intercourse with her husband's brothers and her sisters' hus- 
bands. Thus, the only difference between this and the typical form of 
punalua marriage is that the husband's brothers and the sisters' husbands 
are not necessarily the same persons. 

It is to be observed, further, that the report also confirms what I 
stated in The Origin of the Family, 4th edition, pp. 28-29*: that group 
marriage is not quite so horrible as is imagined by the philistine fancy 
accustomed to the brothel system ; that the people married in groups do 
not lead openly anything like the life of depravity that the philistine 
leads in secret; and that this form of marriage, at least in those examples 
of it that still exist today, differs in practice from the loose pairing mar- 
riage, or from polygamy, only in that custom allows a number of cases 
of sexual intercourse which under other circumstances would be severelv 



See p. 38 in this volume. — Ed. Eng. ed. 

151 



punished. The fact that the exercise of this right is gradually dying out 
only proves that this form of marriage is doomed to extinction, which 
is confirmed by the rarity of the cases met with now. 

For the rest, the whole description is interesting for the reason that 
it shows once again how similar, and in fundamentals identical, is the 
social organization of these primitive people who are in about the same 
etage of development. Most of what is related about these Mongoloids 
of Sakhalin applies to the Dravidian tribes of India, to the South Sea 
Islanders at the time of their discovery, and to the American Indians. 
The report states: 

"At a meeting of the Anthropological Section of the Friends of Nat- 
ural History Society, held on October 10 (October 22, New Style), 
N. A. Yanchuk reported on an interesting communication made by 
Mr. Sternberg on the Sakhalin Giliaks, a tribe that has been little inves- 
tigated, and living on the cultural level of savages. The Giliaks know 
neither agriculture nor the art of pottery; they obtain their means of 
subsistence mainly by hunting and fishing; they heat water in a wooden 
trough by dropping red hot stones into it, etc. Particularly interesting 
are their family and gens institutions. A Giliak calls his fathers, not only 
his natural father, but all the latter's brothers; the wives of these broth- 
ers, as well as his mother's sisters, he calls his mothers; and the children 
of all the relations just enumerated, he calls his brothers and sisters. As 
is well known, a similar terminology prevails among the Iroquois and 
other Indians in North America, as well as among some tribes in India. 
Among these, however, this terminology no longer corresponds to existing 
conditions, whereas among the Giliaks it serves to designate conditions 
that exist to this day. Even today every Giliak has conjugal rights to the 
wives of his brothers and the sisters of his wife; at all events, the exercise 
of these rights is not regarded as a transgression. These survivals of group 
marriage are reminiscent of the celebrated punalua family, which still 
existed in the Sandwich Islands in the first half of the present century. 
This form of family and gens relationship serves as the basis of the 
Giliaks' social and gentile organization. 

A Giliak's gens consists of all his father's brothers (near and remote, 
actual and nominal), their fathers and mothers (?), his brothers' children 
and his own children. Naturally, a gens constituted in this way may have 
a very large number of members. The life of the gens proceeds on the 
following principles. Marriage in the gens is absolutely prohibited. The 
wife of a deceased Giliak passes, on the decision of the gens, to one of 
his brothers, own or nominal. The gens maintains all its members who 
are unfit to work. 'There are no beggars among us,' said a Giliak to the 



152 



reporter, 'if anybod) is poor, the khal (gens) feeds him.' The bond 
between the members of the gens is: common sacrifices and festivals, a 
common burial ground, etc. 

The gens guarantees the life and safety of every one of its members 
from attack by members of another gens. The means for this is blood 
revenge, which, owing to the influence of the Russians, has greatly sub- 
sided of late. Women are entirely exempt from the operation of blood 
revenge. In some cases, extremely rare, members of other gentes are 
adopted. As a general rule the property of a deceased member must not 
leave the gens. In this respect, the well-known rule of the Twelve Tables: 
'Si suos heredes non habet, gentiles familiam habento' — If he has no 
heirs, then the members of the gens shall inherit — is in operation in the 
literal sense of the word among the Giliaks. Not a single important event 
in the Giliak's life takes place without the participation of the gens. Until 
comparatively recently, 'one or two generations ago,' the oldest member 
of the gens was the headman, 'starosta,' of the gens. At the present time, 
however, the functions of the headman of the gens are confined 
almost entirely to superintending religious rites. Often the members of 
the gens are scattered over different parts of the island, very remote 
from each other; but even though separated, they remember each other, 
visit each other, help and protect each other, etc. Incidentally, the Giliak 
does not leave his fellow gentiles or the graves of the gens unless absolute 
necessity compels him to do so. The life of the gens leaves a strong im- 
press upon the Giliak's mentality, character, ethics and institutions. The 
habit of discussing all matters collectively, the necessity of having con- 
stantly to act in the interests of his fellow gentiles, mutual obligation in 
matters of blood revenge, the necessity and custom of living in large 
yurtas together with scores of his fellows, have all served to make the 
Giliak sociable and communicative. The Giliaks are extremely hospitable, 
they love to entertain guests and to go visiting themselves. The noble 
custom of hospitality manifests itself particularly in times of need. In hard 
years, when the Giliak lacks food for himself and his dogs, he does not 
beg for alms; he goes off visiting, certain of finding sustenance — and 
sometimes for a fairly long period. 

Among the Giliaks one rarely meets with crime due to selfish motives. 
The Giliak keeps his valuables in a shed, which is never locked. He is so 
sensitive to shame that if he is guilty of some shameful act he goes off 
into the taiga (forest) and hangs himself. Murder among the Giliaks is 
very rare, and in most cases is committed in moments of extreme excite- 
ment; at all events it is never committed for selfish motives. In his rela- 
tions W'ith others the Giliak displays truthfulness, loyalty to his word 
and conscientiousness. 

153 



Notwithstanding their long subjection to the China-ized Manchurians 
and the corrupting influence of the disreputable population of the Amur 
Region, the Giliaks in their morals have retained many of the virtues 
peculiar to primitive tribe*. But the fate of their social system is irre- 
vocably sealed. Another generation or two. and the Giliaks on the main- 
land will have become completely Russified, and with the benefits of 
civilization they will acquire all its vices. The Sakhalin Giliaks, being 
more or less removed from the centres of Russian settlement, have eome 
chance of preserving themselves in their purity somewhat longer. But 
even on them the Russian population is beginning to exercise its influence. 
From all the villages they travel to Nikolayevsk to make purchases or 
to seek employment; and every Giliak who returns from such employment 
to his native village carries with him the same atmosphere that the town 
worker carries into the Russian village. Moreover, employment in town, 
with its vicissitudes of fortune, is more and more destroying the primitive 
equality which is the predominating feature of the simple economic life 
of people like the Giliaks. 

Mr. Sternberg's essay also contains data on the religious views and 
customs of the Giliaks. their rites, legal institutions, etc. This essay will 
be published in Etnograficheskoye Obozreniye (Ethnographical Review). n 



NAME INDEX* 



Aeschylus (525-456 B.C.) — Famous 
Greek poet, known as "the father of 
tragedy," pp. 8, 52, 86. 

Agassiz, Louis Jean Rudolf (1807-1873) 
— American natural scientist, p. 43. 

Alexander the Great (356-323 B.C.), 
p. 50. 

Ammianus Marcellinus (330-400) — 
Historian of Rome, pp. 57, 76. 

Anacreon (VI century B.C.) — Greek 
lyrical poet, p. 63. 

Anaxandridas and Aristones (VII-VI 
centuries B.C.) — Kings of ancient 
Sparta, p. 52. 

Appius Claudius (V century B.C.) — 
Roman statesman, reputed to be the 
author of the oldest Roman code of 
laws, known as the Twelve Tables, 
p. 100. 

Aristides (535-467 B.C.)— Greek states- 
man and military leader, p. 96. 

Aristophanes (450-335 B.C. — Celebrated 
Greek writer of comedies, p. 53. 

Aristotle (384-322 B.C.)— Greek philos- 
opher; described the Constitution of 
Athens, p. 88. 

Artaxerxes, the name of three ancient 
Persian emperors who reigned in the 
period 465-338 B.C., p. 105. 

Augustus (63 B.C.-14 A.D.)— First 
Roman emperor, pp. 100, 120. 

Bachofen. Johann Jakob (1815-1887) — 
Swiss Jurist, historian and archaeol- 
ogist, pp. 7-11, 13. 15, 27, 28, 34, 35, 

41, 42, 44, 47, 67. 



Bancroft, Hubert Howe (1832-1918)— 
Ethnologist, made investigations 
among the North American aborigines, 
pp. 31, 42, 44, 131. 

Bang K. D. (1822-1898)— Norwegian 
writer on the history of literature, 
p. 113. 

Becker, Wilhelm Adolf (1796-1846) — 
German archaeologist, p. 83. 

Beda, the Venerable (674-735)— English 
theologian, learned in many branches 
of science, author of numerous 
chronicles and descriptions of social 
life, p. 111. 

Bismarck, Otto von (1815-1898) — 
Chancellor of Germany, pp. 52, 142. 

Bleichroeder, Gerson (1822-1893)— Head 
of a famous Berlin bank of that name, 
P. 142. 

Bugge, Elseus Sophus (1833-1907)— 
Norwegian philologist, p. 113. 

Caesar, Caius Julius (100-44 B.C.) — 
Famous Roman military leader and 
statesman, author of The History of 
the Gallic Wars. pp. 13, 23, 35, 75, 
109, 111, 115, 116, 118, 120. 

Charlemagne (742-814) — From 768 was 
king of the Franks, and from 800 was 
Roman emperor. Founder of the so- 
called "Holy Empire of the German 
Nation." pp. 126, 127. 

Civilis, Julius (I century A.D.) — Leader 
of the rebellion of the Batavians and 



* Mythological names are omitted. — Ed. Eng. ed. 



155 



other Germanic tribes against Roman 
rule in 68 A.D., p. 114. 

Clcisthcncs (VI century B.C.) — Athen- 
ian statesman, p. 96. 

Cunow. Heinrich (born ,1862) — German 
ethnologist, p. 50. , 

Cuvier, Georges, Baron de 1 1769-1882) — 
Celebrated French natural scientist, 
p. 26. 

Darwin Charles Robert (1809-1882), 
p. 15. 

de Coulanges — Fustel de Coulanges, 
Numa Denis (1830-1889)— French 
historian, p. 85. 

Demosthenes (384-322 B.C.)— Greek 
statesman and famous orator, p. 82. 

Dikaearchos (IV century B.C.) — Greek 
historian and geographer, a pupil of 
Aristotle, p. 83. 

Diodorus, Siculus (I century B.C.) — 
Greek historian, author of the forty- 
volume "Historical Library ," pp. 113, 
120. 

Oionysius of Halicarnassus (I century 
B.C.) — Greek writer of Roman 
history, p. 86. 

Dureau de la Malle, Adolphe (1777- 
1857) — French economist and histor- 
ian, p. 106. 

Espinas, Alfred Victor (1844-1922)— 
French biologist and sociologist, p. 29. 

Euripides (480-406 B.C.)— Writer of 
.Greek tragedies, p. 53. 

Ferdinand the Catholic (1452-1516)— 
King of Castile and Aragon, p. 44. 

Fison, Lorimer (1832-1907)— English 
missionary and ethnologist. In con- 
junction with Howitt, Alfred Wil- 
liam, wrote Group Marriage Among 
the Australian Aborigines, pp. 36, 38. 

Fourier. Charles (1772-1837)— French 
Ltopian Socialist, highly esteemed 
by Marx and Engels for his biting 
satires on bourgeois society, pp. 16, 
59. 128. 

Freeman. Edward Augustus (1823-1892) 
— English historian, p. 6. 



Gaius (II century A.D.) — Roman jurist, 

p. 48. 
Giraud-Teulon, Alexis (bom 1839) — 

Franco-Swiss historian, pp, 14, 16, 28, 

29, 51. 
Gladstone, William Ewart (1809-1898), 

p. 86. 
Goethe. Johann Wolfgang von (1749- 

1832), p. 32. 
Gregory of Tours (539-594) — Bishop, 

theologian and historian, p. 115. 
Grimm, Jakob (1785-1863) — German 

philologist, p. 112. 
Grote, George (1794-1871)— English 

historian, pp. 82-85. 

Hegel, Georg Wilhelm Friedrieh (1770- 

1831). p. 140. 
Herod, King of Judea (37 B.C.-4 A.D.), 

p. 105. 
Herodotus (484-425 B.C.)— Ancient 

Greek historian, pp. 35, 53. 
Heussler, Andreas (1834-1921)— Swiss 

jurist, p. 49. 
Homer (IX century B.C.) — Reputed 

author of the Iliad and the Odyssey, 

pp. 23, 52, 85, 86, 88. 
Houitt, Alfred William (1830-1908), see 

Fison, p. 38. 
Huschke, Georg Philipp Eduard (1830- 

1909) — German writer on the history 

of law, p. 103. 

Irminon (IX century) — A Frankish 
Benedictine monk, p. 126. 

Kaye, John William (1814-1876)— 

English ethnologist, p. 35. 
Kovalevsky, Maxim Maximovich (1851- 

1916) — Russian ethnographist and 

sociologist, pp. 47, 48, 50. 108, 111, 

115, 116. 

Lange, Ludwig (1825-1885)— German 

philologist and historian, p. 103. 
Lassalle, Ferdinand (1825-1864), p. 145. 
Latham. Robert Gordon (1812-1888) — 

English philologist and ethnographist, 

p. 11. 
Letourneau. Charles Jean Marie (1831- 

1902)— French sociologist, pp. 28, 31. 



156 



Livy, Titus (59 B.C.-19 A.D.)— Author 

of 142 volumes of Roman history 

entitled From the Foundation of the 

City, pp. 102, 103. 
Longus (III-II century B.C.)— Greek 

author, p. 63. 
Lubbock, John (1834-1913)— English 

natural scientist, archaeologist and 

historian, p. 14. 
Luitprand of Cremona (929-972)— 

Bishop, author of a series of chonic- 

les, p.123. 

McLennan, John Ferguson (1827-1881) 
—English jurist and historian, pp. 
10-16, 26, 40, 51, 71, 108. 

Maine, Henry James Sumner (1822- 
1888)— English writer on the history 
of law and sociology, p. 65. 

Marx, Karl (1818-1883), pp. 5, 15, 16, 
26, 32, 34, 47, 48, 52, 54, 57, 81, 83, 
84, 86, 88, ,130, 136. 

Maurer, Georg Ludwig, Ritter von 
(1790-1872)— German historian, au- 
thor of fundamental works on the 
social and economic conditions of 
the ancient Germans, pp. 78, 114, 115. 

Mommsen, Theodor (1817-1903)— Ger- 
man historian and liberal statesman, 
pp. 83, 101-105. 

Morgan, Lewis Henry (1818-1881), pp. 
5, 6, 7, 11-16, 19, 20, 24, 25, 26, 27, 
31, 33, 36, 39, ( 55, 68-71, 78, 84, 86, 
88, 90, 97, 104, 111, 130, 147. 

Moschus (about 250 B.C.)— Greek poet, 
p. 63. 

Napoleon I (1769-1821), pp. 51, 56, 71. 

Nearchos (IV century B.C.) — Admiral 
of Alexander the Great. Fragments 
of his description of the latter s In- 
dian campaign have come down to 
our times, p. 50. 

Niebuhr, Barthold Georg (1776-1831)— 
German historian, pp. 83, 85, 104, 140. 

Odoaker (died 493) — German military 
leader in the service of Rome. Over- 
threw Romulus Augustus, last emperor 
of Rome, and proclaimed himself 



King of the East Goths in Italy, p. 
118. 



Perseus (212-166 B.C.)— Last king of 
ancient Macedonia, p. 120. 

Pisistratus (605-527 B.C.)— First tyrant 
in Athens, p. 98. 

Pliny the Younger (62-113 A.D.)— Ro- 
man historian and statesman, pp. 117, 
120. 

Plutarch (50-120 A.D.)— Greek histor- 
ian, p. 52. ) 

Procopius (490-562) — Byzantine jurist 
and historian, p. 57. 

Romulus (753-716 B.C.)— One of the 
reputed founders of the city of Rome, 
p. 100. 

Salvianus de Marseilles (400-484) — Bi- 
shop, celebrated orator, pp. 124, 126. 

Saussure, Henri (1829-1905)— Swiss 
natural scientist and ethnologist, p. 
28. 

Schomann, Georg Friedrich (1793-1879) 
— German philologist and historian, 
pp. 53, 86. 

Scott, Walter (1771-1832), p. 111. 

Series Tullius (578-534 B.C.)— sixth 
king of Rome, p. 106. 

Solon (640-559 B.C.)— Greek statesman; 
gave Athens a new constitution, pp. 
84, 91, 94, 95, 106, 145. 

Sternberg, Leo Yakovlevich (1861- 
1927) — Russian ethnologist. Banished 
to Sakhalin j by the tsarist govern- 
ment. Author of numerous works on 
the aborigines of Sakhalin and Kam- 
chatka, pp. 152, 154. 

Sugenheim, Samuel (1811-1877) — Ger- 
man historian, p. 44. 

Tacitus, Publius Cornelius (55-120) — 
Famous Roman historian, pp. 6, 13, 
23, 56, 112-119. 

Tarquinius Superbus (reigned 534-510 
B.C.) — Seventh king of Rome. After 
he was deposed Rome became a re- 
public, pp. 105, 107. 

Theodoric, the name of three Gothic 



157 



kings who reigned about 419-526, p. 
105. 

Theocritus (III century B.C.) — Greek 
poet, p. 63. i 

Theseus, legendary Greek hero and 
prince, who is reputed to have united 
the various Attic communities and to 
have established Athens as their 
capital, p. 91. 

Thucydides (460-403 B.C.)— Greek 
historian, author of The Pelopon- 
nesian War, p. 88. 

Tiberius (42 B.C.-37 A.D.)— Emperor 
of Rome from 14 A.D., p. 105. 

Tylor, Edward Burnett (1832-1917) — 
English anthropologist and ethnol- 
ogist, p. 8. 



Ulfdas (310-383)— First Bishop of the 
Goths, invented the Gothic alphabet 
and translated the Bible into Gothic, 
p. 105. 



Varus, P. Quinctilius (died IX A.D.)— 
Roman Consul in Germany whose 
legions were routed by the Germans 
in the battle of Teutoburg Forest, 
p. 100. 



Wachsmuth, Ernst Wilhelm Gottlieb 
(1784-1886)— German historian, p. 53. 

Wagner, Richard (1813-1883), p. 32. 

Waltz, Georg (1813-1886)— German 
historian, p. 115. 

Watson, John Forbes (1827-1892)— 
English ethnologist who, in jconjunc- 
tion with /. W. Kaye, wrote several 
works on the modern history of India, 
p. 35. 

Westermarch\ Edward Alexander (born 
1862)— Swedish historian, pp. 28, 30, 
31, 42. 

Wolfram von Eschenbach (1170-1220)— 
German poet of the Middle Ages, 
p. 58. 

Wright, Eter Arthur (1803-1875— a mis- 
sionary among the Iroquois a col- 
laborator with Morgan, p. 41. 

Yanchuk, Nikolai Andreyevich (1859- 
1921) — Russian ethnographist, p. 152. 

Yaroslav (987-1054)— Grand Duke of 
Kiev, p. 49. 



Zurita, Alonso de (middle of XVI cent- 
ury) — Spanish historian, one of the 
first explorers of ancient Mexico, p. 
50. 



•v."' 












